PLASTIC  ADDITIVES  IN  CONSUMER  PRODUCTS 

S.  HRG.  110–1186 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, 
INSURANCE, AND AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

MAY  14,  2008 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

77–339 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2012 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

PAUL NAGLE,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  CONSUMER  AFFAIRS,  INSURANCE,  AND 

AUTOMOTIVE  SAFETY 

MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas,  Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire, 

Ranking 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 
ROGER  F.  WICKER,  Mississippi 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 14, 2008 
...............................................................................
Statement of Senator Kerry  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Nelson  ..................................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Sununu  ................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Group 

Alderson,  Ph.D.,  Norris  E.,  Associate  Commissioner  for  Science,  Food  and 
Drug Administration, Department of Health and Human Services  ................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hentges,  Ph.D.,  Steven  G.,  Executive  Director,  Polycarbonate/BPA  Global 
Group, American Chemistry Council  ..................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hitchcock,  Elizabeth,  Public  Health  Advocate,  U.S.  Public  Interest  Research 
....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Myers, Ph.D., John Peterson, CEO and Chief Scientist, Environmental Health 
Sciences  .................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Schumer, Hon. Charles E., U.S. Senator from New York  ....................................
Letter dated May 13, 2008 from the Consumers Union, Consumer Federa-
tion  of  America,  Kids  in  Danger,  Public  Citizen,  National  Research 
Center  for  Women  &  Families  and  the  U.S.  Public  Interest  Research 
Group to Hon. Mark Pryor  ...........................................................................
Wind,  Dr.  Marilyn  L.,  Deputy  Associate  Executive  Director  for  Health 
Sciences, U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Norris E. Alderson, Ph.D.  ................................................................................
Elizabeth Hitchcock  ..........................................................................................
John Peterson Myers, Ph.D.  ............................................................................

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. John F. Kerry by: 

Page 
1 
31 
27 
24 
1 
7 
8 

9 
10 

50 
52 

43 
44 

35 
37 
3 

5 

13 
15 

79 
99 
89 

84 
Norris E. Alderson, Ph.D.  ................................................................................
Steven G. Hentges, Ph.D. 
................................................................................ 116 
Elizabeth Hitchcock  .......................................................................................... 104 
95 
John Peterson Myers, Ph.D.  ............................................................................
Dr. Marilyn L. Wind  .........................................................................................
89 

Response to written question submitted by Hon. Mark Pryor to: 

Norris E. Alderson, Ph.D.  ................................................................................
Steven G. Hentges, Ph.D. 
Elizabeth Hitchcock  ..........................................................................................
John Peterson Myers, Ph.D.  ............................................................................
Dr. Marilyn L. Wind  .........................................................................................
White  Paper  (summary),  entitled,  EA/Free  Plastics:  The  Only  Alternative 
for  Safe  Plastics,  submitted  by  George  D.  Bittner,  Ph.D.,  Professor  of 
Neurobiology,  The  University  of  Texas  at  Austin  and  CEO,  CertiChem, 
PlastiPure, Austin, Texas  .................................................................................... 119 

79 
................................................................................ 106 
99 
90 
86 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

PLASTIC  ADDITIVES  IN  CONSUMER 

PRODUCTS 

WEDNESDAY,  MAY  14,  2008 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON CONSUMER AFFAIRS, INSURANCE, AND 
AUTOMOTIVE SAFETY, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:05  a.m.,  in 
room  SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Mark  Pryor, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  I  will  call  the  meeting  to  order.  I  want  to  thank 
everyone  for  being  here.  Senator  Schumer  is  going  to  be  here  in 
just a minute. So I will go ahead and do my opening statement. 

Just  for  everybody’s  knowledge,  we  have  three  panels  today.  We 
have,  first,  Senator  Schumer  and  he  has  legislation.  Second,  we 
have  a  government  panel,  the  FDA  and  the  Consumer  Product 
Safety Commission, and third, we have people who are—I am going 
to  call  them  industry  people  or  they  are  people  that  are  familiar 
with  this  issue  that  are  not  inside  the  government.  We  look  for-
ward to hearing comments from everyone on this issue. 

The  purpose  of  the  hearing  today  is  to  gather  information  and 
try  to  help  us  in  the  Senate  start  the  process  of  getting  the  facts 
together and understanding this issue, understanding the facts and 
the  science  here.  Like  many  of  you,  I  have  seen  some  media  re-
ports. Some of this has been on the sensational side. Some has not 
been. I think it is very important for the Senate and the Commerce 
Committee  specifically  to  understand  the  science  that  is  involved 
here. 

So  let  me  go  ahead  and  open  it  up.  Several  Senators  are  going 
to be coming and going. There are other Committees meeting right 
now.  So  we  expect  to  have  several  Senators  here  throughout  the 
course of the hearing. 

But again, I would like to say welcome to everyone. 
I know that Senator Sununu will be here. I look forward to work-
ing  with  him  on  this  issue,  as  well  as  other  issues  that  we  have 
been doing over the last couple years here. 

We  are  here  today  to  talk  about  plastic  additives  in  consumer 
products.  The  focus  of  the  hearing  will  include  common  chemicals 
found  in  plastics  and  consumer  products,  most  notably  phthalates 
and  BPA,  and  their  relevant  scientific  and  health  assessments  by 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

2 

leading governmental and nongovernmental bodies. I will also note 
that  we  are  trying  to  gather  relevant  information  from  these  ex-
perts and from people who understand these issues in an effort for 
Congress  to,  like  I  said  before,  get  a  better  handle  on  this.  So  we 
are  trying  to,  at  today’s  hearing,  get  a  wide  range  of  input  as  our 
starting  point,  and  then  we  will  see  where  that  leads  us  in  subse-
quent weeks in subsequent hearings. 

Again,  there  have  been  several  news  accounts  of  phthalates  and 
BPA  that  are  used  in  plastic  consumer  products.  Many  of  these 
press reports talk about specific or potential health effects of expo-
sure  to  these  chemicals.  I  know  that  whenever  you  talk  about 
chemical exposure, there are a lot of questions that come up about 
how the testing is done and whether you use high doses, low doses, 
how  that  testing  process  works.  I  am  sure  we  will  talk  at  least 
some about that today. 

The  panels  here  know  what  phthalates  and  BPA  chemicals  are, 
but  let  me  go  ahead  and  explain  it  to  the  general  public  because 
I  think  even  Senators  sometimes  struggle  with  these  scientific 
terms. 

Phthalates are a common class of chemicals used in many house-
hold  products  to  improve  flexibility  in  plastics.  Phthalates  are  pri-
marily  used  to  make  PVC,  a  plastic  used  in  many  consumer  prod-
ucts  such  as  raincoats,  vinyl  furniture,  flooring,  medical  and  per-
sonal  care  products,  and  even  in  recreational  and  also  lots  of  chil-
dren’s toys. 

BPA is a chemical used to make polycarbonate plastics which are 
clear  and  nearly  shatterproof.  These  plastics  are  used  to  make  a 
variety  of  common  products,  including  things  like  baby  and  water 
bottles,  sports  equipment,  medical  devices,  CD’s,  household  elec-
tronics.  Any  product  that  is  made  of  hard,  clear  plastic  likely  in-
cludes  BPA  unless  the  manufacturer  specifically  states  it  is  BPA- 
free. 

The industry regulatory actions on these chemicals varies widely. 
California,  the  European  Union,  as  well  as  numerous  countries 
have  banned  certain  phthalates  in  children’s  toys.  Though  no  gov-
ernment  entities  have  yet  banned  BPA,  many  states  and  Canada 
have begun initiatives to either regulate or ban BPA. So this is an 
emerging area when it comes to regulation, and again, it is impor-
tant for us to understand what is going on out there. 

Some of the larger companies like Wal-Mart, Toys ‘‘R’’ Us, IKEA, 
either  have  or  will  be  phasing  out  the  use  of  phthalates  in  some 
of their consumer products. I think Wal-Mart Canada and Nalgene, 
which makes these unbreakable kind of water bottles and these lit-
tle containers, have begun phasing out the use of BPA. 

Though  the  scientific  studies  for  these  chemicals  are  varied  and 
robust, I believe it is essential for Congress to develop a clearer pic-
ture  of  the  landscape  for  the  use  of  these  and  other  chemicals  in 
plastics  in  consumer  products.  It  is  my  hope  that  this  hearing  will 
allow us to get some of the facts straight. 

It is also my hope that those here today can address not only the 
scientific  studies  of  themselves  and  others  with  regard  to 
phthalates and BPA, but also shed light upon alternative needs as-
sessments  and  possible  actions  with  regard  to  those  other  alter-
natives that exist in the marketplace. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

3 

It  is  imperative  that  Congress  act  judiciously  when  considering 
such  vast  reform  to  the  regulatory  nature  of  these  consumer  prod-
ucts and take into consideration not only the here and now but the 
future path that we might forge. 

I  very  much  look  forward  to  hearing  the  testimony  today.  As  I 
said, we will have other colleagues join us throughout the hearing. 
I  look  forward  to  their  comments  and  questions  and  their  input.  I 
know  that  we  will  all  have  lots  of  questions  and  thoughts  on  this. 
I  would  say  this,  that  one  of  the  things  we  talked  about  as  we 
were  on  the  floor  passing  the  consumer  product  safety  legislation, 
which  we  passed  several  weeks  ago,  was  phthalates.  That  issue 
was  hitting  the  news  media  about  that  time,  and  it  raised  a  lot  of 
discussion  on  the  floor  about  what  are  phthalates,  why  are  they 
used,  how  are  they  used,  should  we  regulate  them,  should  we  ban 
them. I mean, we got into these questions. 

One  of  the  things  that  I  learned  is  that  there  are  many,  many 
different kinds of phthalates, and some have been tested and tested 
and  tested,  and  others  we  really  do  not  know  that  much  about.  So 
we need to be careful in how we proceed, I think, because if we are 
not  careful,  if  we  ban  one  thing,  some  other  phthalate  may  come 
on  the  market  that  may  be  more  hazardous,  more  dangerous.  So 
we  just  do  not  know.  So  we  will  talk  about  all  those  questions 
today. 

And  we  are  honored  now  to  have  Senator  Charles  Schumer  of 
New  York  here.  He  has  legislation.  He  is  our  first  panel,  and  I 
know  that  he  has  a  very,  very  busy  schedule  today.  He  is  running 
between about 20 different stops he has to make this morning. So, 
Senator Schumer, thank you and welcome to the Subcommittee. 

STATEMENT OF HON. CHARLES E. SCHUMER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Senator  SCHUMER.  Well,  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Good  morn-
ing.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing.  More  impor-
tantly,  I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  really  fine,  exquisite  leader-
ship on these issues and CPSC reform. It has just been great. You 
have  done  all  of  this  in  a  directed  way  where  solving  the  problem 
is  important,  but  a  careful  and  measured  way  as  well  where  you 
listen  to  all  sides  and  try  to  balance  the  considerations.  And  I 
would just like to say, Mr. Chairman, I think the American people 
are lucky to have you in this position at this crucial time. 

I would also like to thank Chairman Inouye for his work and de-
termination  and  leadership  on  these  issues  as  well.  And  I  appre-
ciate  the  Committee  making  some  time  to  hear  me  on  this  issue 
because  I  care  a  lot  about  it  and  I  think  we  have  some  things  to 
do. 

So  I  am  here  today  to  talk  about  bisphenol  A,  commonly  known 
as  BPA,  and  the  legislation  that  I  have  introduced  along  with  a 
whole bunch of my colleagues, the BPA-Free Kids Act of 2008. 

The  legislation  is  an  important  step  in  addressing  the  gathering 
storm of BPA safety. It will ban BPA in children’s products, includ-
ing  baby  bottles,  sippy  cups,  and  other  toys.  It  is  always  a  scary 
day when the health and safety of our children is called into ques-
tion. Obviously, we want to protect them from harm and not expose 
them to possible danger. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

4 

When the National Toxicology Program of the NIH released their 
study  that  BPA  could  very  well  cause  certain  types  of  cancer  and 
hormonal  and  developmental  disorders,  the  world  took  note.  The 
NTP  cited  studies  showing  that  BPA  can  cause  developmental 
problems  in  infants,  particularly  boys,  which  could  lead  to  serious 
reproductive  problems  in  later  life.  It  also  cited  studies  that  indi-
cated  a  possible  link  between  childhood  exposure  to  BPA  and  im-
paired neurological development. 

When  the  report  came  out,  the  study,  I  heard  from  many  con-
cerned  and  confused  parents  around  New  York  who  read  articles 
about  the  report,  and  they  are  now  researching  on  websites  and 
turning  bottles  over  in  stores  and  asking  shopkeepers  does  this 
contain  BPA.  And  now  they  are  asking  themselves  was  the  bottle 
they  used  to  feed  their  child  safe.  What  about  the  teething  ring? 
What about the sippy cup? 

And  the  question  I  heard  the  loudest  was  why  was  the  Govern-
ment not doing anything about this. That was the biggest question 
we had, Mr. Chairman, and it was a good one because at the same 
time the report came out, we also read that Canada was taking ac-
tion  and  banning  this  chemical  in  baby  bottles.  We  heard  that 
Nalgene—this is the water bottle maker from my home state. They 
are in Rochester, New York. They are a fine company, and they an-
nounced  on  their  own  they  were  discontinuing  BPA  produced  bot-
tles.  We  heard  that  Wal-Mart  in  your  state,  Mr.  Chairman,  was 
pulling its children’s products containing BPA immediately from its 
Canadian stores and, by the beginning of the next year, from stores 
here  in  the  states.  Toys  ‘‘R’’  Us  took  similar  action.  And  in  Cali-
fornia,  a  ban  on  BPA  in  children’s  products  is  making  its  way 
through the State legislature. 

Yet, here in Washington, we seem to have an FDA that was look-
ing  the  other  way,  that  was  not  taking  the  studies  and  concerns 
into  account.  I  am  now  pleased  that  the  FDA  has  initiated  a  task 
force to look into its prior approval of BPA and to determine if fur-
ther action needs to be taken. 

But  I  answer  that  right  here  and  right  now  we  cannot  wait  any 
longer.  Congress  must  act.  As  I  have  said  over  the  last  month, 
when  dealing  with  our  vulnerable  population,  our  children,  it  is 
better  to  be  safe  than  sorry.  We  buy  things  for  our  kids  to  keep 
them  safe:  shatter-resistant  sippy  cups,  chip-proof  baby  bottles. 
And  then  we  find  out  later  that  the  very  products  we  thought 
would be safe could actually be much more dangerous for our chil-
dren than the harm that they were intended to prevent. 

So along with my colleagues, Senators Feinstein, Kerry, Clinton, 
Durbin, Menendez, and Boxer, I have introduced the S. 2928, BPA- 
Free  Kids  Act  of  2008.  The  Act  would  ban  BPA  from  children’s 
products  and  mandate  the  CDC  conduct  a  study  into  the  negative 
effects of BPA on all age groups, including expectant mothers. 

I  would  like  to  thank  and  commend  my  colleagues  who  have 
worked with me in creating this legislation, pushed this important 
issue. Particularly Senator Feinstein had some very important sug-
gestions and we heeded most of them. 

Mr.  Chairman,  parents  always  err  on  the  side  of  caution  when 
it  comes  to  their  kids’  health.  We  think  the  law  should  do  the 
same. My bill, if it errs, errs on the side of caution by banning the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

5 

use  of  BPA  in  all  children’s  products,  including  toys,  dishes,  baby 
bottles,  pacifiers,  you  name  it.  If  it  is  made  for  children,  it  should 
not  have  BPA  in  it.  Specifically,  the  bill  would  amend  the  Federal 
Hazardous  Substances  Act  to  include  BPA  for  children’s  products 
and  trigger  all  the  prohibitions  of  the  Act.  In  that  case,  BPA  in 
baby  bottles  and  other  children’s  products  could  not  be  manufac-
tured or sold. Parents will not have to worry whether the products 
their children put in their mouths could cause damage. 

Let me be clear, Mr. Chairman. I think we have to look at elimi-
nating  BPA  from  a  wide  variety  of  products  that  all  of  us  use  in 
our  daily  life.  If  it  causes  harm,  let  us  get  rid  of  it.  But  I  think  it 
is important to focus first on children who we owe a duty to protect 
and  shield  from  all  harm,  whether  it  is  a  sharp  object  or  a  toxic 
chemical.  It  is  a  similar  philosophy  that  you  and  Senator  Nelson 
and  Senator  Klobuchar,  cosponsors  of  the  CPSC  Reform  Act,  took 
when  addressing  the  problem  of  lead  in  toys.  Just  like  lead,  BPA 
has  the  potential  to  cause  devastating  health  effects,  and  just  like 
lead in children’s toys, BPA should be banned. 

Now, I am proud to say that this act has been endorsed by Con-
sumers  Union,  Public  Citizen,  the  Environmental  Working  Group, 
First  Focus,  Kids  in  Danger,  and  the  Consumer  Federation  of 
America. All are groups whose mission it is to protect our children. 
I commend them for their work and appreciate their support. 

Additionally  U.S.  PIRG  has  endorsed  the  bill,  and  I  believe  Ms. 
Hitchcock  from  the  group  is  testifying  before  this  Committee  later 
this morning. And I would ask consent that their support letter be 
entered into the record. 

Senator PRYOR. Without objection. 
[The information referred to follows:] 

Hon. MARK PRYOR, 
Chairman, 
U.S. Senate, 
Subcommittee on Consumer Affairs, Insurance, and Automotive Safety, 
Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 

CONSUMERS UNION 
CONSUMER FEDERATION OF AMERICA 
KIDS IN DANGER 
PUBLIC CITIZEN 
NATIONAL RESEARCH CENTER FOR WOMEN & FAMILIES 
U.S. PUBLIC INTEREST RESEARCH GROUP 

May 13, 2008 

Dear Chairman Pryor: 

We  are  writing  to  thank  you  for  holding  a  hearing  this  week  to  consider  the  ef-
fects  of  additives  to  plastics,  including  bisphenol-A  (BPA)  and  phthalates.  Our 
groups  are  deeply  concerned  about  the  potentially  harmful  health  effects  of  both  of 
these  chemicals  in  consumer  products.  BPA  is  a  common  chemical  found  in  many 
hard plastic products, including baby bottles, and phthalates are a family of chemi-
cals  used  in  toys,  cosmetics,  food  packaging,  and  medical  devices.  We  believe  that 
the potential health and safety hazard associated with BPA and phthalates have es-
caped the scrutiny of our Federal regulators for far too long. 
BPA 

We  know  that  bisphenol-A  can  leach  from  plastic  containers  and  cans  and  into 
food  and  beverages,  generating  potentially  significant  human  exposures.  A  recent 
study released by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) found 
that BPA was in the blood of 93 percent of Americans aged 6 and older. BPA raises 
particularly  troubling  health  questions  because  it  can  affect  the  endocrine  system, 
mimicking  the  effects  of  estrogen  in  the  body.  Experiments  in  animals  and  with 
human cells strongly suggest exposures typical in the U.S. population may increase 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

6 

susceptibility to breast and prostate cancer, reproductive system abnormalities, and, 
for  exposure  in  the  womb  and  early  childhood,  a  host  of  developmental  problems. 
Concerns about early life exposures also extend to early onset of puberty in females, 
potential prostate problems in males, and obesity. 

In May 1999, Consumer Reports magazine reported that BPA from polycarbonate 
plastic baby bottles leached into infant formula after the bottles were heated during 
testing.  Based  on  these  results,  Consumer  Reports  scientists  estimated  that  babies 
fed  formula  sterilized  by  heating  in  the  bottle  could  be  exposed  to  a  BPA  dose  of 
about  4  percent  of  the  amount  that  has  adversely  affected  test  animals  in  experi-
ments conducted by Professor Frederick vom Saal at the University of Missouri, Co-
lumbia.  The  magazine  pointed  out  that,  although  those  levels  may  sound  very  low, 
safety  limits  for  infant  exposure  can  be  set  as  low  as  0.1  percent  of  the  level  that 
has adversely affected animals. 

In the decade since Consumer Reports originally published this article, many new 
studies have substantiated the work of Professor vom Saal, as documented in recent 
reviews  by  expert  committees  at  the  National  Toxicology  Program  and  the  Health 
Ministry  of  Canada.  Unlike  the  Canadian  government,  which  recently  announced 
plans  to  ban  major  sources  of  BPA  exposure,  U.S.  regulatory  agencies  have  yet  to 
act to protect the public. 

The  current  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  daily  upper  limit  for  BPA,  50 
micrograms  per  kilogram  of  body  weight,  is  based  on  industry-sponsored  experi-
ments  conducted  in  the  1980s.  Some  animal  studies  show  adverse  health  affects 
from  exposure  of  only  0.025  micrograms  per  kilogram  of  body  weight,  yet  a 
polycarbonate  baby  bottle  with  room  temperature  water  can  leach  2  micrograms  of 
BPA per liter. A 3-month-old baby drinking from a polycarbonate bottle may be ex-
posed to as much as 11 micrograms per kilogram of body weight daily. 

Aside from polycarbonate plastic bottles, BPA is also a food additive approved by 
the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA),  commonly  used  in  the  coatings  for  the 
inside  of  food  cans.  But  a  recent  report  by  the  National  Toxicology  Program  (NTP) 
questioned  previous  FDA  findings  that  BPA  is  safe  for  such  applications.  Their  re-
port,  issued  on  April  15,  2008,  expressed  ‘‘some  concern’’  based  on  animal  studies 
that  BPA  might  affect  the  neurological  systems  and  behavior  of  infants  and  chil-
dren. Among its conclusions, the NTP report states that, ‘‘the possibility that human 
development may be altered by bisphenol-A at current exposure levels cannot be dis-
missed.’’ 

Our  organizations  recently  endorsed  a  bill  introduced  by  Senator  Charles  Schu-
mer  recently,  S.  2928,  the  ‘‘BPA-Free  Kids  Act  of  2008.’’  This  bill  will  prohibit  the 
use  of  BPA  in  all  children’s  products,  effective  180  days  after  its  enactment.  It  will 
also  require  the  CDC  to  study  the  health  effects  of  BPA  exposure  in  all  age  groups 
and pregnant women. We support this effort and feel it should focus on the products 
that  have  the  greatest  potential  for  causing  human  harm.  Particularly  due  to  the 
possible increased risks to small children and pregnant women, we strongly urge the 
removal of BPA from all products intended to contact food. 

With  such  high  consensus  within  the  independent  scientific  community  on  the 
strength of evidence for adverse health effects associated with BPA exposure, we be-
lieve  it  is  prudent—at  a  minimum—to  remove  BPA  from  children’s  products,  until 
science can prove its safety. 
Phthalates 

Phthalates may be linked to developmental and reproductive health risks. The in-
dustry says that phthalates are safe, but some companies have removed them from 
cosmetics, for example, in response to public concern. California has also passed leg-
islation banning phthalates in children’s products. 

In  2005,  the  CDC  reported  that  it  had  found  breakdown  chemicals  from  two  of 
the  most  common  cosmetic  phthalates  in  almost  every  member  of  a  group  of  2,782 
people it examined. In rodent studies, phthalates have caused testicular injury, liver 
injury,  and  liver  cancer.  Another  report  in  2003  found  that  men  with  higher  con-
centrations of two phthalate breakdown products in their urine were more likely to 
have low sperm count or low sperm motility. 

With such serious concerns about the impact of phthalates on our health, and be-
cause of the ubiquity of these chemicals in our products, we believe Federal agencies 
must  also  examine  and  act  upon  independent,  unbiased  science  about  all  of  the  po-
tential harms associated with phthalates in order to protect the public health. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

7 

Again,  we  appreciate  your  Subcommittee’s  work 

in  examining  BPA  and 
phthalates.  We  look  forward  to  continuing  to  work  with  you  and  the  members  of 
the Subcommittee in the future. 

Sincerely, 
DONALD L. MAYS 
Senior Director, Product Safety and 

Technical Public Policy 

Consumers Union 
AMI GADHIA 
Policy Counsel 
Consumers Union 
NANCY A. COWLES 
Executive Director 
Kids in Danger 
DAVID ARKUSH 
Director, Congress Watch 
Public Citizen 

ELLEN BLOOM 
Director, Federal Policy 
Consumers Union 
RACHEL WEINTRAUB 
Director of Product Safety and Senior 

Counsel 

Consumer Federation of America 
ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK 
Public Health Advocate 
U.S. Public Interest Research Group 
PAUL BROWN 
Government Relations Manager 
National Research Center for Women & 

Families 

Senator SCHUMER. These groups have told me that the BPA-Free 
Kids Act of 2008 is a huge step in the right direction of protecting 
children from potential neurological or reproductive harm. 

We will hear from others, I am sure, who are going to say today 
that BPA is safe and this entire outcry has been blown way out of 
proportion.  And  my  response  is  that  Congress  should  not  gamble 
with our children’s health. If there is a significant chance that this 
may  cause  harm,  particularly  in  children,  then  we  ought  to  err  on 
the side of caution. 

In closing, I believe that we in Congress owe it to parents to give 
them  the  peace  of  mind  that  this  bill  would  provide.  There  are  al-
ternative chemicals and other products that can be used, as shown 
by  the  speed  by  which  companies  like  Nalgene  and  Wal-Mart  and 
Toys ‘‘R’’ Us moved, and I hope, Mr. Chairman, that in the coming 
months, this Committee will have the opportunity to mark up this 
bill  and  it  will  be  passed  into  law.  Obviously,  I  look  forward  to 
working with you and the Committee to move our legislation, make 
improvements that you might see fit. 

And  last  but  certainly  not  least,  I  want  to  thank  you  and  the 
Ranking  Member  for  allowing  me  the  opportunity  to  speak  here 
today. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Well,  thank  you,  Senator  Schumer.  It  is  always 
good to have you here, and thank you for your interest in this and 
your leadership. 

I  do  not  have  any  questions  about  your  legislation  at  this  point. 

Do you? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Senator  SUNUNU.  No,  I  have  no  questions.  I  certainly  want  to 
thank the Senator for being here and thank the Chairman for put-
ting together the hearing. 

There is no question that we need to understand the role and re-
sponsibility of the agencies that are entrusted with the protections 
Senator  Schumer  talked  about,  the  FDA,  the  Consumer  Product 
Safety  Commission,  their  role  and  responsibility  in  understanding 
the  impact  and  effects  of  not  just  BPA,  but  any  additives  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

8 

chemicals  that  are  included  in  plastics,  especially  those  intended 
for  products  that  are  used  by  children.  They  are  the  most  vulner-
able  population.  They  are  the  ones  who  are  most  likely  to  be  af-
fected by even low dosages or low levels of exposure. 

We also want to make sure that we are doing everything possible 
at  the  Federal  level  to  better  understand  those  impacts,  whether 
it  is  research  that  is  funded  through  agencies  like  the  NIH,  or  re-
search that is being encouraged or funded in the private sector. We 
need  to  have  an  honest,  clear-headed  assessment  of  what  the 
health  effects  are,  and  what  the  risks  are  even  if  the  risks  are 
small. Oftentimes even small risks warrant taking action as an in-
surance policy against our lack of knowledge. 

So  I  thank  the  Senator  for  being  here  and  look  forward  to  the 

testimony of our key witnesses. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Sununu follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN E. SUNUNU, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE 

Mr. Chairman, thank you for holding today’s hearing. 
Lately,  many  Americans  have  heard  and  read  a  lot  about  phthalates  and 
bisphenol  A  (BPA),  but  for  most,  these  two  chemicals  generate  a  tremendous 
amount of confusion. 

There  are  scientific  studies  that  conclude  both  are  perfectly  safe,  and  other  stud-

ies that indicate possible concern. 

Consumers  see  retail  giants  Wal-Mart  and  Toys  ‘‘R’’  Us  tell  their  suppliers  that 
they  will  no  longer  sell  toys  with  phthalates  and  baby  bottles  with  BPA  and  they 
wonder:  if  they’re  taking  action,  then  maybe  there  is  some  health  impact  after  all. 
Or, are they responding to market forces. 

American consumers want to know: 
• Are these chemicals safe? 
• Are calls for their removal from products justified? 
• Are there alternatives that are safer and more effective? 
Consumers  are  receiving  conflicting  data  over  what’s  safe  for  their  families,  and 

they want to be able to separate fact from fiction. 

The  sheer  ubiquity  of  plastics  in  our  society  necessitates  a  closer  look;  to  make 
sure  the  products  consumers  are  purchasing,  and  particularly,  eating  and  drinking 
from, are not harmful. 

It  is  my  hope  we  are  able  to  shed  some  light  on  this  important  issue  today,  and 

I am quite interested to hear what our witnesses have to say. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Senator SCHUMER. I thank both of you. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Senator Schumer. 
With  that,  what  we  will  do  is  we  will  call  up  our  second  panel, 
and  that  would  be  the  two  government  witnesses.  And  I  will  just 
do  a  very,  very  brief  introduction.  If  you  all  want  to  come  up  and 
take  your  seats  and  get  your  microphones  adjusted  there,  that 
would be great. 

First  we  will  have  Dr.  Norris  Alderson,  Associate  Commissioner 
for Science, the Food and Drug Administration, and second we will 
have  Dr.  Marilyn  Wind,  Deputy  Associate  Executive  Director  for 
Health  Sciences,  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission.  Dr. 
Alderson, do you want to go first? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

9 

STATEMENT OF NORRIS E. ALDERSON, PH.D., 
ASSOCIATE COMMISSIONER FOR SCIENCE, 

FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION, 

DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Good  morning,  Chairman  Pryor  and  Members  of 
the  Subcommittee.  I  am  Dr.  Norris  Alderson,  Associate  Commis-
sioner for Science at FDA. Thank you for providing an opportunity 
to  discuss  the  FDA’s  ongoing  work  regarding  the  safety  of 
bisphenol A, or BPA. 

Last month, FDA Commissioner Andrew von Eschenbach formed 
an agency-wide BPA Task Force, which I chair, to conduct a review 
of the concerns raised in recent risk assessments of BPA. That task 
force  is  undertaking  a  cross-agency  review  of  current  research  and 
information on the safety of BPA. 

Although  our  review  is  ongoing  at  this  time,  we  have  no  reason 
to recommend that consumers stop using products containing BPA. 
A  large  body  of  evidence  indicates  that  currently  marketed  prod-
ucts containing BPA, such as baby bottles and food containers, are 
safe  and  that  exposure  levels  to  BPA  from  these  products  are  well 
below those that may cause health effects. 

I will note, however, that individuals who, nonetheless, have con-
cerns  about  BPA  may  turn  to  alternative  products  in  the  market-
place. For example, alternatives to polycarbonate baby bottles such 
as those made from glass are widely available. 

I  also  want  to  emphasize  that  research  on  the  safety  of  BPA  is 
a very active area. If FDA’s review leads us to a determination that 
the  use  of  BPA  is  not  safe,  we  will  not  hesitate  to  take  the  action 
needed. 

Bisphenol A is used in the manufacture of two types of polymers 
used  in  food  contact  articles.  Polycarbonate  plastics  are  used  in 
products such as water and infant bottles, while epoxy-based enam-
els  and  coatings  are  widely  used  in  inner  linings  of  food  and  bev-
erage  cans.  These  food  contact  substances  have  been  regulated  by 
FDA  for  many  years  and  are  enforced  by  sections  under  Title  21. 
Small  residual  amounts  of  trace  BPA  can  remain  in  polymers 
and may migrate into food during use of the product. For this rea-
son, FDA’s safety assessments include a consideration of likely con-
sumer exposure. We have determined that dietary exposure to BPA 
from these uses is in the very low parts per billion range. 

The task force is looking at all products that FDA regulates, not 
just the ones I have mentioned. We are already focusing on specific 
concerns raised by reports of the National Tox Program at NIH. 

In  November  2007,  NTP’s  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to 
Human  Reproduction  released  a  report  by  a  panel  of  experts.  The 
opinion  reached  by  the  experts  was  that  they  had  some  concerns 
for children regarding neural and behavioral effects. They also had 
minimal  concern  for  BPA  exposure  to  these  populations  for  the  ef-
fects  on  the  prostate  gland,  mammary  gland,  and  early  female  pu-
berty. 

NTP  subsequently  issued  a  draft  report,  and  they  iterated  the 
same thing relative to the behavior, but they also raised their con-
cern on the mammary gland and the early female puberty. 

These  included  new  data  which  we  are  all  continuing  to  review. 
And  these  lead  us  to  conclusions  that  the  currently  available  evi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

10 

dence  provides  little  evidence  that  there  are  issues,  but  it  also 
raises a number of uncertainties which the NTP brief identified. 

We  have  studied  the  reports  and  conclusions  of  NTP’s  expert 
panel and we are actually reviewing the draft. In fact, members of 
the  BPA  Task  Force  will  be  meeting  with  the  NTP  staff  this  week 
to  discuss  their  findings  and  get  a  better  understanding  of  how 
they came to their conclusions. 

Also,  I  should  tell  you,  Senator,  FDA’s  National  Center  for  Tox 
Research is discussing with the NTP staff yesterday and today both 
BPA and phthalates. 

Although  the  FDA  has  been  actively  surveying  data  on  BPA  for 
many  years,  this  form  of  assessment  began  in  early  2007.  We  ini-
tially  focused  on  the  low-dose  effects  and  have  concluded  that  the 
current exposure to adults and infants is safe. Although FDA’s reli-
ance  on  these  studies  have  been  questioned  because  they  were 
funded by industry, they were considered pivotal by FDA in our re-
view  of  the  data  for  a  number  of  reasons.  FDA’s  findings  thus  far 
are  underscored  by  the  conclusions  of  two  risk  assessments  by  the 
European  Food  Safety  Authority  and  the  Japanese  National  Insti-
tute of Advanced Industrial Science and Technology. 

Let  me  briefly  mention  phthalates,  which  are  also  a  concern  to 
this Subcommittee. FDA does not now have a comprehensive inven-
tory of products that contain phthalates. We do know it is a compo-
nent  of  the  compounds  used  in  certain  medical  products  and  that 
brings risk-benefit factors into play. FDA primarily through NCTR 
is  conducting  research  to  address  uncertainties  in  our  under-
standing  of  the  potential  health  risks  posed  by  exposure  to 
phthalates. 

In  conclusion,  let  me  re-emphasize  that  current  evidence  indi-
cates  that  BPA  exposure  from  food  contact  materials  is  well  below 
the  levels  that  may  cause  health  effects.  But  FDA’s  conclusions  on 
the safety of chemical compounds or the products in which they are 
found  are  never  set  in  stone.  They  are  always  subject  to  review  or 
revision  when  new  data  or  a  better  analysis  become  available.  At 
the end of the day, FDA’s goal is always to act within our authority 
and protect the public health. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  today,  and  I  will  be 

happy to answer any questions you may have. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Alderson follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NORRIS E.  ALDERSON,  PH.D.,  ASSOCIATE COMMISSIONER 
FOR SCIENCE,  FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION,  DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND 
HUMAN SERVICES 

Introduction 

Good morning, Chairman Pryor and Members of the Subcommittee. I am Dr. Nor-
ris Alderson, Associate Commissioner for Science at the U.S. Food and Drug Admin-
istration  (FDA  or  the  Agency),  part  of  the  Department  of  Health  and  Human  Serv-
ices (HHS). FDA appreciates the opportunity to discuss our ongoing work regarding 
the safety of bisphenol-A (BPA). 

In  light  of  recent  reports  and  statements  from  the  National  Toxicology  Program 
(NTP) at the National Institutes of Health and Health Canada, as well as interested 
public health advocates, FDA believes it is important that consumers have accurate 
and  up-to-date  information  about  BPA.  We  have  established  a  link  on  our  home 
page, at http://www.fda.gov, where consumers can find such information. 

On  April  17,  2008,  FDA  Commissioner  Andrew  von  Eschenbach  formed  an  agen-
cy-wide BPA Task Force, which I chair, to conduct a review, encompassing all FDA- 
regulated  product  lines,  of  the  concerns  raised  about  BPA.  The  task  force  is  under-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

11 

taking  a  broad  review  of  current  research  and  information  on  BPA.  In  addition  to 
looking at the food and beverage containers that have been the focus of recent con-
cerns  as  well  as  our  regulatory  efforts  over  the  years,  the  task  force  is  conducting 
an  inventory  of  all  products  regulated  by  FDA’s  food  and  medical  products  centers 
to  better  understand  other  potential  routes  of  exposure.  We  are  already  looking  at 
the  specific  concerns  raised  by  NTP  in  its  recent  Draft  Brief  and  the  draft  risk  as-
sessment released by Health Canada last month. 

At  this  time,  FDA  is  not  recommending  that  consumers  discontinue  using  food 
contact materials that contain BPA. Although our review of the NTP reports is con-
tinuing, a large body of available evidence indicates that food contact materials con-
taining BPA currently on the market are safe, and that exposure levels to BPA from 
these  materials,  including  exposure  to  infants  and  children,  are  below  those  that 
may  cause  health  effects.  We  also  acknowledge  that  BPA  research  is  an  extremely 
active  area,  and  we  want  to  assure  you  that  if  FDA’s  review  of  data  leads  us  to  a 
determination that uses of BPA are not safe, the Agency will take action to protect 
the public health. 
Regulation of Components of Food Contact Materials Containing BPA 

Section  409  of  the  Federal  Food,  Drug,  and  Cosmetic  Act  (FD&C  Act)  requires 
that chemicals undergo pre-market approval by FDA if they are reasonably expected 
to  migrate  to  food.  BPA  is  used  in  the  manufacture  of  two  types  of  polymers  used 
in food contact articles, specifically, polycarbonate polymers and epoxy-based enam-
els and coatings. These food contact substances have been regulated for many years 
pursuant  to  regulations  published  in  Title  21  of  the  Code  of  Federal  Regulations 
(CFR). Polycarbonate (PC) polymers, which are found in products such as water and 
infant  bottles,  are  regulated  in  21  CFR  § 177.1580.  Epoxy-based  enamels  and  coat-
ings, which are widely used as inner linings for food cans, are regulated in 21 CFR 
§ 175.300(b)(3)(viii),  21  CFR  § 177.1440  and  21  CFR  § 177.2280.  Because  no  poly-
meric  reactions  go  entirely  to  completion,  small  residual  amounts  of  BPA  can  re-
main in polymers and may migrate into food during use of the product. For this rea-
son,  FDA’s  safety  assessments  include  a  consideration  of  likely  consumer  exposure. 
The Agency has determined that dietary exposure to BPA from these uses is in the 
very  low  parts  per  billion  range,  which  is  well  below  the  levels  that  would  cause 
adverse  health  effects.  Further,  it  is  important  to  emphasize  that  as  new  data  and 
reviews of BPA have become available, FDA’s review of the safety of BPA has been 
an ongoing process. 
Evaluation of BPA Safety 

Although  FDA  has  been  actively  surveying  data  on  BPA  for  many  years,  the 
Agency  began  a  formal  reassessment  of  BPA  in  early  2007.  This  reassessment  ini-
tially  focused  on  possible  ‘‘low-dose’’  effects  for  BPA  but,  in  the  fall  of  2007,  we 
added  an  evaluation  of  the  endpoints  identified  by  an  expert  panel  of  the  NTP’s 
Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human  Reproduction  (CERHR)  after  the 
CERHR meeting in August 2007. 

In evaluating the safety of food contact articles or their constituents, such as BPA, 
FDA’s  safety  assessment  relies  on  evaluating  probable  consumer  exposure  as  a  re-
sult of the proposed use and other authorized uses, and ensuring that the probable 
consumer  exposures  are  supported  by  the  available  toxicological  information.  With 
regard  to  consumer  exposure,  FDA  found  that  the  small  amounts  of  BPA  that  mi-
grated  into  food  from  the  use  of  PC-based  polymers  and  BPA-based  epoxy  coatings 
result  in  a  cumulative  daily  intake  for  adults  of  11  micrograms  per  person  per  day 
(μg/person/day). 

This  estimate  is  based  on:  (1)  the  migration  levels  of  BPA  into  food,  or  into  food- 
simulating solvents, under the most severe conditions of use (i.e., time and tempera-
ture), and (2) information on the types of food contacted, the fraction of the diet that 
would  come  into  contact  with  that  type  of  food  contact  material,  and  whether  the 
finished  food  contact  article  would  be  intended  for  single  or  repeated  use.  FDA’s 
evaluation also considered that the use of can enamels in infant formula packaging 
and  the  use  of  PC  baby  bottles  results  in  an  estimated  daily  intake  of  7  μg/infant/ 
day. These estimates relied on data generated by FDA laboratories or the regulated 
industry,  or  available  in  the  open  literature,  on  BPA  levels  in  canned  food  and  in 
food contacting PC articles. 

In  conducting  this  evaluation,  FDA  was  aware  that  higher  migration  levels  had 
been  reported  in  some  studies  available  in  the  literature.  Many  of  those  studies 
were conducted under very unrealistic conditions, such as the use of aggressive sol-
vents  or  extremely  high  temperatures  that  are  not  reflective  of  how  the  products 
were  intended  to  be  used  by  consumers.  Those  studies  were  deemed  to  not  be  rep-
resentative  of  actual  use  conditions.  In  our  evaluation  of  consumer  exposure,  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

12 

used  exposure  assumptions  that  were  based  on  realistic,  but  still  conservative,  use 
scenarios for both adults and infants. 

FDA’s  reassessment  of  possible  ‘‘low-dose’’  effects  of  BPA  concluded  that  the  cur-
rent  level  of  exposure  to  adults  and  infants  is  safe  as  defined  in  21  CFR  § 170.3(i). 
This conclusion was based on our review of the most relevant data available at that 
time,  including  our  analyses,  completed  in  July  2007,  of  two  pivotal  multi- 
generational  oral  studies  performed  under  applicable  regulatory  guidelines.  The 
studies included the examination of reproductive and some developmental endpoints 
and  a  large  range  of  exposures,  including  low  doses.  These  studies  include  a  two- 
generation  reproductive  toxicity  test  in  mice  and  a  three-generation  reproductive 
toxicity test in rats. 

These  studies  were  considered  pivotal  in  our  review  of  the  existing  data  for  a 
number  of  reasons.  These  include:  (1)  they  were  conducted  in  a  manner  that  FDA 
would recommend to a stakeholder seeking an approval for a new use (i.e., they fol-
low recommended guidelines) including extended parameters allowing for the exam-
ination of issues that were controversial to BPA at the time; (2) they were submitted 
to  the  Agency  with  supporting  information  (raw  data)  allowing  for  our  independent 
evaluation  of  the  findings;  and  (3)  they  both  included  a  large  range  of  exposures, 
including  a  range  of  high  and  low  doses  which  allowed  for  the  examination  of  dose 
response  curves.  With  regard  to  FDA’s  evaluation  of  BPA,  these  studies  are  often 
given more weight than publications in the public literature that examine the same 
endpoints  because  the  publications  often  lack  details  and  supporting  data  that 
would be necessary for an independent evaluation of the underlying data by Agency 
scientists.  In  addition,  many  of  the  published  studies  on  BPA  have  numerous  pro-
tocol  limitations,  including  the  animal  model  utilized,  the  method  of  BPA  measure-
ment, the statistical analysis of the data, the lack of multiple/correctly spaced doses 
in the experimental protocol, and the route of administration. 

By  comparing  the  ‘‘no  observed  effect’’  level  (5  milligrams  per  kilogram  of  body 
weight  per  day)  derived  from  the  reproductive  and  developmental  endpoints  exam-
ined in these pivotal studies to the estimated daily intake of BPA, FDA determined 
that an adequate margin of exposure exists to reach a conclusion of ‘‘reasonable cer-
tainty  of  no  harm  under  the  intended  conditions  of  use,’’  the  standard  set  forth  in 
21 CFR § 170.3(i). That margin of exposure is approximately 7,000 fold for infants— 
that is, the levels of exposure to BPA at which any effects would be observed in in-
fants is about 7,000 times higher than our estimates of actual exposure. 

In  addition,  FDA  has  completed  a  summary  of  the  pharmacokinetic  data  on  BPA 
in multiple species. FDA has determined that understanding the species differences 
and the differences in how metabolic systems handle BPA administered via various 
routes of exposure, such as oral versus subcutaneous, are also pivotal to examining 
the safety of BPA. 

FDA’s  findings  thus  far  are  underscored  by  the  conclusions  of  two  risk  assess-
ments  for  BPA  from  2006,  conducted  by  the  European  Food  Safety  Authority’s  Sci-
entific Panel of Food Additives, Flavourings, Processing Aids and Materials in Con-
tact with Food, and the Japanese National Institute of Advanced Industrial Science 
and  Technology.  Each  of  these  documents  considered  the  possibility  of  a  low-dose 
effect  and  concluded  that  no  health  risk  exists  for  BPA  at  the  current  exposure 
level. Neither of these risk assessments disagrees with FDA’s current position of the 
safe use of BPA at the current exposure level. 
BPA Task Force Review 

FDA  has  carefully  studied  the  review  and  conclusions  of  the  expert  panel  con-
vened by CERHR, released on November 26, 2007. The CERHR expert panel found 
that,  based  on  current  BPA  exposure  levels,  ‘‘some  concern’’  exists  for  pregnant 
women  and  fetuses  and  infants  and  children  for  exposure  to  BPA  causing  neural 
and  behavioral  effects.  The  expert  panel  also  concluded  that  there  was  ‘‘minimal 
concern’’  for  BPA  exposure  in  these  populations  for  effects  in  the  prostate  gland, 
mammary gland, and an earlier age for puberty in females. 

The NTP Draft Brief released on April 14, 2008, reiterated the conclusions of the 
CERHR panel with regard to neural and behavioral effects. However, the NTP Draft 
Brief  departed  from  the  expert  panel  in  concluding  that  ‘‘some  concern’’  exists  for 
effects in the prostate gland, mammary gland, and an earlier age for puberty in fe-
males for BPA exposure to fetuses, infants and children. These analyses emphasized 
relatively  new  data  and  emerging  or  difficult-to-interpret  endpoints  in  toxicology 
and considered the fact that the studies currently available provide limited evidence 
and  contain  numerous  uncertainties.  It  is  noteworthy  that  the  increase  in  concern 
from ‘‘minimal’’ to ‘‘some’’ from the conclusion from CERHR’s expert panel to NTP’s 
Draft  Brief  reflects  numerous  studies  that  have  appeared  in  the  literature  only  in 
the  past  several  months.  Although  the  NTP  Draft  Brief  discusses  ‘‘some  concern’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

13 

for  developmental  exposure  and  mammary  and  prostate  gland  cancer,  it  also  high-
lights the uncertainties regarding these data and states that the evidence is not suf-
ficient to conclude that BPA is a rodent carcinogen for these endpoints or that BPA 
presents a cancer hazard to humans. 

Neural and behavior development effects were also the focus of a recent draft risk 
assessment released by Health Canada and Environment Canada on April 18, 2008. 
Both  the  NTP  Draft  Brief  and  the  Canadian  draft  risk  assessment  are  reviews  of 
existing and recently developed data. Both discuss animal studies on neural, behav-
ioral,  and  developmental  effects  and  both  assessments  point  out  that  these  studies 
provide only limited evidence for concern for human exposure to BPA. Finally, both 
suggest  that  more  research  is  needed  to  better  understand  their  implications  for 
human health. 

FDA  has  not  yet  completed  its  review  of  concerns  raised  by  the  CERHR  expert 
panel last fall or the NTP Draft Brief released last month. Therefore, those concerns 
are  under  active  consideration  by  FDA  and  the  BPA  Task  Force,  and  we  will  take 
appropriate action, if warranted, at the completion of our review. 
Conclusion 

Although the Agency’s review of the newly available reports is continuing, a large 
body  of  available  evidence  indicates  that  currently-marketed  food  contact  materials 
containing BPA are safe, and that exposure to BPA from food contact materials, in-
cluding  exposures  for  infants  and  children,  are  below  the  levels  that  may  cause 
health effects. 

We are actively reviewing the data on BPA and will continue to consider the rel-
evance of new data and studies as they appear. FDA’s work in assessing the safety 
of  these  products  is  never  truly  final,  and  if  our  continuing  review  of  all  available 
data leads us to a determination that the current levels of exposure to BPA are not 
safe, we will take appropriate action to protect the public health. Thank you for the 
opportunity to testify today, and I would be happy to answer any questions. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Dr. Wind? 

STATEMENT  OF  DR.  MARILYN  L.  WIND,  DEPUTY  ASSOCIATE 
EXECUTIVE  DIRECTOR  FOR  HEALTH  SCIENCES,  U.S. 
CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 
Dr.  WIND.  Good  morning,  Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the 
Subcommittee. My name is Dr. Marilyn Wind and I am the Deputy 
Associate  Executive  Director  for  Health  Sciences  at  the  U.S.  Con-
sumer  Product  Safety  Commission.  I  am  pleased  to  come  before 
this  Committee  today  to  testify  and  to  answer  your  questions  re-
garding phthalates and bisphenol A. 

Phthalates  are  chemicals  used  to  soften  PVC  and  make  it  flexi-

ble. PVC is found in a number of consumer products. 

CPSC’s regulatory authority over phthalates comes from the Fed-
eral  Hazardous  Substances  Act,  or  the  FHSA.  Under  the  FHSA, 
CPSC  must  consider  both  the  toxicity  of,  as  well  as  the  exposure 
to,  a  product  in  order  to  designate  it  a  hazardous  substance.  Chil-
dren’s  products  containing  a  hazardous  substance  are  automati-
cally banned by operation of law. 

Since  the  early  1980s,  the  CPSC  has  investigated,  researched, 
and  monitored  phthalates  used  in  consumer  products  under  the 
agency’s  jurisdiction.  In  the  early  1980s,  the  primary  phthalate 
used  in  children’s  products  was  di-(2-ethylhexyl)  phthalate,  or 
DEHP.  After  a  National  Toxicology  Program  bioassay  indicated 
that  DEHP  caused  cancer  in  rodents,  the  Toy  Manufacturers  of 
America  representing  their  member  companies  agreed  to  volun-
tarily cease using DEHP in toys intended to be mouthed, and sub-
sequently,  a  ban  of  DEHP  was  incorporated  into  the  ASTM  toy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

14 

standard.  DEHP  was  replaced  with  another  phthalate,  diisononyl 
phthalate, or DINP. 

Chronic studies on DINP were completed by the chemical indus-
try in 1997 and 1998. In 1998, CPSC staff completed a risk assess-
ment  on  DINP.  While  staff  concluded  that  few,  if  any,  children 
were at risk of liver or other organ toxicity from mouthing teethers, 
rattles, and other PVC toys that contain DINP, staff also indicated 
that there were a number of uncertainties. As a result of these un-
certainties,  a  voluntary  agreement  was  reached  with  industry  in 
December  1998  to  stop  the  use  of  DINP  in  teethers,  rattles,  and 
pacifiers. 

Additionally,  staff  at  that  time  recommended  that  the  commis-
sioners  convene  a  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel,  or  CHAP,  to 
evaluate  whether  there  are  chronic  hazards  associated  with  expo-
sure to DINP and what, if any, risk is posed. The staff further rec-
ommended:  one,  that  the  Commission  conduct  an  extensive  obser-
vation  study  of  children’s  mouthing  behavior  to  better  understand 
the  exposure  issues;  two,  to  develop  a  better  laboratory  method  to 
measure  the  migration  of  DINP  from  products;  and  three,  to  test 
additional  products  intended  for  children  under  3  years  of  age  for 
phthalates.  The  Commission  approved  all  of  these  staff  rec-
ommendations. 

A  CHAP  was  convened  and  issued  its  report  to  the  Commission 
on  June  15,  2001.  Staff  also  completed  all  the  studies  that  the 
Commission  had  approved  by  2002.  Taking  all  of  this  information 
together, CPSC staff estimated that the daily DINP exposure from 
toys  on  the  market  at  that  time  for  children  up  to  3  years  of  age 
would  not  pose  a  health  risk.  Based  upon  this  analysis,  the  Com-
mission voted 3 to 0 on February 21, 2003 to deny a petition which 
requested  the  ban  of  PVC  in  all  toys  and  other  products  intended 
for children 5 years of age and under. 

I would like to note that the legislation currently under consider-
ation  by  Congress  would  ban  certain  phthalates  down  to  0.1  per-
cent.  Because  phthalates  are  ubiquitous,  the  level  of  0.1  percent 
would  be  a  contamination  or  background  level  and  not  the  result 
of phthalates being intentionally added to the product. When CPSC 
staff  tested  toys,  we  found  that  phthalates  were  present  in  the 
range  of  13  to  39  percent.  That  is  what  is  needed  to  make  toys 
flexible.  For  toys  containing  multiple  phthalates,  it  could  be  ex-
tremely difficult to measure down to the level of less than 0.1 per-
cent. 

With  regard  to  bisphenol  A,  or  BPA,  this  is  a  chemical  used  in 
the  manufacture  of  polycarbonate  plastics  and  epoxy  resins.  The 
greatest  potential  for  human  exposure  to  BPA  is  from  contact 
items.  The  recent  in-depth  peer  review  conducted  by  the  National 
Toxicology  Program  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human 
Reproduction  stated  that  diet  accounts  for  the  vast  majority,  99 
percent,  of  human  exposure.  If  BPA  migrates  out  of  a  food  contact 
surface  into  food,  it  is  considered  an  indirect  food  additive  and 
would  be  under  the  jurisdiction  of  the  Food  and  Drug  Administra-
tion. 

Polycarbonate  used  in  pacifier  shields,  helmets,  protective  gear 
such  as  goggles  and  chin  guards,  as  well  as  other  products,  would 
fall under CPSC’s jurisdiction. Polycarbonate is used in these prod-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

15 

ucts  because  it  is  very  hard,  unbreakable,  and  a  sturdy  plastic. 
There  would  be  no  exposure  expected  from  helmets,  goggles,  other 
protective  gear,  compact  disks,  or  electronics.  The  use  of 
polycarbonate  in  pacifier  shields  prevents  the  shield  from  shat-
tering  when  a  child  falls.  Polycarbonates  used  in  protective  gear 
prevents  head,  eye,  and  bodily 
injury.  Beneficial  uses  of 
polycarbonates  such  as  these  should  be  considered  when  acting  to 
ban bisphenol A from children’s products. 

I  am  pleased  to  have  the  opportunity  to  testify  today  and  wel-

come your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Dr. Wind follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DR. MARILYN L. WIND, DEPUTY ASSOCIATE EXECUTIVE 
DIRECTOR FOR HEALTH SCIENCES, U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 
Good Morning, Mr. Chairman: 
My name is Dr. Marilyn Wind, and I am the Deputy Associate Executive Director 
for Health Sciences at the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC). I am 
pleased to come before the Committee today to testify and to answer your questions 
regarding phthalates and bisphenol A. 

Phthalates  are  chemicals  used  to  soften  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC)  and  make  it 
flexible. PVC is found in a number of consumer products. CPSC’s regulatory author-
ity over phthalates comes from the Federal Hazardous Substances Act (FHSA), and 
since  the  early  1980s,  the  CPSC  has  investigated,  researched,  and  monitored 
phthalates used in consumer products under the agency’s jurisdiction. 

In  regulating  a  product  under  the  FHSA,  the  CPSC  must  consider  not  only  the 
toxicity  of  the  product  under  consideration  but  also  the  exposure  to  that  product 
under  reasonably  foreseeable  handling  and  use.  If  such  a  product  may  cause  sub-
stantial personal injury or substantial illness during or as a proximate result of any 
customary or reasonably foreseeable use by children and is a toy or other article for 
use by children, it would be considered a hazardous substance and is automatically 
banned by operation of law. 

In  the  early  1980s  the  primary  phthalate  used  in  children’s  products  was  di-(2- 
ethylhexyl)  phthalate  or  DEHP.  A  National  Toxicology  Program  2-year  bioassay  in-
dicated  that  DEHP  caused  cancer  in  rodents.  Because  of  concern  about  these  re-
sults, the industry removed DEHP from pacifiers, rattles, and teethers. A ban of the 
use  of  DEHP  in  pacifiers,  rattles  and  teethers  was  subsequently  incorporated  into 
ASTM F–963, the voluntary Standard Consumer Safety Specification on Toy Safety. 
DEHP was replaced with another phthalate, diisononyl phthalate or DINP. 

Chronic  toxicity  studies  on  DINP  were  completed  by  the  chemical  industry  in 
1997  and  1998.  In  1998  CPSC  staff  completed  a  risk  assessment  on  DINP.  While 
staff concluded that few, if any, children were at risk of liver or other organ toxicity 
from  mouthing  teethers,  rattles,  and  other  PVC  toys  that  contain  DINP,  staff  also 
indicated  that  there  were  a  number  of  uncertainties,  primarily  regarding  exposure. 
As a result of these uncertainties, a voluntary agreement was reached with industry 
in December 1998 to stop the use of DINP in teethers, rattles, and pacifiers. 

Additionally,  CPSC  staff  at  that  time  recommended  that  the  Commissioners  con-
vene a Chronic Hazard Advisory Panel (CHAP) to evaluate whether there are chron-
ic  hazards  associated  with  exposure  to  DINP  and  what,  if  any,  risk  is  posed.1 The 
staff  further  recommended:  (1)  that  the  Commission  conduct  an  extensive  observa-
tion study of children’s mouthing behavior to better understand the exposure issues; 
(2)  develop  a  better  laboratory  method  to  measure  the  migration  of  DINP;  and  (3) 
test  additional  products  intended  for  children  under  3  years  of  age  to  determine  if 
they  contain  phthalates.  The  Commission  approved  all  of  these  staff  recommenda-
tions. 

In  its  report  to  the  Commission  on  June  15,  2001,  the  CHAP  concluded  that  for 
DINP  to  pose  a  risk  of  injury  to  young  children,  they  must  routinely  mouth  DINP- 
plasticized  toys  for  75  minutes  per  day  or  more.  For  the  majority  of  children,  they 
concluded  that  exposure  to  DINP  from  DINP-containing  toys  would  be  expected  to 

1 A  CHAP  is  an  independent  panel  of  seven  scientists  chosen  by  the  Commission  from  sci-
entists recommended by the National Academy of Sciences. A CHAP is required under the Con-
sumer Safety Act before the Commission may regulate a chronic hazard. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

16 

pose  a  minimal  to  non-existent  risk  of  injury  and,  at  the  levels  to  which  children 
were exposed, there was no carcinogenic, reproductive or developmental risks. 

CPSC’s behavioral observation study took place in 2000 and 2001. It was not com-
pleted  in  time  for  the  CHAP  to  utilize  the  results  when  reaching  their  conclusions. 
In  the  behavioral  observation  study,  trained  observers  monitored  the  behavior  of 
169  children  between  the  ages  of  3  and  36  months.  The  study  found  that  the  daily 
mouthing  times  of  toys  and  teethers  were  much  lower  than  expected.  Based  upon 
this  observation  study,  staff  concluded  that  it  is  very  unlikely  that  children  will 
mouth soft plastic toys for the 75 minutes a day that the CHAP identified as a min-
imum level of concern. 

In  a  separate  study,  CPSC  staff  measured  the  level  of  migration  of  DINP  from 
41  children’s  products  purchased  from  retail  stores.  The  scientific  experiments  con-
ducted  in  this  study  measured  the  amount  of  DINP  that  would  leach  from  a  rep-
resentative  sample  of  toys  when  children  placed  them  in  their  mouths.  Taking  all 
of this information together, the CPSC staff estimated that the daily DINP exposure 
from  toys  on  the  market  at  that  time  for  children  up  to  3  years  of  age  would  not 
pose a health risk. 

In  November  1998,  a  group  of  organizations  petitioned  the  Commission  to  ban 
children’s  products  made  from  PVC.  Based  upon  the  extensive  scientific  and  tech-
nical  investigations  described  above,  staff  concluded  in  its  briefing  package  to  the 
Commissioners  that  there  is  no  demonstrated  health  risk  posed  by  PVC  toys  or 
other products intended for children 5 years of age and under, and thus, no justifica-
tion for banning PVC use in toys and other products for children 5 years of age and 
under. On February 21, 2003, the Commission voted 3–0 to deny the request to ban 
PVC  in  all  toys  and  other  products  intended  for  children  5  years  of  age  and  under. 
A  copy  of  the  petition  denial  letter,  Record  of  Commission  Action,  and  Commis-
sioners’ statements are attached, 

I would like to note that the legislation currently under consideration by Congress 
would  ban  certain  phthalates  down  to  0.1  percent.  Because  phthalates  are  ubiq-
uitous,  the  level  of  0.1  percent  would  be  a  contamination  level  and  not  the  result 
of  phthalate  being  intentionally  added  to  the  product.  When  we  tested  toys,  we 
found  that  phthalates  were  present  in  the  range  of  13  to  39  percent;  that  is  what 
is needed to make toys flexible. For toys containing multiple phthalates, it could be 
extremely difficult to measure down to the level of less than 0.1 percent. 

With  regard  to  bisphenol  A,  or  BPA,  this  is  a  chemical  used  in  the  manufacture 
of  polycarbonate  plastics  and  epoxy  resins.  Small  amounts  of  BPA  may  be  released 
as  the  plastic  or  resin  breaks  down.  Examples  of  consumer  products  using 
polycarbonate  plastics  include  eyeglass  lenses,  protective  eyewear,  protective  gear 
such  as  helmets  and  shin  guards,  glazing,  electronics,  compact  disks  and  labware. 
Epoxy resins are used in paints, coatings, adhesives, and as linings for canned foods. 
Polycarbonate  used  in  pacifier  shields,  helmets,  protective  gear  such  as  goggles 
and  shin  guards,  as  well  as  other  products,  would  fall  under  CPSC’s  jurisdiction. 
However,  since  polycarbonates  are  expensive,  it  is  our  understanding  that 
polycarbonate  is  used  in  only  those  consumer  products  where  there  is  a  need  for  a 
very  hard,  unbreakable,  sturdy  plastic.  Polycarbonate  is  used  in  pacifier  shields 
(that prevent the nipple from being swallowed) so that when a child falls, the shield 
does  not  shatter,  breaking  into  small  parts  and  injuring  the  child.  There  would  be 
no  exposure  expected  from  helmets,  goggles,  other  protective  gear,  compact  disks, 
or  electronics.  If  there  is  no  exposure,  there  is  no  health  risk.  Polycarbonate  plays 
a  very  important  role  in  its  use  in  helmets  and  other  protective  gear.  The  helmets 
prevent  children  from  receiving  serious  head  injuries  while  engaging  in  many 
sports. This beneficial use of polycarbonate should be considered when acting to ban 
bisphenol  A  from  children’s  products.  Such  a  ban  could  result  in  less  effective  pro-
tection of children from head, eye, or bodily injury. 

The greatest potential for human exposure to BPA is from food contact items. The 
recent  in-depth  peer  review  conducted  by  the  National  Toxicology  Program  (NTP) 
Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human  Reproduction  (CERHR)  stated  that 
diet accounts for the vast majority, 99 percent, of human exposure. If BPA migrates 
out of a food contact surface into food, it is considered an unintentional food additive 
and  would  be  under  the  jurisdiction  of  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA). 
I  am  pleased  to  have  the  opportunity  to  testify  with  Dr.  Alderson  from  FDA  today, 
and I welcome your questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

17 

U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 

Washington, DC 

Record of Commission Action 
Commissioners Voting by Ballot* 
Commissioners Voting: 
Chairman HAL STRATTON 
Commissioner THOMAS H. MOORE 
Commissioner MARY SHEILA GALL 
Item: 

Petition  (HP  99–1)  Requesting  Ban  of  Use  of  PVC  in  Products  Intended  for  Chil-

dren Five Years of Age and Under 
Decision: 

The  Commission  voted  unanimously  (3–0)  to  deny  petition  HP  99–1  and  issue  a 
denial  letter  as  drafted  (copy  attached).  The  petition  requests  a  ban  of  polyvinyl 
chloride  (PVC)  in  all  toys  and  other  products  intended  for  children  5  years  of  age 
and  under  and  requests  that  the  Commission  issue  a  national  advisory  warning  of 
health risks associated with soft plastic vinyl toys. 

Commissioners  Gall  and  Moore  each  submitted  statements  to  accompany  their 
votes.  The  petition  denial  letter  and  the  Commissioners’  statements  are  attached. 

For the Commission: 

TODD A. STEVENSON, 

Secretary. 

*Ballot vote due February 20, 2003. 

U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 

Washington, DC, February 26, 2003 

Mr. JEFFREY BECKER WISE, 
Policy Director, 
National Environmental Trust, 
Washington, DC. 

RE:  PETITION REQUESTING BAN OF USE OF POLYVINYL CHLORIDE (PVC)  IN PROD-
UCTS INTENDED FOR CHILDREN FIVE YEARS OF AGE AND UNDER (briefing  package 
date corrected as noted in italic) 
Dear Mr. Wise: 

As  requested  in  your  letter  of  November  19,  1998  I  am  communicating  through 
you to advise the petitioners that on February 21, 2003, the Consumer Product Safe-
ty  Commission  voted  3–0  to  deny  the  requests  from  the  National  Environmental 
Trust and eleven other organizations that the Commission: 

• immediately  ban  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC)  in  all  toys  and  other  products  in-

tended for children 5 years of age and under; and 

• issue a national advisory on the health risks that have been associated with soft 
plastic  vinyl  toys  to  inform  parents  and  consumers  about  the  risks  associated 
with PVC toys currently in stores and homes. 

The submission from the petitioners gave as the primary reason for these requests 
the  toxicity  of  diisononyl  phthalate  (DINP),  a  plasticizer  in  PVC,  and  the  toxicity 
of lead and cadmium in PVC. 

The  requested  ban  on  PVC  in  all  toys  and  other  products  intended  for  children 
5  years  of  age  and  under  was  docketed  as  a  petition  for  rulemaking  under  section 
3(j) of the Federal Hazardous Substances Act (FHSA) on December 7, 1998 (Petition 
No.  HP  99–01).  15  U.S.C.  § 1262(j).  The  request  that  the  Commission  issue  a  na-
tional advisory on the health risks that have been associated with soft plastic vinyl 
toys was not docketed because it would not require rulemaking to implement. 

To  take  the  requested  regulatory  action,  the  Commission  would  have  to  declare 
under  the  FHSA  that  products  containing  PVC  intended  for  use  by  children  of  5 
years  old  and  younger  were  ‘‘hazardous  substances.’’  This  would  require  the  Com-
mission to find that such PVC products met the FHSA’s definition of hazardous sub-
stance,  which  requires  in  this  instance  not  only  that  the  product  be  toxic,  but  that 
it ‘‘may cause substantial personal injury or substantial illness during or as a proxi-
mate  result  of  any  customary  or  reasonably  foreseeable  handling  or  use,  including 
reasonably foreseeable ingestion by children.’’ 15 U.S.C. § 1261(f)(1)(A). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

18 

In  making  a  decision  whether  to  grant  a  petition  and  commence  rulemaking,  the 

Commission is to consider, inter alia, the following factors: 

• Whether the product involved presents an unreasonable risk of injury. 
• Whether a rule is reasonably necessary to eliminate or reduce the risk of injury. 
• Whether  failure  of  the  Commission  to  initiate  the  rulemaking  proceeding  re-
quested  would  unreasonably  expose  the  petitioner  or  other  consumers  to  the 
risk of injury which the petitioner alleges is presented by the product. 

16 CFR § 1051.9 

The ban rulemaking would be conducted under section 3(a) of the FHSA.1 Section 
3(a)(2)  of  the  FHSA  requires  that  a  rulemaking  such  as  the  one  requested  be  con-
ducted  in  accordance  with  section  701(e)  of  the  Federal  Food,  Drug,  and  Cosmetic 
Act  (FDCA).2 Under  section  701(e),  for  the  Commission  to  proceed  to  rulemaking, 
the  petition  must  set  forth  ‘‘reasonable  grounds’’  for  the  requested  action.  The 
United  States  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  District  of  Columbia  Circuit  has  held  that 
‘‘reasonable  grounds’’  for  a  petition  under  the  FHSA  ‘‘are  grounds  from  which  it  is 
reasonable, to conclude that the Commission would be able to make the findings re-
quired  to  issue  the  requested  rule  and  to  support  those  findings  with  substantial 
evidence on the record.’’ 3 

The Commission considered the petition and the materials submitted with it; the 
June  15,  2001  final  report  of  the  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel  (CHAP)  on  DINP 
convened  in  accordance  with  sections  28  and  31  of  the  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Act,  15  U.S.C.  §§ 2077,  2080;  a  CPSC  staff  behavioral  observation  study  to  deter-
mine how much time young children actually spend mouthing objects and the types 
of  objects  they  mouth;  the  November  1997  Commission  staff  report  entitled,  CPSC 
Staff  Report  on  Lead  and  Cadmium  in  Children’s  Polyvinyl  Chloride  (PVC)  Prod-
ucts;  the  488  public  comments  received  on  the  petition;  the  staff  briefing  package 
dated  August  13,  2002;  information  presented  by  the  staff  during  an  oral  briefing 
on  November  8,  2002;  comments  received  on  the  staff  briefing  package;  and  other 
information. 

The  staff  briefing  package  recounts  the  extensive  scientific  and  technical  inves-
tigations  that  have  been  carried  out  by  the  CPSC  and  others  on  the  issue  of  PVC 
in products intended for children and concludes as follows. 

Based  upon  the  scientific  data  presented  in  this  briefing  package,  the  staff  be-
lieves  that  there  is  no  demonstrated  health  risk  posed  by  PVC  toys  or  other 
products  intended  for  children  5  years  of  age  and  under  and  thus,  no  justifica-
tion  for  either  banning  PVC  use  in  toys  and  other  products  intended  for  chil-
dren  5  years  of  age  and  under  or  for  issuing  a  national  advisory  on  the  health 
risks associated with soft plastic toys. 

Memorandum  from  Marilyn  L.  Wind,  Ph.D.,  Deputy  Associate  Executive  Director, 
Directorate  for  Health  Sciences,  to  the  Commission,  Response  to  Petition  HP  99–1, 
August 13, 2002, at 16–17. 

That conclusion is based in part on the finding of the DINP CHAP that, ‘‘[f]or the 
majority of children, the exposure to DINP from DINP-containing toys would be ex-
pected  to  pose  a  minimal  to  non-existent  risk  of  injury.’’  Report  to  the  U.S.  Con-
sumer  Product  Safety  Commission  by  the  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel  on 
Diisononyl  Phthalate  (DINP),  June  2001,  Executive  Summary  item  17.  The  new 
data from the recent CPSC behavioral observation study reported in the staff brief-
ing  package,  which  was  not  available  at  the  time  of  the  CHAP’s  deliberations,  con-
firm  this  conclusion  and  demonstrate  that  children  are  exposed  to  DINP  at  even 
lower  levels  than  the  CHAP  assumed  when  they  reached  their  conclusion.  Further, 
the  recent  survey  of  toys  mouthed  by  children  under  the  age  of  three  also  reported 
in  the  staff  briefing  package  shows  that  not  all  soft  plastic  toys  contain  DINP. 
Therefore,  exposure  would  be  even  less  than  the  CHAP  predicted  because  children 
mouth  these  toys  for  less  time  per  day  than  the  CHAP  estimated,  and  the  average 
amount  of  DINP  in  toys  mouthed  by  children  under  the  age  of  three  is  less  than 
the  CHAP  estimated.  If  the  risk  to  children  under  the  age  of  three  is  not  sufficient 
to warrant action, then based upon the data collected in the staff’s behavioral obser-
vation  study,  and  the  data  available  in  published  literature,  which  indicate  that 
mouthing declines as children age, there is no basis for the findings necessary under 
the  CPSC  regulations  governing  grant  or  denial  of  petitions  or  the  FHSA  for  the 

1 15 U.S.C. § 1262(a). 
2 21 U.S.C. § 371(e). 
3 Consumer Federation of America v. CPSC, 883 F.2d 1073, 1076 (D.C. Cir. 1989). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

19 

Commission  to  take  the  requested  actions  with  respect  to  DINP  in  PVC  toys  and 
other products intended for children 5 years of age and under. 

With  respect  to  lead  and  cadmium,  in  November  1997,  the  Commission  staff 
issued  a  report  entitled,  CPSC  Staff  Report  on  Lead  and  Cadmium  in  Children’s 
Polyvinyl  Chloride  (PVC)  Products.  That  report  detailed  the  results  of  testing  the 
Commission staff conducted on children’s products that Greenpeace had alleged con-
tained  hazardous  levels  of  lead  and  cadmium.  Although  some  of  the  vinyl  products 
identified by Greenpeace and tested by CPSC staff contained lead or cadmium, fur-
ther  testing  and  evaluation  revealed  that  hazardous  amounts  of  lead  or  cadmium 
were not released from the products. This means that children would not be exposed 
to hazardous levels. The report concluded that children would not be exposed to haz-
ardous  levels  of  lead  or  cadmium  when  the  products  are  handled  or  used  in  a  rea-
sonably foreseeable manner. Thus, there is no basis for the findings necessary under 
the  CPSC  regulations  governing  grant  or  denial  of  petitions  or  the  FHSA  for  the 
Commission  to  take  the  requested  actions  with  respect  to  lead  or  cadmium  in  PVC 
toys and other products intended for children 5 years of age and under. 

In  sum,  as  a  result  of  consideration  of  the  extensive  research  and  analysis  sum-
marized  herein,  the  Commission  has  denied  the  petition  and  declined  to  issue  the 
requested national health advisory. 

Sincerely yours, 

Copy to: 

NANCY CHUDA 
Director 
Children’s Health Environmental 

Coalition 

MARY ELLEN FISE 
General Counsel 
Consumer Federation of America 
RICK HIND 
Legislative Director 
Toxics Campaign 
Greenpeace USA 
JUSTINE MALONEY 
Washington Representative 
Learning Disabilities Association 
SHEILA MCCARRON 
Program Director 
National Council of Catholic Women 
SAMMIE MOSHENBERG 
Director (Washington Office) 
National Council of Jewish Women 

TODD A. STEVENSON, 

Secretary. 

PHILIP CLAPP 
President 
National Environmental Trust 
ROBERT K. MUSIL, Ph.D. 
Executive Director 
Physicians for Social Responsibility 
JAYDEE HANSON 
Assistant General Secretary 
United Methodist Church—General 

Board of Church and Society 

PAMELA SPAR 
Executive Secretary 
United Methodist Church—Women’s 

Division 

GENE KARPINSKI 
Executive Director 
U.S. Public Interest Research Group 
ED HOPKINS 
Vice President 
Environmental Working Group 

U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 

Washington, DC, February 20, 2003 

Statement  of  the  Honorable  Mary  Sheila  Gall  on  Vote  to  Deny  Petition  Requesting 
a  Ban  of  Polyvinyl  Chloride  in  Toys  and  Products  Intended  for  Children  Five 
and Under 

Today I voted to deny a petition submitted by a group of organizations that asked 
the  Commission  to  ban  Polyvinyl  Chloride  (PVC)  in  all  toys  and  other  products  in-
tended  for  children  aged  5  years  and  under.  The  Commission  staff  gave  extensive 
consideration  to  the  allegations  of  the  petition  and  thoroughly  examined  all  of  the 
health effects alleged to be caused by children’s mouthing of products made of PVC. 
The  staff  paid  particular  attention  to  products  that  used  diisonyl  phthlate  (DINP) 
as  a  plasticizer.  This  thorough  examination  revealed  that  there  is  no  risk  posed  by 
PVC that rises even remotely to that specified by the Federal Hazardous Substances 
Act  (FHSA),  the  statute  under  which  the  Commission  regulates  this  type  of  risk. 
Accordingly, the petition must be denied. 

The Commission and its staff gave careful attention to the allegations of the peti-
tion,  as  they  properly  should  when  claims  of  detrimental  health  effects  to  children 
are made. A previous Commission staff risk assessment concluded that the lead and 
cadmium  in  PVC  products  posed  no  risk  of  injury  to  children  and  the  petitioners 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

20 

submitted no evidence that called into question the results of that risk assessment. 
Assessing  the  risk  posed  by  DINP  in  PVC  involved  work  beyond  that  contained  in 
the earlier risk assessment. The Commission went to great lengths to assess all the 
risks that might be posed by DINP. The staff used a method validated by two inter-
national  interlaboratory  studies  of  measuring  the  quantity  of  DINP  that  migrates 
from  PVC  products.  The  staff  then  used  that  method  to  estimate  the  amount  of 
DINP  that  actually  entered  a  child’s  body  when  a  PVC  product  was  mouthed.  The 
Commission  then  convened  a  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel  (CHAP),  which  re-
viewed  extensive  toxicological  data  about  DINP.  The  CHAP  concluded  that  for  the 
vast majority of children the exposure to DINP from PVC-containing products posed 
a  minimal  to  non-existent  risk  of  injury.  Data  from  a  subsequent  Commission  staff 
study  of  exposure  times  of  children  mouthing  products  revealed  that  children  were 
exposed to even less DINP than the CHAP had assumed in making its finding. The 
chance  that  children  are  being  injured  from  mouthing  products  made  from  PVC  is 
de  minimus.  There  is  simply  nothing  in  the  record  that  remotely  justifies  any  find-
ing that PVC products intended for children constitute a hazardous substance with-
in the meaning of the FHSA. 

While  the  Commission  has  no  legal  authority  to  ban  PVC  products  intended  for 
use  by  children,  there  is  toxicity  data  showing  that  it  is  a  carcinogen  in  rodents, 
although  it  is  a  type  of  cancer  not  usually  associated  with  humans.  As  least  par-
tially in response to these toxicity findings, in 1998 the toy industry and large retail 
chain  stores  in  the  U.S.  voluntarily  agreed  not  to  sell  items  made  out  of  PVC  de-
signed to be placed in the mouth (e.g., teethers, rattles and pacifiers). The European 
Union  and  Japan  reached  a  similar  result  through  their  own  regulatory  processes. 
Chronic hazards are among the most technically difficult product-safety problems 
that  the  Commission  considers.  Unlike  acute  hazards,  where  the  effects  occur  very 
quickly  and  are  easily  observable,  chronic  hazards  involve  health  effects  that  may 
occur many years after exposure and which may be difficult to trace to exposure to 
any  particular  substance.  Considerable  scientific  expertise  must  be  brought  to  bear 
on any allegations of chronic hazards and the result must always reflect a judgment 
call.’  This  may  be  subject  to  revision  if  more  is  learned  about  the  toxicity  or  expo-
sure  of  a  specific  substance.  In  the  case  of  PVC,  however,  consumers  may  have  a 
high level of assurance that soft plastic products pose no risk to children. 

U.S. CONSUMER PRODUCT SAFETY COMMISSION 

Washington, DC, February 21, 2003 

Statement of the Honorable Thomas H. Moore on the Petition to Ban Polyvinyl Chlo-

ride in Products Intended for Children Five Years of Age and Under 

I  am  voting  to  deny  the  petition  to  ban  polyvinyl  chloride  in  products  intended 
for  children  5  years  of  age  and  under.  The  clear  weight  of  the  evidence  produced 
by  staff  supports  the  conclusion  that  children  are  not  at  risk  from  mouthing  prod-
ucts  currently  on  the  market  that  contain  diisononyl  phthalate  (DINP).  This  evi-
dence  consists  of  new  exposure  studies  showing  how  long  children  mouth  various 
objects,  the  migration  rates  of  phthalates  from  products  on  the  market,  an  Accept-
able  Daily  Intake  that  has  an  extremely  large  uncertainty/adjustment  factor  and  a 
scientific  consensus  that  DINP  is  nongenotoxic  and  that  the  cancer  caused  by 
peroxisomal proliferation by DINP in the liver of rodents is not relevant to humans. 
As these are the best and most current scientific opinions, I believe the Commission 
must  bow  to  that  judgment.  Our  staff  has  done  extraordinary  work  on  this  peti-
tion—by  far  the  most  comprehensive  work  done  to  date  anywhere  in  the  world.  I 
congratulate  them  on  their  achievement.  Both  their  work,  and  the  work  of  the  sci-
entists  who  participated  in  the  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel  on  DINP,  should 
calm parents’ fears about the potential harm to young children from children’s prod-
ucts currently on the market that contain DINP. 

I am concerned, however, that the staffs conclusions could be the basis for indus-
try to use phthalates in products that they have voluntarily agreed not to use them 
in,  namely  rattles,  teethers  and  pacifiers.  One  area  in  which  we  do  not  have  con-
crete information is the migration rate of DINP from these three types of children’s 
products.  Our  assumption  about  the  migration  rate  of  phthalates  from  these  prod-
ucts could prove to be too low. We also are not completely sure how much phthalates 
very  young  children  are  exposed  to  from  other  sources  in  their  environment.  This 
background  exposure,  coupled  with  the  uncertainty  of  the  rate  of  migration,  made 
me consider voting to defer action on the petition until we see what happens in the 
marketplace  as  a  result  of  the  staffs  conclusions.  If  phthalates  were  to  be  used  in 
teethers,  rattles  or  pacifiers  in  the  future,  the  uncertainties  mentioned  above  could 
cause  us  to  be  petitioned  again  in  this  area.  I  decided  that  I  would  not  vote  based 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

21 

on  speculation  of  what  might  happen.  All  I  can  vote  on  today  is  the  current  state 
of the marketplace and of scientific knowledge, both of which lead to the conclusion 
that  the  ingestion  of  DINP  by  young  children  from  the  children’s  products  on  the 
market poses no risk of harm to America’s children. 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Dr. Alderson, let me start with you, if I may. Is it your view that 

the FDA should do more testing at this point? 

Dr. ALDERSON. Senator, the meeting that I referred to yesterday 
at NCTR was between staff of FDA as well as staff of the National 
Tox Program. FDA and particularly NCTR is what I call a partner 
in  the  NTP  program,  as  we  are  one  of  the  participating  agencies 
which the NTP program serves in terms of the products we identify 
we need more information on. 

So  the  meeting  ends  today  at  noon,  but  I  can  tell  you  on  the 
agenda  the  first  thing  yesterday  morning  was  BPA.  That  was  the 
first agenda item. They reviewed a number of proposed studies that 
will  be  considered,  particularly  in  the  pharmacokinetic  studies  to 
look  at  these  low-dose  issues  that  you  referred  to  earlier  in  your 
statement.  There  were  other  things  considered  that  need  more  re-
view. 

But  the  short  answer  to  your  question  is,  yes,  we  will  be  doing 
additional  research  on  BPA  directed  by  the  things  that  have  been 
identified as uncertainties in the NTP draft report. 

Senator PRYOR. Now, for clarification, let me just make sure that 
we understand your testimony, and that is, you said at the present 
time,  there  is  no  reason  to  stop  using  BPA  because  I  guess  the 
risks are either not present or they are acceptable. 

What  about  on  phthalates?  Have  you  come  to  a  decision  on 

phthalates? 

Dr. ALDERSON. Phthalates is a little different. The Center for the 
Evaluation of Risks to Human Reproduction in early 2000 also did 
a  similar  type  of  report  on  phthalates  that  we  now  have  before  us 
on  BPA.  In  that  review,  the  CERHR  also  agreed  with  FDA’s  cur-
rent position, that other than in infant males, we do not have that 
much  concern,  but  at  NCTR  today  ongoing  there  is  a  non-human 
primate  study  looking  at  this  issue.  So  we  are  addressing  the 
issues that we know about either currently or they are planned. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Please  explain  to  the  Subcommittee  in  layman’s 
terms  the  low-dose  issue.  I  have  heard  it  called  the  low-dose  hy-
pothesis. Could you explain what we mean by that, and is that con-
troversial? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Well,  let  me  start  with  the  high  dose  first.  The 
studies  that  are  referred  to  in  the  NTP  report  referencing  to  high 
doses—in  fact,  I  think  the  NTP  brief  says  there  are  no  controver-
sies  associated  with  the  high  doses.  Everyone  agrees  there  are  ef-
fects there that we need to be concerned about. 

But  when  you  come  to  the  low  doses,  the  endpoints  that  are 
being  considered  in  terms  of  effects,  there  is  not  agreement  be-
tween  scientists.  We  have  a  number  of  reviews.  If  you  look  at 
those,  there  are  disagreements  between  those  reviews  on  whether 
there  are  effects  or  there  are  not  effects.  We  believe  that  at  this 
time  the  recent  two  studies  that  are  referred  to  as  the  industry- 
supported  studies  are  the  best  regulatory  approaches  in  terms  of 
data to address the low doses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

22 

Now,  having  said  that,  we  do  not  consider  those  to  be  the  final 
answer.  That  is  because,  I  think,  we  agree  that  there  are  some 
issues  still  remaining  there  in  terms  of  the  effects.  There  are  un-
certainties regarding these low-dose effects; i.e., the studies need to 
be  conducted  to  address  those  particular  endpoints.  They  need  to 
be  designed  such  that  you  would  have  enough  power  to  reach  con-
clusions. We do not see that in a lot of studies other than these two 
multi-generation  studies,  the  most  recent  studies  that  have  been 
referred to. 

So there are uncertainties. It is not definitive. The science associ-
ated  with  how  do  you  address  those  particular  endpoints—there  is 
not  agreement  among  the  toxicological  community  on  how  to  do 
that. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Great.  I  was  planning  on  doing  one  round,  but 

I may reserve the balance of my time for follow-ups. 

Senator Sununu? 
Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much. 
You  mentioned  two  major  intergenerational  studies.  How  many 
studies have been done in total that you look at to draw the conclu-
sion that you made that BPA is safe? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Senator,  we  have  looked  at  all  the  studies  in  the 

literature, and there are hundreds. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  It  numbers  in  the  hundreds.  I  just  wanted  to 

get a rough idea of whether we are talking about—— 

Dr. ALDERSON. Many hundreds. 
Senator  SUNUNU.—a  dozen  or  a  couple  of  dozen,  but  certainly 

more than—— 

Dr. ALDERSON. Keep in mind this is a material that has been on 
the  market  or  been  used  for  now  probably  at  least  25  years.  So 
there is a wealth of information out there. 

Senator SUNUNU. —understood. 
And  approximately  how  many  of  those  or  what  portion  of  those 
studies  look  not  just  at  health  effects,  but  specifically  focus  on  the 
health effects of children? 

Dr. ALDERSON. I have no way of answering that, Senator. 
Senator SUNUNU. If you could try to get that information for the 

record just so that we have—— 

Dr. ALDERSON. We will try to get you an answer on that. 
Senator SUNUNU.—a general understanding of what the target is. 
Second,  with  regard  to  the  high  and  low  exposure,  high  and  low 
dose, what does that mean? When you say a high dose, what is the 
level,  and  when  you  say  low  dose,  what  is  the  exposure  level  rel-
ative to the higher figure? 

Dr. ALDERSON. I do not know whether I have it, without looking 
in  the  NTP  report.  Here  are  some  numbers  that  I  have.  For  high 
dose,  I  think  the  NTP  report  or  brief  refers  to  something  greater 
than 50 milligrams per kilo of body weight per day. For a low dose, 
we  are  talking  about  doses  equal  to  or  less  than  5  milligrams  per 
kilogram per day. This is what the NTP report refers to. 

Senator SUNUNU. OK. 
What do you think the basis is for those who have opposed your 
finding?  What  argument  are  they  making  and  how  would  you  re-
spond  to  their  argument?  Clearly,  there  is  a  difference  of  opinion 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

23 

here and we need to at least understand what the basis is for that 
difference. 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  It  is  FDA’s  view  that  the  basis  for  this  is  what 
we  would  normally  ask  for  to  support  a  decision  on  safety  of  this 
type  of  material.  We  would  want  to  see  a  study  that  is  specifically 
designed  to  address  a  particular  endpoint  that  had  been  identified 
in  perhaps  another  study  where  we  have  multiple  doses,  we  use 
the correct model, i.e., the correct species, there is appropriate sta-
tistical  analysis  conducted  on  it,  it  is  conducted  under  GLP  stand-
ards.  There  is  a  whole  gamut  of  standards  that  FDA  prescribes 
when  we  are  looking  to  make  a  decision  on  safety,  and  that  is  the 
same  type  of  information  that  we  recommend  to  a  sponsor  who 
comes in and tells us what do you need. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  But  you  agree  that  there  is  a  value  in  doing 
additional  research  and  additional  evaluation,  including  many  of 
those criteria? 

Dr. ALDERSON. There is no question that many of the other stud-
ies  that  are  out  there  in  the  literature—we  would  consider  them 
hypothesis-testing.  They  are  very  important  to  us  because  they 
identify potential endpoints that need to be further evaluated, par-
ticularly as it relates to levels where we see no effects. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  Dr.  Wind,  obviously,  the  difference  between  a 

high-dose level and a low-dose level, 50—what is it? 

Dr. ALDERSON. Fifty milligrams per kilo. 
Senator  SUNUNU.  Fifty  milligrams  versus  5  milligrams.  There  is 

some significance there. 

You  talked  about  the  level  of  material  that  is  actually  included 
in  products,  not  the  exposure  level  or  the  dose,  but  the  threshold 
of one-tenth of 1 percent phthalates in the products and suggested 
that that might be impractical to set as a standard, to measure as 
a  standard  because  of  the  physical  nature  of  the  manufacture  of 
the products. 

Could  you  speak  a  little  bit  more  about  that  and  let  us  know  if 
we  were  going  to  set  a  standard  in  order  to  minimize  the  risk,  or 
minimize the exposure, from a manufacturing or testing standpoint 
what might be more practical? 

Dr. WIND. I think that when I spoke about the amount of phthal-
ate  that  we  found  in  products  when  we  tested  them,  that  was  the 
amount that is needed to make the product flexible. So it is inten-
tionally added to the product. You do not add .1 percent of phthal-
ate to a product. Phthalates are ubiquitous because they’re used in 
everything, and so that would be a contamination level. 

When  the  ASTM  established  their  standard  for  di-ethylhexyl 

phthalate—— 

Senator  SUNUNU.  I  am  sorry.  When  you  used  the  phrase  ‘‘con-
tamination  level,’’  though,  are  you  suggesting  that  it  is  an  imprac-
tical  standard  because  some  contamination  at  that  very  low  level 
is almost inevitable—— 

Dr. WIND. Yes. 
Senator  SUNUNU.—or  that  that  is  an  appropriate  level  because 

you would not want to have contamination at that level? 

Dr. WIND. No. 
Senator SUNUNU. You need to be clear. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

24 

Dr. WIND. I am suggesting that that level is impractical because 

contamination is going to occur. 

When we looked at the phthalates—at DINP, because that is the 
only one that we have done extensive work on, even with the high 
levels, you did not see a health risk. 

When  ASTM  set  the  level  for  the  DEHP  standard,  they  set  it  at 
3  percent  of  intentionally  added  DEHP  to  the  product.  So  I  think 
that the intentionally added is an important concept. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  I  have  one  more  question,  Mr.  Chairman,  and 
I apologize for going over, but I am going to have to depart for an-
other hearing. 

But  I  do  want  you  to  address  the  concern  you  raised  about  the 
impact  of  products  that  are  designed  as  protective  products,  shin 
guards,  eye  goggles,  other  protective  gear,  if  there  were  a  ban  put 
into  place.  For  those  protective  products,  are  there  alternatives  to 
BPA,  and  have  you  tried  to  quantify  what  the  impact  might  be  in 
terms of health or safety if there were a ban put in place? 

Dr.  WIND.  We  have  not  tried  to  look  at  the  impact  at  this  point. 
I  do  not  know  what  would  be  used.  What  I  do  know  is  that  since 
there is no exposure to BPA from something like a helmet or safety 
goggles, that no exposure means no risk. 

Senator  SUNUNU.  And  those  products  that  you  mentioned  would 

be affected by the legislation as written—— 

Dr. WIND. Yes. 
Senator  SUNUNU.—because  it  bans  it  in  all  products  no  matter 

what the impact or exposure might be from that product. 

Dr. WIND. Yes. 
Senator SUNUNU. Thank you very much. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
We  have  been  joined  by  Senator  Bill  Nelson  and  Senator  Amy 

Klobuchar. Senator Nelson, you are next. 

STATEMENT OF HON. BILL NELSON, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM FLORIDA 

Senator  NELSON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  for  holding  this 
hearing  on  the  potential  risk  that  we  see  here.  Mr.  Chairman,  I 
want  to  pick  up  exactly  where  Senator  Sununu  was  going  on  this. 
Dr.  Wind,  since  there  is  the  voluntary  industry  standard  called 
ASTM F–963 and it bans phthalate DEHP in pacifiers, rattles, and 
teethers,  is  the  Commission  going  to  consider  not  a  voluntary 
standard for the industry, but a mandatory rule? 

Dr. WIND. For DEHP? 
Senator NELSON. For pacifiers, rattles, and teethers. 
Dr.  WIND.  Pacifiers  are  no  longer  made  out  of  PVC.  They  are 

made out of latex rubber and silicone rubber. 

Senator NELSON. Anything that can go into the child’s mouth you 

are going to consider mandatory? 

Dr.  WIND.  Our  statute  requires  that  if  a  voluntary  standard  is 
in  place  and  is  effective,  that  we  not  do  a  mandatory  standard. 
DEHP at this point is not used in children’s products. 

Senator NELSON. So you support the voluntary but not a manda-

tory. Is that what you said? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

25 

Dr.  WIND.  No.  What  I  am  saying  is  DEHP  is  not  used  in  chil-

dren’s products at this point. So there is no exposure to DEHP. 

Senator NELSON. It is not used in rattles and teethers? 
Dr. WIND. No. 
Senator  NELSON.  Is  it  used  in  any  small  items  that  can  get  into 

Dr.  WIND.  Children  mouth  a  lot  of  things,  so  it  probably  is,  but 

a child’s mouth? 

they are not toys. 

tion. 

Senator NELSON. Let me ask you this. We have put it as a man-

datory standard in the Consumer Product Safety Commission. 

Dr. WIND. Right. 
Senator NELSON. Is your leadership going to support the position 

in our bill? 

Dr.  WIND.  Of  course,  whatever  Congress  puts  in  the  bill  we  will 

support because that is what we—— 

Senator NELSON. If it is the law. 
Dr. WIND. If it is the law. 
Senator NELSON. What will your agency recommend to the Presi-
dent on a veto or signing the bill since it has the mandatory stand-
ard? 

Dr.  WIND.  I  am  just  a  scientist.  So  I  cannot  answer  that  ques-

Senator NELSON. So you cannot speak for the leadership. 
Dr. WIND. Right, yes. 
Senator  NELSON.  OK.  I  am  just  a  little  country  lawyer,  but  I 
have  to  speak  out  for  my  constituents  and  a  lot  of  these  little  ba-
bies that get hold of these products. 

Let  me  ask  you  since  you  note  in  your  testimony  that  the  Com-
mission’s  actions  addressed  phthalates  during  1998  to  2003,  but 
since then there have been a number of studies that have come out 
and  some  countries,  indeed,  a  state  that  considers  itself  a  country, 
the  State  of  California,  has  banned  the  use  of  certain  phthalates 
in  toys—so  it  would  seem  that  this  ought  to  be  at  the  top  of  the 
agenda without it all being voluntary. 

Dr.  WIND.  The  phthalate  that  children  are  exposed  to  the  most 
is  diisononyl  phthalate,  DINP.  That  is  the  one  that  we  did  exten-
sive  work  on  back  in  the  late  1990s  and  early  2000  and  the  one 
where  the  Commission  denied  the  petition  to  ban  it.  There  have 
not  been  any  studies  on  DINP  that  have  come  out  since  then  that 
would  change  the  scientific  information  and  conclusions  that  we 
made from that study. 

We  worked  with  our  colleagues  in  the  European  Union  because 
we did not understand how they reached the conclusion that DINP 
should  be  banned,  and  we  had  extensive  discussions  with  them. 
The reality was that their risk assessment came out with the exact 
same acceptable daily intake that ours did. 

The  difference  between  the  two  studies  was  we  used  our  expo-
sure data which we derived from a very extensive behavioral obser-
vation  study.  They  picked  out  a  number  that  was  vastly  larger  in 
terms of exposure that is not justified by the current research, and 
that is how they came out with a risk of injury. 

Senator NELSON. So you are disagreeing as a scientist with some 
of  these  studies  that  have  said  phthalates  and  BPA  may  not  be 
suited for use in certain toys in children’s products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

26 

Dr.  WIND.  I  am  not  making  a  comment  about  BPA  because—— 
Senator NELSON. OK. That has got BPA in it. What do you think 

Dr.  WIND.  That  is  Food  and  Drug  Administration’s  jurisdiction. 

about that? 

So I will not comment on that. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Then  let  me  ask  Dr.  Alderson.  Many 
of  these  studies  have  focused  on  the  effects.  So  has  FDA,  EPA, 
CPSC, or any other agency had studies that show the combined im-
pact of these chemicals on adolescent development? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  When  you  say  ‘‘combined,’’  I  want  to  make  sure 
I understand the question. We have studies that we have reviewed 
the  literature,  a  lot  of  studies  relative  to  each  of  these  materials 
separately.  I  am  not  aware  of  any  studies—that  does  not  mean 
they  do  not  exist,  but  I  am  not  aware  of  any  that  we  have  dis-
cussed internally in FDA where there have been cumulative effects 
looked  at  in  terms  of  studies  that  had,  for  instance,  BPA  and 
DEHP in both. 

Senator NELSON. Well, let us do not confuse the question. Omit— 
strike  from  the  record,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  word  ‘‘combined.’’  All 
right. Now will you answer the question? 

Dr. ALDERSON. Yes, sir. 
There are ongoing considerations of the data relative to BPA. Re-
cent events with two documents from NTP released last month, an 
NTP  brief  draft  document,  that  will  be  peer-reviewed  next  month 
by the NTP—that is the current document that we at FDA are con-
sidering.  We  have  a  task  force  looking  at  the  implications  of  that. 
There  were  two  issues  raised  in  that  document  of  some  concern 
at  the  low-dose  levels.  They  in  their  review  looked  at  all  the  data, 
as  we  understand  it,  that  were  available,  including  the  two  low- 
dose multi-generation studies, one in rats and one in mice. So there 
is a lot of literature relative to BPA. 

Senator NELSON. What are you going to do about it? 
Dr.  ALDERSON.  Well,  we  are  taking  a  look  at  that.  We  also  need 
to  wait  until  the  NTP  peer  review  is  completed,  which  will  take 
place on June 11th, and they will issue their final monograph this 
fall  as  to  whether  those  areas  of  some  concern  are  sustained 
through the peer review process. 

Senator NELSON. What do you think CPSC ought to do about it? 
Dr. ALDERSON. What I think CPSC ought to do? 
Senator NELSON. Are you not there to protect the interests of the 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  But  as  it  relates  to  the  FDA  regulated  products, 

i.e., those food contact materials and materials in food cans. 

Senator  NELSON.  Right,  affecting  the  consumer  safety  and 

public? 

health. 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  At  this  point,  Senator,  we  think  they  continue  to 
be  safe.  We  have  not  seen  data  where  we  would  reach  the  conclu-
sion that they are unsafe. 

Senator NELSON. And ‘‘they’’ in this answer is who? 
Dr. ALDERSON. FDA. 
Senator NELSON. What products? 
Dr.  ALDERSON.  Well,  we  are  talking  about  specifically  food  con-
tact  materials,  i.e.,  baby  bottles,  food  packaging.  We  are  also  talk-
ing about liners that are in metal cans. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

27 

Senator NELSON. How about that? 
Dr. ALDERSON. Yes, sir. 
Senator NELSON. That is safe. 
Dr.  ALDERSON.  As  far  as  we  are  concerned.  Today  we  have  no 

reason to change our position on it. 

Senator NELSON. Even though it has got BPA. 
Dr. ALDERSON. Even though it has got BPA. 
Senator  NELSON.  OK.  And  there  are  no  studies  that  are  saying 

that the BPA in there in that bottle right there is unsafe? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  I  do  not  know  about  that  specific  bottle,  but  bot-

tles similar to that one. 

Senator NELSON. Dr. Alderson, you know what I am asking. Quit 

straining at gnats. Are there any studies? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  The  studies  we  have  seen,  studies  FDA  has  con-
ducted on leaching of this material from this type of product would 
tell  us  unless  you  would  subject  it  to  very  harsh  conditions,  i.e., 
continuous boiling or something like that, that the amount of BPA 
that  is  going  to  leach  into  the  food  that  may  do  it  in  that  bottle 
is safe. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator PRYOR. Senator Klobuchar? 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thank  you 

for holding this important hearing. 

Dr.  Alderson,  a  recent  article  in  The  New  York  Times—one  sci-
entist,  when  looking  at  these  studies  of  the  plastic  additives,  was 
quoted  as  saying,  ‘‘companies  and  states  are  taking  leadership 
where the Federal Government isn’t.’’ 

And some examples of that—Senator Nelson mentioned the State 
of California. Kaiser decided the evidence that the phthalates were 
leaking  into  intravenous  bags  were  enough  to  start  looking  for 
other options, and they gathered a team of experts to come up with 
medical  gloves  and  other  medical  supplies  that  were  free  of 
phthalates.  And  as  of  2004,  Kaiser  has  been  rolling  out  only  PVC- 
free products, including intravenous bags and tubes. 

Many  companies  are  not  waiting  for  Federal  regulation  and  are 
already  selling  products  that  conform  to  the  stricter  chemical 
standards  that  you  find  in  the  European  Union,  Canada,  and 
Japan. 

My question is this. At what point should the Federal regulators 
step  in?  Why  would  companies  like  Kaiser  make  this  decision  and 
the  Federal  Government  is  not  doing  anything?  What  message  are 
we sending to consumers when they read about BPA and phthalate 
studies, but see that the Government has not done anything? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Senator,  the  FDA  often  finds  itself  in  this  posi-
tion.  We  have  standards  that  we  ask  of  industry  to  give  us  as  it 
relates to safety and efficacy of products. In this case, you are talk-
ing  about  products  that  were  approved  many  years  ago,  and  be-
cause  they  are  food  additives,  a  manufacturer  can  take  that  prod-
uct  and  start  marketing  it  without  any  preclearance  as  long  as  it 
puts that material in there in accordance with the regulation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

28 

Now,  having  said  that,  as  literature  becomes  available  on  these 
type  of  chemicals  in  the  products,  particularly  food  packaging  ma-
terials,  we  are  continuing  to  look  at  it.  And  where  there  are  data 
that  become  available  that  raises  our  concerns  and  they  meet  a 
regulatory standard in terms of quality of that data where it is de-
signed  to  address  in  this  case  safety,  we  will  take  action.  But  as 
I have said previously, at this point in time, the data that we have 
seen does not lead us to change our position on how we look at the 
safety of either BPA or DEHP. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Another example—and I know that Senator 
Nelson was talking to you about these bottles. Nalgene has started 
phasing out the use of BPA in their water bottles—and this is one 
of those old water bottles—because of these studies that have come 
out showing this additive leaking into food and beverages. In their 
new  water  bottles—and  actually  one  member  of  my  staff  actually 
just  ordered  this  new  Nalgene  water  bottle.  It  looks  similar  and, 
however, do not leak. 

So where this research has shown that by using boiling water in 
one of these to—which by the way, I was amused to find out as we 
prepared for this hearing—just yesterday I used one of these water 
bottles, Mr. Chair, and ran it under really hot water under the fau-
cet  for  quite  a  while  because  I  was  too  lazy  to  put  it  in  the  dish-
washer. It did strike me that if I had a choice and I knew that this 
was  going  on,  that  this  company  was  actually  phasing  these  out, 
that I would probably not want to take the risk, that I would prob-
ably use this water bottle. 

So  what  I  am  thinking  about  is  these  parents  with  baby  bottles 
and  knowing  that  there  is  some  risk  out  there.  Do  you  not  think 
that  they  should  be  somehow—at  least  be  some  requirement  that 
these  things  be  labeled  so  if  you  guys  are  not  going  to  regulate 
them, that they can at least make their own choice based on what 
they are seeing in some of these studies? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Senator,  we  at  FDA  have  put  out  in  our  an-
nouncements  regarding  this  issue  since  this  came  out  last  month 
that  there  are  alternatives,  particularly  as  it  relates  to  baby  bot-
tles,  i.e.,  glass.  Those  are  there  for  people  to  see.  We  have  also 
pointed out how you can determine whether BPA is in these bottles 
by looking at the recycling notification on those bottles. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  That  sounds  really  hard  for  a  mom  with  a 
12-year-old  and  you  are  trying  to  get  them  off  to  school.  We  are 
supposed to look at recycling requirements? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  That  is  what  the  current  regulation  and  laws  re-

quire of us. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  we  are  looking  at  maybe  changing  the 
laws  and  requirements  to  make  it  easier.  That  is  why  we  are  hav-
ing this hearing. 

Dr. ALDERSON. I do not think FDA would object. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. My next question is this: If these companies 
are starting to phase these out and they are concerned about some 
of  this  leakage  themselves,  should  the  Federal  Government  not  be 
more concerned and moving more quickly to do something about it? 
Because  maybe  not  every  other  company  is  going  to  start  taking 
these  off  the  market.  They  are  just  going  to  keep  using  the  old 
ones. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

29 

Dr. ALDERSON. Senator, in FDA’s consideration of safety of prod-
ucts, we feel we are obligated to use the best science to make those 
decisions. The process and the science that we follow—we have got 
a  prescribed  way  we  go  about  determining  safety,  and  it  is  based 
on  the  current  science  as  it  relates  to  these  type  of  materials.  It 
is  rated  to  the  current  science  on  what  is  the  best  approach  to  de-
termine  safety  without  going  to  humans  because  we  are  not  going 
to be able to do human studies to make these determinations. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Does  the  National  Toxicology  report  re-
leased  this  month  raise  some  concern  about  the  effects  of  BPA  on 
infants and children? 

Dr. ALDERSON. It does. It raises concerns but that—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. The European Union and Canada and these 
others  countries  have  actually  done  something  about  that,  and  we 
are just concerned. 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Well,  even  the  Canadian  report,  in  reading  it, 
they  point  out  there  are  really  uncertainties  in  the  data  that  they 
have  reviewed.  They  also  point  out  the  need  for  further  research. 
The EU, in communications we have had with them this week— 
they  are  raising  no  concerns  about  the  NTP  report  or  the  recent 
studies. Their position is being maintained. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. But you are concerned about the report and 

what it says. 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  We  are  concerned  about  it.  That  is  the  reason  at 
FDA we have a task force that we are looking across all the agen-
cies at any of our products that have BPA in it. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  am  just  again  thinking  of  these  parents. 
They  can  choose  one  duck  or  the  other  duck,  and  one  duck  has 
phthalates and one duck does not. I think they would like to make 
that choice themselves, and we are not giving them the tools to do 
that. 

Thank you very much. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Senator Nelson? 
Senator  NELSON.  Dr.  Alderson,  you  said  in  my  previous  com-
mentary  with  you  that  a  bottle  like  this  with  BPA  is  safe.  So  you 
would  suggest  to  a  young  mother  who  would  have  a  baby  bottle 
made  with  BPA  that  she  wants  to  heat  up  the  formula,  that  you 
would  recommend  that  she  can  use  that  bottle  with  BPA  as  op-
posed to a bottle without BPA. Is that your recommendation? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  I  think  our  recommendation  would  be  that  she 
not  heat  the  formula  in  that  polycarbonate  bottle  containing  BPA, 
that  she  heat  it  in  another  source  and  let  it  cool  and  then  put  it 
in the bottle. 

Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Has  such  a  recommendation  been 

made by the FDA? 

Dr. ALDERSON. I think that recommendation is in our recent an-
nouncements  regarding  our  position  as  we  follow  the  NTP  brief 
draft.  We  pointed  out  that  those  alternatives  are  available,  and  I 
think we have said—and I do not have it in front of me, Senator— 
that  we  talked  about  there  are  alternative  ways  to  prepare  this. 
Certainly  in  our  research,  we  have  pointed  out  that  boiling  mate-
rials  in  these  bottles  is  not  recommended.  And  I  do  not  think  the 
manufacturers even recommend that. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

30 

Senator  NELSON.  But  they  have  got  a  choice.  A  consumer  has  a 
choice  if  they  know  the  difference  between  a  bottle  with  BPA  and 
one  that  does  not  have  BPA.  And  so  the  question  that  is  just 
begged  that  we  have  to  ask,  representing  our  constituents  and 
wanting their safety of the very agencies that are charged with pro-
tection  of  the  consumers,  is,  is  the  consumer  being  advised  by  the 
Executive  Branch  of  Government  the  difference  between  the  two 
bottles,  that  a  young  mom  may  go  and  heat  up  the  baby  formula? 
Dr.  ALDERSON.  Again,  Senator,  I  do  not  know  what  the  specific 
bottles  that  have  BPA  in  them—how  they  are  recommended  for 
use.  I  can  only  relate  back  to  when  my  two  children  were  babies 
and I know we did not boil hot formula in the bottles. 

Senator NELSON. I think back when my two children were young 

and I did not know up from down. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  NELSON.  All  right.  Well,  let  me  ask  you,  Dr.  Wind.  You 
are  a  scientist.  Now,  one  study  of  your  agency  that  has  helped  set 
the  foundation  for  a  final  determination  to  deny  the  petition  that 
infants  1  to  2  years  old  on  average—it  came  out  with  a  conclusion 
that those infants 1 to 2 years old mouthed soft plastic toys for 1.9 
minutes  a  day.  Does  that  change  your  testimony  at  all  about 
phthalates? 

Dr.  WIND.  No,  because  that  was  the  very  number  that  we  used 
when  we  looked  at  the  risk.  We  developed  an  acceptable  daily  in-
take which is the amount that you can consume for your entire life-
time  every  day  that  would  result  in  no  health  risk.  And  then  we 
compared  the  amount  of  time  an  infant  would  mouth  these  prod-
ucts. We measured how much migrates out of the products, and we 
did actual calculations where we looked at what, in fact, an infant 
would  consume.  And  the  numbers  that  we  came  up  with  were 
below  the  estimated  background  level  that  infants  would  consume 
from  food  and  other  things,  and  it  was  way  below  the  acceptable 
daily intake which already has a safety factor. 

Senator  NELSON.  Just  so  I  understand,  then  I  will  stop,  Mr. 
Chairman.  So  the  CPSC  has  concluded  that  a  child  mouthing  a 
flexible  plastic  toy  with  phthalates  close  to  2  minutes  a  day,  that 
they  are  not  going  to  have  enough  of  that  phthalate  to  be  harmful 
to the child. 

Dr.  WIND.  Yes,  and  in  fact,  the  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel, 
which  consisted  of  seven  independent  scientists,  recommended  to 
the  Commission  by  the  National  Academy  of  Science,  concluded 
that  the  only  children  that  would  be  at  risk  were  those  that 
mouthed  phthalate-containing  toys  for  more  than  75  minutes  a 
day. 

Senator NELSON. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
Let  me  follow  up,  if  I  may.  I  do  not  want  to  pick  on  Nalgene  as 
a  company.  It  sounds  like  they  are  trying  to  be  proactive  to  try  to 
get  ahead  of  this.  So  I  appreciate  that.  But  just  using  them  as  an 
example, they have announced that they are not going to put BPA 
in their bottles anymore. 

Dr. Alderson, what assurance do we have that whatever chemical 

goes into the new bottle is safe? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

31 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  If  it  is  a  chemical  that  has  previously  been  ap-
proved  and  is  in  our  regulations  as  approved,  that  chemical  would 
have to be used in accordance with those regulations, and that way 
we would assume it is safe until we get additional information. 

If  it  is  a  totally  new  chemical  that  we  have  not  seen  before,  it 
has  not  been  approved  for  that  use,  then  they  would  have  to  get 
a preclearance approval. They could not start using it until that ap-
proval  takes  place.  They  would  have  to  go  through  considerable 
time  and  effort  to  show  safety  through  the  regulatory  process  we 
have  talked  about  previously  in  terms  of  multigeneration  studies, 
chronic  studies,  et  cetera,  if  the  endpoints  we  see  in  studies  point 
to that. 

Senator PRYOR. So your view is that in order to put any additive 

there, that additive has to be preapproved by you? 

Dr. ALDERSON. That is correct. 
Senator  PRYOR.  Let  me  ask,  if  I  may,  of  the  CPSC,  Dr.  Wind. 
From  your  earlier  testimony  in  your  opening  statement,  I  was  not 
clear on one point. Does the CPSC have a comprehensive list of all 
products that use phthalates? 

Dr.  WIND.  No.  We  have  concentrated  on  toys  that  are  intended 
to be mouthed because our exposure study showed that those were 
the ones to which kids had the most exposure, and since there was 
no risk to those, then we did not pursue other toys, although when 
we were responding to the petition, we did pick up a variety of toys 
and look at them to see how much phthalate migrated out of them. 
Senator PRYOR. All right. For phthalates, is there a level, sort of 

a magic number, that you consider safe? 

Dr. WIND. What we found when we looked at toys was that there 
was  no  correlation  between  the  amount  of  phthalate  that  was  in  a 
toy  and  the  amount  that  migrated  out  of  it.  However,  again,  I  go 
back to our exposure study, and the levels of phthalates in the toys 
ranged up to 39 percent, and based upon the exposure time, we did 
not find that those posed a health risk. 

Senator PRYOR. Senator Kerry has joined us. Senator Kerry? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN F. KERRY, 
U.S. SENATOR FROM MASSACHUSETTS 

Senator KERRY. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman, for a hear-
ing  that  I  think  is  of  incredible  importance,  and  I  am  very  appre-
ciative to you for having it. 

I am not entirely sure of where to begin here, but let me get or-

ganized and then I will sort of pull that together. 

Endocrine disrupters, as we have come to know them, are preva-
lent in our society, and I know that we are looking at two of those 
specifically  here,  phthalates  and  bisphenol  A.  There  is  a  lot  of  sci-
entific  evidence  showing  that  at  low  exposure  levels,  these  two 
chemicals,  which  we  know  are  contained  in  everything  from  baby 
bottles  to  IV  tubes,  can  have  real  and  significant  impacts  on  child 
development and hormone function. Phthalates are very common in 
personal care products. 

And we seem to have a different attitude in our country than the 
Europeans do about these kinds of products. I think in Europe they 
have  a  burden  of  proof  on  the  industry  to  prove  that  something 
does  not  harm  them.  Here  in  America,  for  regrettable  reasons,  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

32 

have a burden of proof on the individual to prove that it does harm 
them. Our TSCA, which we passed in 1972, really gets it backward 
in my judgment. And I am very concerned, Dr. Alderson, Dr. Wind, 
that the agencies that are supposed to be protecting consumers are 
simply not doing it. 

Americans  use  12  personal  care  products  every  single  day.  They 
contain 126 unique ingredients. And many people assume that sim-
ply  because  the  Government  requires  tough  testing  for  drugs,  that 
the same is true for these personal care products. But it is not true, 
is it? 

Dr. ALDERSON. No, sir. 
Senator  KERRY.  They  do  not  get  any  kind  of  real  scrutiny,  and 
the  reality  is  that  outside  of  drugs  and  pesticides,  the  chemicals 
used  to  manufacture  many  of  the  products  that  we  use  every  day, 
cosmetics, personal care, cleaning agents, are actually never tested 
to find out if they are harmful. Is that not correct? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  As  it  relates  to  personal  care  items,  particularly 
cosmetics,  the  industry  conducts  an  extensive  evaluation  of  their 
products, but FDA does not get to see any of that information. 

Senator  KERRY.  Just  the  way  that  Chevrolet  years  ago  did  eval-
uations on the Corvair. Correct? And many other instances like pa-
jamas  that  used  to  catch  on  fire  and  beds  that  kids  fall  through 
and hang themselves in. Correct? 

So  somebody  is  supposed  to  stand  up  here  and  sort  of  protect 
people a little bit. In my judgment, the FDA could hardly be doing 
less.  They  do  not  require  studies  or  testing  for  a  cosmetic  product 
that  is  put  on  the  shelves  of  the  pharmacy  or  grocery  store.  I  am 
told  that  some  hair  straighteners  use  estrogen.  Are  you  aware  of 
that? 

Dr. ALDERSON. No, sir. 
Senator KERRY. Are you aware of that, Dr. Wind? 
Dr. WIND. That is not something in our jurisdiction, so no. 
Senator  KERRY.  Even  if  it  were  not  in  your  jurisdiction,  you  are 

not aware of it. 
Dr. WIND. No. 
Senator  KERRY.  And  estrogen  can,  in  fact,  have  carcinogenic  im-
pact  when  it  is  used  in  a  certain  quantity  above  normal  levels. 
Would  it  concern  you  to  know  that  young  women  are  using  estro-
gen  in  hair  products  conceivably  to  straighten  their  hair  and  that 
that may, in fact, have an impact? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Without  question  we  would  want  to  know  that, 

sir. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  it  is  in  the  public  domain.  It  seems  to  me 
the  FDA  is  putting  its  faith  in  an  industry  to  self-police  through 
a  panel  called  the  Cosmetic  Ingredient  Review.  Surprise,  surprise. 
The industry funded the panel of scientists and they have reviewed 
only  11  percent  of  the  more  than  10,000  ingredients  contained  in 
cosmetics. 

The  reality  is  that  these  pose  risks  to  health.  Dozens  of  studies 
in recent years led to the announcement in mid-April from the Na-
tional Toxicology Program of the National Institutes of Health that 
there  is  ‘‘some  concern  about  neural  and  behavioral  effects  of  BPA 
on  fetuses,  infants,  and  children.’’  In  response  to  this,  Senator 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

33 

Schumer  and  I  introduced  the  BPA-Free  Kids  Act  of  2008,  which 
prohibits the use. 

But  again,  we  have  been  slow  to  take  this  up.  In  fact,  the  re-
sponse  from  the  recent  study  of  the  National  Toxicology  Program 
has  simply  promised  more  studies,  not  any  concrete  action  to  re-
duce exposure. 

The  media  has  reported  that  the  Federal  Government’s  reluc-
tance to regulate these chemicals is based on the reliance of biased 
studies from the chemical industry itself. 

Now, I have to tell you if that is true, if it is not being done inde-
pendently or by yourselves, but by an industry study, does that not 
cast amazing doubt on the ability of the regulatory system to actu-
ally protect the public? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  Senator,  at  FDA  all  of  our  products  that  we  ap-
prove are based on data that are prepared and conducted in studies 
by that particular manufacturer. 

Senator  KERRY.  But  does  that  not  bother  you?  That  is  my  point. 

You do not seem to see the connection here. 

You  know,  my  wife  and  I  did  a  book.  I  am  not  here  to  hawk  a 
book, but we wrote a book. A chapter in it is on this topic. Let me 
just  read  something  about  baby  food.  ‘‘Chemicals  that  go  into  the 
manufacture  of  other  products  intended  for  young  children.  Poly-
vinyl  chloride  softens  because  of  the  existence  of  phthalates.  It  is 
still used in the manufacture of children’s toys, bath books, rattles, 
beach balls, plastic raincoats, boots, even teething rings, and it can 
be  absorbed  from  those  products  during  use  into  a  young  child’s 
body.’’ 

‘‘The fact is that a biomonitoring study coordinated by EWG, the 
Environmental  Working  Group,  tested  the  umbilical  cord  blood 
from 10 babies who have been born in the United States in August 
and  September  of  2004.  These  newborns  were  found  to  have  ab-
sorbed  in  the  womb  a  combined  total  of  413  chemicals.  At  birth, 
each  child  carried  an  average  body  burden  of  200  chemicals,  and 
those  chemicals  included  pesticides,  flame  retardants,  and  other 
persistent  organic  compounds  or  byproducts  from  burning  gasoline 
and garbage.’’ 

‘‘The  EWG  also  tested  the  breast  milk  of  29  first-time  mothers 
from  across  the  United  States  for  the  presence  of  components  of 
chemical  flame  retardants,  TVs,  foam  furniture,  all  of  which  can 
cause thyroid toxicity, and some of which have been banned in Eu-
rope.  And  the  results  were  very  sobering.  The  breast  milk  of  each 
new mother tested positive for components of flame retardants. The 
average  level  of  brominated  fire  retardants  in  the  milk  samples 
was  75  times  higher  than  the  average  for  women  who  had  been 
tested in Europe and were at levels associated with toxic effects in 
studies on lab animals.’’ 

You  can  go  on  and  on  about  what  is  happening  with  phthalates 
themselves.  There  were  some  doctors  who  were  doing  an  analysis. 
I think it was in Pittsburgh at the university. They were trying to 
figure  out  what  the  impact  was  of  plasticizers,  phthalates  on  cre-
ation of cancer, and before they even put the cancerous carcinogen 
into  their  experiment,  they  found  that  their  base  product  had  al-
ready turned cancerous. And they could not figure out why. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

34 

So  they  started  doing  reverse  analysis  to  figure  out  what  had 
happened, and then they got to the point where they actually made 
telephone  calls  to  the  makers  of  the  plastic  tubes  to  find  out  what 
the ingredients were and, indeed, found that the phthalates within 
the tubes themselves were the only rationale for what had created 
the carcinogenic transformation. 

Do you read these studies? Do they not concern you? 
Dr.  ALDERSON.  Sir,  we  have  read  all  the  studies  you  are  talking 

about. 

Senator. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  why  do  you  not  ban  phthalates?  There  is 
a  movement  in  California  to  ban  them  now.  There  is  a  movement 
in  Europe,  other  places.  There  is  a  lot  of  study  in  rats  and  others. 
Are you familiar with those studies? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  I  personally  am  not,  but  I  am  sure  the  scientists 

at FDA who review these materials every day are. 

Senator  KERRY.  Well,  does  the  Commission  not  talk  about  this? 

Do you Commissioners not talk about this? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  We  talk  about  these  issues  on  a  regular  basis, 

Senator  KERRY.  A  team  at  Boston  Tufts  University,  led  by  Pro-
fessor  Soto,  studied  the  effects  of  phthalate  exposure  in  rats.  They 
exposed  pregnant  rats  to  bisphenol  A,  BPA,  chemical,  and  the  lev-
els to which the rats were exposed mirrored levels that humans en-
counter  daily.  The  results:  by  the  time  they  reached  puberty,  rats 
that  had  received  even  the  lowest  doses  of  BPA  had  four  times 
more  precancerous  growths  in  breast  tissue  than  those  that  had 
not been exposed. 

You  think  it  is  OK  for  people  to  go  ahead  and  use  this  stuff?  I 

mean, does this not concern you? 

Dr. ALDERSON. Senator, it does concern us. 
Senator  KERRY.  Well,  how  much  does  it  concern  you?  Enough 
that all you do is just rely on a study that comes from the industry 
itself? You should go to their website today and read what they say 
about  phthalates.  Completely  contrary  to  what  is  out  there  in  sci-
entific  journals.  It  is  a  disgrace.  And  it  obviously  does  not  concern 
you enough to do something about it. 

There are thousands upon thousands of chemicals; 80,000 chemi-
cals  are  out  there  in  the  marketplace  today.  Something  like  less 
than  6,000  have  been  properly  vetted  and  tested.  And  we  are  still 
living  with  the  residue  of  the  Toxic  Control  Substances  Act  that 
was  written  by  the  industry  with  the  burden  of  proof  on  our  citi-
zens to prove harm done, not on people to prove that it will not be 
done. 

And  I  tell  you—I  mean,  I  could  go  on  and  on.  I  have  used  my 
time  here,  and  it  is  not  appropriate  to  abuse  it.  But  I  just  think 
the job is not being done, sir, I have to tell you. And I do not think 
the  American  public  is  being  adequately  protected,  and  I  think  we 
are going to have to find—this law has got to be rewritten and we 
have  got  to  start  to  do  what  we  are  supposed  to  do,  not  what  the 
industry always asks us to do. 

Do  you  have  any  response?  None.  You  think  everything  is  OK? 
Dr. ALDERSON. Senator, as the studies become available to us, we 

at FDA—— 

Senator KERRY. Studies from whom become available to you? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

35 

Dr. ALDERSON. Whoever. If they have been published—— 
Senator  KERRY.  The  only  studies  you  are  getting  right  now— 

have you asked for studies from independent sources? 

Dr.  ALDERSON.  We  do  not  normally  ask  for  independent  studies. 
Senator  KERRY.  Then  you  do  not  protect  the  American  people  if 
you do not ask for them, if you do not look beyond what is handed 
to you. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Senator PRYOR. Thank you. 
That  will  be  all  for  this  panel  here.  I  want  to  thank  you  all  for 
being  here  and  providing  your  testimony.  And  just  to  let  you  all 
know, it is very possible that Senators will have written questions, 
and  they  will  submit  those  for  the  record  and  we  will  keep  the 
record open for 2 weeks to allow Senators to submit their questions 
and you all to get your answers back. 

Now I would like to introduce the third panel. You all just come 

on up and grab a microphone and grab your seats. 

First is going to be Dr. John Peterson Myers, CEO and Chief Sci-
entist,  Environmental  Health  Sciences.  Next  will  be  Ms.  Elizabeth 
Hitchcock, Public Health Advocate for U.S. PIRG, and third will be 
Dr.  Steve  Hentges,  Executive  Director,  Polycarbonate/BPA  Global 
Group, American Chemistry Council. 

So as you all are getting situated and finding your seats, I want 

to welcome all of you to the subcommittee. And Dr. Myers? 

STATEMENT OF JOHN PETERSON MYERS, PH.D., CEO AND 
CHIEF SCIENTIST, ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SCIENCES 

Dr.  MYERS.  Mr.  Chairman,  distinguished  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee,  my  name  is  Pete  Myers.  I  am  the  Chief  Scientist  of  Envi-
ronmental  Health  Sciences,  a  not-for-profit  scientific  organization 
based  in  Charlottesville,  Virginia.  It  is  an  honor  to  be  here  today 
to participate in this discussion. 

I  am  going  to  focus  most  of  my  comments  on  some  of  the  issues 
that  were  raised  by  your  questions  earlier,  specifically  this  whole 
high-dose versus low-dose issue because it turns out that the struc-
ture,  the  basic  way  that  the  FDA,  the  EPA,  and  the  CPSC  have 
gone about asking scientific questions to respond to Senator Kerry’s 
concerns  are  based  upon  16th  century  science,  not  upon  21st  cen-
tury medicine. And that has left us blind to exactly the types of ef-
fects  that  bisphenol  A  and  the  phthalates  now  are  shown  to  have 
caused in a wide array of experiments. I will get to that. 

I  first  want  to  begin  with  a  couple  of  preliminary  comments.  As 
Senator  Kerry  knows,  over  10  years  ago,  I  actually  co-authored  a 
book  about  endocrine  disruption  that  brought  this  issue  to  the  at-
tention of the American public and policymakers for the first time. 
Even  then,  over  10  years  ago,  there  were  hints  of  risks  from 
bisphenol A and phthalates. 

As  I  look  at  the  last  10  years,  the  book’s  most  important  effect 
actually  was  to  stimulate  Federal  investments  in  medical  and  sci-
entific research on endocrine disruption, and today, 10 years later, 
we are living midstream in a scientific revolution that has resulted 
from  those  investments,  and  it  is  truly  quite  amazing.  It  is  chang-
ing the framework we use to think about how contaminants can be 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

36 

toxic because the old toxicology focused on overt damage, overt tox-
icity. Are mutations caused? Is there overt liver toxicity, et cetera? 
This  new  toxicology  instead  looks  at  molecular  genetics,  and  it 
acknowledges  that  our  genes  are  actually  being  turned  on  and  off 
trillions of times a second every day of our life, every second of our 
life, and things like phthalates and bisphenol A affect that process 
of turning genes on and off. 

The  FDA  and  the  EPA  and  the  CDC—their  science  currently  ig-
nores  molecular  genetics.  It  looks  at  old-style  toxicology,  the  con-
sequences  of  high  doses,  but  we  are  learning  that  this  new  toxi-
cology,  toxicology  that  builds  upon  the  last  several  decades  of  mo-
lecular  genetic  research,  is  really  revealing  that  the  changes  in 
gene expression that can be induced through low-level exposures in 
the  womb  can  lead  the  developing  organism  along  a  path  that  it 
never  would  have  followed  and  induce  diseases  in  adulthood  that 
are actually traced to what are called epigenetic changes caused by 
low-level exposures in the womb. That is the central issue here. We 
have got to move from 16th century science to 21st century science. 
If  you  leave  this  room  with  just  one  new  piece  of  information, 
here it is. Numerous animal studies published in the peer-reviewed 
literature  show  that  the  average  person  in  America  today  has  lev-
els  of  bisphenol  A  in  their  blood  that  are  higher  than  those  suffi-
cient  to  cause  harm  in  animals.  This  is  a  not  a  case  of  high-dose 
experiments being extrapolated to the consequences of low-dose ex-
posure.  These  are  experiments  using  low  doses  asking  what  hap-
pens  when  animals  are  exposed  to  the  levels  that  people  experi-
ence. And crucially, the mechanisms of action of these low-dose ex-
posures are identical. They are exactly the same in animals as they 
are  in  people.  So  the  results  of  those  experiments  are  highly  rel-
evant to predicting human effects. 

Last and again about bisphenol A, I want you to focus on another 
fact that has been published in the peer-reviewed literature. Of the 
studies of bisphenol A that were funded by Government sources, in-
cluding  the  National  Institutes  of  Health,  over  90  percent  of  them 
find  adverse  effects  on  animals.  In  contrast,  none  of  the  studies 
funded by industry report adverse effects. This is the same pattern, 
the  very  same  pattern,  you  will  find  with  industry-funded  studies 
of  the  effects  of  lead,  pharmaceuticals,  other  chemicals,  and  to-
bacco. 

Now,  some  of  you  will  recall  the  testimony  in  1994  before  Con-
gress of the seven heads of tobacco companies who swore that there 
was  no  link  between  cigarette  smoking  and  cancer.  As  you  listen 
to  industry  interpretation  of  the  data  on  bisphenol  A  and 
phthalates, I would encourage you to think about that. 

I  would  also  encourage  you  to  take  a  look  at  this  new  book  by 
Dr.  David  Michaels  of  George  Washington  University.  It  is  called 
Doubt  is  Their  Product.  It  describes  in  detail  how  industry  trade 
groups  manipulate  science  to  forestall  action,  regulatory  action. 
Every delay keeps sales going and revenue flowing. 

But  back  to  this  larger  issue  of  the  contrast  between  high  doses 
and low doses. I want to give you one specific example, which real-
ly  brings  this  home,  and  it  is  actually  about  a  drug  called 
tamoxifen.  Now,  tamoxifen,  as  many  of  you  know,  is  used  to  fight 
breast  cancer.  At  high  levels,  it  suppresses  the  rate  of  growth  of  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

37 

breast  tumor.  It  is  very  good  at  parts  per  million,  parts  per  thou-
sand levels, and physicians take great advantage of that. But if you 
go  down  the  dose-response  curve,  to  a  level  that  is  literally  a  mil-
lion times beneath the level where it is effective as a drug stopping 
breast  cancer,  it  stimulates  proliferation  of  the  breast  tumor.  It  is 
an estrogen at that level. The high-dose experiments that our regu-
latory  agencies  have  depended  upon  to  anticipate  low-dose  effects 
do not work when you are dealing with compounds that behave like 
hormones.  This  is  a  widely  accepted  fact  in  medical  endocrinology. 
It is just not challenging at all. 

The  question  is,  when  are  we  going  to  bring  the  toxicological 

community into the 21st century of science? 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Myers follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOHN PETERSON MYERS, PH.D., CEO AND CHIEF 

SCIENTIST, ENVIRONMENTAL HEALTH SCIENCES 

Base Health Standards on 21st Century Medical Science, Not 16th Century 

Dogma 

Large  scientific  literatures  of  peer-reviewed  publications  now  plausibly  link 
bisphenol  A  (BPA)  and  several  phthalates  to  an  array  of  adverse  health  outcomes. 
For bisphenol A these include prostate and breast cancer, loss of fertility (includ-
ing  via  polycystic  ovaries  and  uterine  fibroids,  as  well  as  reduced  sperm  count  and 
spontaneous miscarriage) and impaired neurological development. Numerous studies 
show  that  many  of  these  effects  can  be  caused  in  laboratory  animals  at  levels  be-
neath the average concentration found in American serum today.1 

For phthalates these include abnormalities in the male reproductive tract (includ-
ing  undescended  testes,  hypospadias  and  reduced  sperm  count)  as  well  as  height-
ened  sensitivity  and  reactivity  of  the  immune  system,  which  may  lead  to 
hyperallergic reactions and asthma. 

The  strength  of  the  evidence  varies  for  each  of  these  potential  effects,  for  both 
phthalates  and  BPA.  The  human  data  on  phthalates  are  stronger;  indeed  for  BPA 
there  are  almost  no  epidemiological  studies.  But  the  evidence  from  animal  experi-
ments on BPA, especially at very low doses within the range of common human ex-
posure, is much more extensive than with phthalates. And the mechanism of action 
of  BPA  in  humans  is  the  same  as  the  mechanism  of  action  in  animals.  Hence  the 
animal findings are highly relevant to predicting human health impacts. 

Despite  this  evidence,  both  BPA  and  phthalates  are  in  widespread,  indeed  ubiq-
uitous  use  in  commerce  today.  Virtually  all  Americans  carry  measurable  levels  in 
their  fluids  and  tissues.  None  of  the  relevant  Federal  agencies  have  taken  action 
to reduce exposures. 

Why? 
The scientific basis of regulatory toxicology, as it is applied today by Federal regu-
lators,  rests  upon  an  assumption  derived  from  16th  Century  dogma.  That  assump-
tion,  never  tested  in  standard  procedures  to  establish  acceptable  exposure  limits, 
conflicts directly with 21st Century medical science. 

The assumption is that experiments with high doses will reveal the effects of low 
doses.  It  is  based  upon  the  16th  Century  observation  by  Paracelsus  that  ‘‘All  sub-
stances  are  poisons;  there  is  none  which  is  not  a  poison.  The  right  dose  differen-
tiates  a  poison  from  a  remedy.’’ 2 This  has  been  paraphrased  to  become  ‘‘the  dose 
makes the poison.’’ 

The  assumption  is  directly  contradicted  by  decades  of  research  in  the  medical 
science  of  endocrinology  showing  that  hormonally-active  compounds  have  com-
plicated  dose-response  curves  in  which  low  dose  exposures  can  cause  effects  unpre-
dictable  from  high  dose  experiments.  BPA  and  phthalates  are  both  hormonally-ac-
tive compounds, called endocrine disrupters (EDCs), and peer-reviewed research has 
reported  these  complicated  dose-response  curves  for  both  substances.  Nevertheless, 
the FDA and EPA continue to depend upon this flawed assumption, which has been 
repeatedly  invalidated  in  careful  scientific  studies,  in  these  agencies’  development 
of  public  health  standards  for,  and  regulation  of,  exposures  to  EDCs.  This  misled 
policy  is  disastrous,  as  it  will  lead  to  many  lost  opportunities  for  improving  public 
health  that  will  have  implications  for  decades,  as  recent  research  shows  long-term 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

38 

detrimental  effects  not  only  on  exposed  individuals,  but  even  subsequent  genera-
tions. 

Biomonitoring studies conducted by the CDC and others document that wherever 
samples  have  been  analyzed,  people  are  contaminated  with  many  industrial  chemi-
cals, including BPA and phthalates. Of particular concern are the numbers and con-
centrations of chemicals found in human amniotic fluid, fetal blood, and breast milk, 
rendering  it  impossible  for  a  child  to  be  born  or  to  be  breast-fed  without  develop-
mental exposure. 

Many  of  these  chemicals  are  known  to  interfere  with  the  action  of  hormones  in 
experimental  systems,  hormones  that  are  essential  for  healthy  development.  With 
a mandate from Congress, for the last decade the U.S. EPA has been designing reg-
ulatory  tools  to  screen  and  test  for  contaminants  with  endocrine  effects.3 To  date, 
this process has failed to fully integrate basic endocrinological principles in its deci-
sion-making  and  instead  is  relying  upon  toxicological  methods  that  are  inappro-
priate for EDCs.4 This led to a significant blind-spot in regulatory standard setting. 
Chemical  monitoring  by  the  CDC,  carefully  structured  to  obtain  statistically  rep-
resentative  estimates  of  Americans’  exposures,  typically  reveals  median  serum  or 
urine  concentrations  well  below  those  produced  by  dosing  regimens  in  animal  ex-
periments  used  for  regulatory  toxicology.  Those  regimens  use  high  doses  under  the 
assumption  that  the  effects  of  high  doses  can  be  used  to  predict  low  dose  impacts. 
In fact, the estimates of safe daily human exposure doses for chemicals derived from 
these  procedures  are  never  directly  tested,  even  in  laboratory  animals.  Yet  increas-
ingly,  epidemiological  analyses  of  biomonitoring  data  showing  associations,  some-
times striking, between the low concentrations of chemicals measured in the general 
public  and  adverse  health  conditions.  Examples  include  phthalates  and  sperm  de-
fects,5 reproductive tract abnormalities,6 and obesity; 7 pesticides and sperm count; 8 
perchlorate 9 or  PCBs 10,11,12 and  thyroid  function;  and  persistent  organic  pollutants 
and type 2 diabetes 13 and insulin resistance.14 

These  associations  should  not  arise  if  the  safety  levels  established  by  high-dose 
testing  are  accurate.  Several  factors  could  be  contributing  to  this  apparent  discrep-
ancy  between  prediction  and  observation.  One  is  that  epidemiological  associations 
do not reflect causality. A second is that the estimate for safety has been based upon 
an  insensitive  endpoint.  A  third  is  the  potential  for  additive  or  synergistic  effects 
of mixtures. I will focus here on a fourth, because it challenges the core assumption 
of  regulation  toxicology,  that  high-dose  testing  is  sufficient  to  predict  low-dose  ef-
fects. A huge experimental literature amassed over decades of mechanistic research 
in endocrinology demonstrates that this assumption is fundamentally flawed and is 
highly vulnerable to missing important low-dose adverse effects. 

Paracelsus’s  observation,  above,  reflects  an  intuitively  logical  concept  that  the 
higher  the  exposure,  the  greater  the  impact.  Testing  with  high  doses,  in  this  view, 
should  reveal  any  hazards  and  do  so  more  efficiently  than  testing  with  low  doses, 
because the effects will be stronger and easier to detect. This centuries-old paradigm 
remains the central tenet of modern regulatory toxicological approaches to studying 
the health effects of chemicals. 

Paracelsus’  logic  holds  if  and  only  if  chemicals’  effects  faithfully  follow  a 
monotonic  dose-response  curve.  When  toxicologists  began  to  focus  on  potential 
health effects of chemicals classified as endocrine disruptors, endocrinologists began 
to  raise  questions  about  the  appropriateness  of  assuming  monotonicity  in  toxi-
cological  studies  of  hormonally-active  chemicals  used  in  common  household  prod-
ucts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

39 

The  basis  for  this  concern  is  that  non-monotonicity  is  a  general  characteristic  of 
hormones. This issue is so central to hormone action that it is a critical component 
of determining the dose required for hormonally active drugs; an example is Lupron 
used to treat reproductive disorders in women and prostate cancer in men, since low 
doses stimulate while high doses inhibit tumor growth. 

These  non-monotonic  curves  can  result  from  multiple  mechanisms,  which  have 
been  studied  by  endocrinologists,  pharmacologists  and  neurobiologists  for  decades. 
Hormones  and  hormone-mimicking  chemicals  act  through  receptors  in  target  cells. 
Very  low  doses  can  stimulate  the  production  of  more  receptors  (called  receptor  up- 
regulation),  resulting  in  an  increase  in  responses,  while  higher  doses  (within  the 
typical toxicological range of testing) can inhibit receptors (called receptor down-reg-
ulation),  resulting  in  a  decrease  in  responses.  The  consequence  for  gene  activity, 
which  is  regulated  by  hormone-mimicking  chemicals  binding  to  receptors,  is  that 
very  low  doses  of  these  chemicals  (in  the  case  of  a  positively-regulated  gene)  can 
up-regulate  gene  expression,  while  at  higher  doses  the  same  chemicals  down-regu-
late  gene  expression.1,15 In  addition,  myriad  hormonal  feedback  mechanisms  be-
tween  the  brain,  pituitary  gland  and  hormone  producing  organs  (thyroid  gland,  ad-
renal  glands,  ovaries,  testes)  contribute  to  the  presence  of  non-monotonic  dose-re-
sponse curves. Equally important, at high doses, hormones and hormone-mimicking 
chemicals can bind to receptors for other hormones (e.g., estrogens can interact with 
androgen and thyroid receptors), producing entirely different effects from those seen 
at low doses where only binding to estrogen receptors occurs. Also, there is non-spe-
cific  (non-receptor  mediated)  toxicity  that  can  occur  at  high  but  not  low  doses.  The 
consequence  is  that  there  are  qualitative  as  well  as  quantitative  differences  in  the 
effects of high and very low doses of endocrine disrupting chemicals. 

Notably,  EDCs  may  also  act  by  mechanisms  that  do  not  require  direct  mediation 
of  classical  hormone  receptors.  For  example,  they  also  exert  actions  upon  synthesis 
or  function  of  enzymes  that  may  be  responsible  for  the  synthesis  or  degradation  of 
hormones; on factors that interact or regulate receptors such as coregulatory factors; 
and  in  the  case  of  neurological  actions,  through  neurotransmitter  receptors.16 This 
concept  is  important  because  each  of  these  mechanisms  may  have  a  unique  dose- 
response sensitivity to an EDC, adding to the complexity of the overall shape of the 
dose-response curve. 

A  recently  published  example  of  a  non-monotonic  response  in  an  animal  model, 
with  high  biomedical  relevance  to  humans, 
involves  the  estrogenic  drug 
diethylstilbestrol (DES), once widely used to treat difficult pregnancies but removed 
from the market in 1971 because it was found to cause a rare cancer in young adult 
women who had received fetal exposure. Research has established the BPA is struc-
turally and functionally very similar to DES. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
S
R
E
Y
M
4
1
5

40 

Mice exposed perinatally to relatively high doses of DES (1000 μg/kg/day) had re-
duced  body  weight  in  adulthood,  but  a  much  lower  dose  (1  μg/kg/day)  caused  adult 
obesity (figure to right).17,18 

A similar non-monotonic response has been observed for DES effects on the devel-
oping  prostate  in  mice.19,20,21 A  traditional  high-dose  testing  regimen  with  DES 
would never have revealed these low-dose effects. 

Just as with DES, industrial chemicals that interfere with hormone signaling can-
not be expected to follow monotonic dose-response rules. Non-monotonicity has been 
reported  repeatedly  for  adverse  effects  with  a  number  of  endocrine  disrupting  com-
pounds,  including  the  bisphenol  A,  the  phthalate  DEHP,  the  pesticides,  dieldrin, 
endosulfan  and  hexachlorobenzene,  the  pesticide  metabolite  DDE,  and  arochlor 
1242, a PCB mixture.22 

The  mouse  on  the  right  received  the  extremely  low  dose  compared  to  the  control  on  the  left. 
The researchers reported no difference between control and experimental animals in either cal-
ories consumed or energy expended. 

Effects  include  strong  exacerbation  of  allergic  reactions  following  exposure  to 
DEHP  at  a  concentration  one  thousand-fold  beneath  the  current  safety  standard, 
which is based on high dose liver toxicity (figure below) 23 and increased allergic re-
sponses caused by picomolar level exposures (parts per trillion) to several persistent 
organic  pollutants.24 Cells  exposed  to  concentrations  of  these  pollutants  a  million 
times higher than the level producing the maximum response showed no effect. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.

3
S
R
E
Y
M
4
1
5

.

s
p
e
2
S
R
E
Y
M
4
1
5

41 

An experiment (figure below) with rats that involved administration of DEHP was 
explicitly  designed  to  test  the  adequacy  of  high-dose  testing.25 It  found  that  a  high 
dose  increased  estrogen  synthesizing  (aromatase)  enzyme  activity  in  the  brains  of 
neonatal male rats; a dose 100-fold lower appeared to be the ‘‘no effect dose’’, which 
is  used  to  estimate  the  dose  deemed  safe  for  human  exposure  (this  enzyme  is  in-
volved in determining sex differences in brain function). 

In the experiment above, only because the scientists broke with tradition and also 
tested  lower  doses  did  they  find  significant  down-regulation  of  aromatase  at  a  dose 
37-times  lower  than  the  putative  no  effect  dose,  an  effect  opposite  to  and 
unpredicted from only testing very high doses. 

Other  experiments  have  documented  non-monotonicity  in  rat  pituitary  cells  ex-
posed  to  pico-  through  micro-molar  levels  (parts  per  trillion  to  parts  per  billion)  of 
BPA.26,27 Acting  through  a  relatively  recently  discovered  estrogen  receptor  on  the 
surface of the cell membrane, very low picomolar concentrations of the contaminant 
increased  calcium  influx  and  activation  of  enzyme  cascades  that  dramatically  am-
plify  a  very  low-dose  signal  into  a  large  cellular  response.  The  dose-response  curve 
followed  a  strongly  non-monotonic,  ‘inverted-U’  shape,  with  the  strongest  response 
at low nanomolar levels. The bioactive concentrations of bisphenol A in these experi-
ments  were  actually  far  below  the  range  found  ubiquitously  in  human  blood  and 
urine.  Another  endpoint  that  follows  a  non-monotonic  pattern  is  human  prostate 
cancer cell proliferation in response to bisphenol A,28 with the peak response occur-
ring  exactly  within  the  range  of  exposure  of  men  to  bisphenol  A  based  on  biomoni-
toring studies.1,29 

Research  over  the  past  20  years  has  identified  large  numbers  of  endocrine  dis-
rupting contaminants that are capable of mimicking or disrupting hormone function. 
Biomonitoring  studies  have  established  that  many  are  widespread  contaminants  in 
people. Yet regulatory toxicology as it has been practiced for decades, and as it has 
been used to set public health exposure standards, ignores non-monotonicity despite 
the  fact  that,  similar  to  hormones,  all  should  be  expected  to  display  non-monotonic 
dose-response patterns. 

To  date  the  Congressionally-mandated  effort  by  the  EPA,  called  the  Endocrine 
Disruptor  Screening  Program  (EDSP),  has  not  acknowledged  these  common,  indeed 
standard patterns from endocrinology, and hence it is on course to select methodolo-
gies  that  will  remain  blind  to  hazards  posed  by  low  doses  that  lead  to  adverse  ef-
fects that only direct low-dose testing can detect. 

An  effective  EDSP  is  required  to  protect  Americans  from  exposure  to  industrial 
chemicals  that  can  disrupt  the  endocrine  system,  which  must  function  properly  for 
normal development to occur as well as for normal adult function. Significant expo-
sure to these chemicals is through the food supply, which is the domain of the FDA, 
but  exposure  also  occurs  through  drinking  water  and  air,  the  domain  of  the  EPA. 
The  American  public  depends  upon  these  regulatory  agencies  to  set  public  health 
standards  sufficient  to  avoid  harmful  exposures.  But  until  the  FDA  and  EPA  move 
beyond outdated concepts, the public health standards that emerge from their regu-
latory deliberations will continue to produce a disconnect between what human bio-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
4
S
R
E
Y
M
4
1
5

42 

monitoring,  epidemiological  and  mechanistic  endocrine  studies  in  animals  reveal 
and what their regulatory decisionmakers allow. 

Were  the  health  implications  of  these  decisions  inconsequential,  this  clash  be-
tween toxicology and endocrinology would appropriately remain buried in academia. 
But the range of health conditions now plausibly linked to endocrine-disrupting con-
taminants—including  prostate  cancer,  breast  cancer,  attention  deficit  hyperactivity 
disorder,  infertility  (including  both  male  and  female  reproductive  problems),  mis-
carriage,  and  most  recently,  hyper-allergic  diseases,  obesity  and  type  2  diabetes— 
makes  it  imperative  that  the  clash  between  basic  endocrinologists  and  regulatory 
toxicologists  becomes  public  and  addressed  by  regulatory  agencies.  These  diseases 
are  major  contributors  to  American’s  steadily  increasing  disease  burden  and  to  the 
escalating cost of health care. Extensive, careful and replicable animal research sug-
gests  that  numerous  industrial  chemicals  to  which  people  are  exposed  every  day, 
but  which  have  not  been  adequately  studied  for  health  effects  in  humans,  may  be 
significant contributors to these adverse health trends. 

As endocrine and reproductive systems are highly conserved between animals and 
humans, there is no doubt that basic research results on EDCs are directly applica-
ble  to  human  health.  Modernizing  relevant  health  standards  by  incorporating 
endocrinological principles could help reduce a significant portion of the human dis-
ease  burden,  but  this  will  require  regulatory  decisionmakers  to  begin  asking  sci-
entifically appropriate questions. The soaring health care crisis in the U.S. demands 
that the regulatory apparatus of Federal Government get this right. Blind obedience 
to 16th century dogma will not solve the problem. 
References 

1 L.N.  Vandenberg,  R.  Hauser,  M.  Marcus,  N.  Olea,  W.V.  Welshons.  Repro.  Tox.  24,  139–177 

2 M.A. Gallo, History and Scope of Toxicology, in C.D. Kaassen, Casarett & Doull’s Toxicology, 

5th Ed. (McGraw-Hill, New York, NY, 1996), p.4. 

3 The  1996  Food  Quality  Protection  Act  mandated  establishment  of  the  Endocrine  Disruptor 

Screening Program. http://www.epa.gov/scipoly/oscpendo/. 
4 A. Gore. Experimental Biol. and Medicine 233, 3 (2008). 
5 R. Hauser, J.D. Meeker, S. Duty, M.J. Silva, A.M. Calafat. Epidemiology 17, 682–691 (2006). 
6 S Swan et al., Environ. Health Perspect. 113, 1056–1061 (2005). 
7 R.W. Stahlhut, E. van Wijngaarden, T.D. Dye, S. Cook, S.H. Swan. Environ. Health Perspect. 

(2007). 

A) 73, 478–480 (2005). 

917 (2007). 

18 R.R. Newbold, W. Padilla-Banks, R.J. Snyder, W.N. Jefferson. Mol. Nutr. Food Res. 51, 912– 

19 F.S. vom Saal, B.G. Timms, M.M. Motano, P. Palanza, K.A. Thayer, S.C. Nagel et al., Proc. 

Natl. Acad. Sci. USA. 94, 2056–2061 (1997). 

20 C. Gupta. Proc. Soc. Exp. Biol. Med. 244, 61–68 (2000). 
21 B.G.  Timms,  K.L.  Howdeshell,  L.  Barton,  S.  Bradley,  C.A.  Richter,  F.S.  vom  Saal.  Proc. 

Natl. Acad. Sci. 102, 7014–7019 (2005). 

22 J.P.  Myers,  W.  Hessler,  EnvironmentalHealthNews.org,  30  April  2007,  http:// 

www.environmentalhealthnews.org/sciencebackground/2007/2007-0415nmdrc.html. 

23 H.  Takano,  R.  Yanagisawa,  K-I.  Inoue,  T.  Ichinose,  K.  Sadakano,  T.  Yoshikawa.  Environ. 

Health Perspect. 114, 1266–1269 (2006). 

24 S.  Narita,  R.M.  Goldblum,  C.S.  Watson,  E.G.  Brooks,  D.M.  Estes,  E.M.  Curran,  T.  Midoro- 

Horiuti. Environ. Health Perspect. 115, 48–52 (2007). 

25 A.J.M.  Andrade,  S.W.  Grande,  C.E.  Talsness,  K.  Grote,  I.  Chahoud.  Toxicology  227,  185– 

26 A.L.  Wosniak,  N.N.  Bulayeva,  C.S.  Watson.  Environ.  Health  Perspect.  113,  431–439  (2005). 
27 A.  Zsarnofsky,  H.H.  Lee,  H.S.  Wang,  S.M.  Belcher.  Endocrinology  146,  5388–5396  (2005). 
28 Y.B.  Wetherill,  C.E.  Petra,  K.R.  Monk,  A.  Puga,  K.E.  Knudsen,  Molec.  Cancer  Therapeut. 

29 A.M.  Calafat,  X.  Ye,  L-Y.  Wong,  J.A.  Reidy,  L.L.  Needham.  Environ.  Health  Perspect.,  in 

7, 515–24 (2002). 

press, doi:10.1289/ehp.10605 (2008). 

192 (2006). 

115, 876–882 (2007). 

Perspect. 114: 1865–1871. 

8 S.H. Swan et al., Environ. Health Perspect. 111, 1478–1484 (2003). 
9 B.C.  Blount,  J.L.  Pirkle,  J.D.  Osterioh,  L.  Valentin-Blasini,  K.L.  Caldwell.  Environ.  Health 

10 M.E. Turyk, H.A. Anderson, V.W. Persky. Environ. Health. Perspect. 115, 1197 (2007). 
11 T. Otake et al., Environ. Res. 105, 240 (Oct, 2007). 
12 J.D. Meeker, L. Altshul, R. Hauser. Environ. Res. 104, 296 (June, 2007). 
13 D-H. Lee, I-K. Lee, K. Song, M. Steffes, W. Toscano, B.A. Baker, D. R. Jacobs. Diabetes Care 

29, 1638–1644 (2006). 

14 D-H.  Lee,  I-K.  Lee,  S-H.  Jin,  M  Steffes,  D.R.  Jacobs,  Jr.  Diabetes  Care  30,  662–628  (2007). 
15 K.L.  Medlock,  C.R.  Lyttle,  N.  Kelepouris,  E.D.  Newman,  D.M.  Sheehan.  1991.  Proc.  Soc. 

Exp. Biol. Med. 196, 293–300 (1991). 

16 A.C.  Gore.  Introduction  to  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals,  in  A.C.  Gore,  Endocrine-dis-
rupting chemicals: From basic research to clinical practice (Humana Press, New Jersey), pp. 3– 
8 (2007). 

17 R.R.  Newbold,  E.  Padilla-Banks,  R.J.  Snyder,  W.N.  Jefferson.  Birth  Defects  Research  (Part 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

43 

Senator KLOBUCHAR [presiding]. Thank you, Dr. Myers. 
Ms. Hitchcock? 
STATEMENT OF ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK, PUBLIC HEALTH 

ADVOCATE, U.S. PUBLIC INTEREST RESEARCH GROUP 

Ms. HITCHCOCK. Good morning. Members of the Committee, I am 
Liz  Hitchcock,  Public  Health  Advocate  for  the  U.S.  Public  Interest 
Research Group. I have submitted longer written testimony for the 
record,  but  I  would  like  to  cover  three  important  points  in  this 
hearing. 

One,  the  hazards  of  bisphenol  A  and  phthalates  are  well  docu-

mented and pose a special danger to children. 

Two, other countries, a number of states, and retailers are acting 

in the absence of Federal action on these chemicals. 

Three,  the  Federal  Government  should  regulate  these  and  other 

toxic chemicals to protect our children’s health. 

To begin, we would like to commend the Committee for its efforts 
to improve U.S. product safety, including the recent Senate passage 
of  the  CPSC  Reform  Act.  When  reconciled  with  the  House  bill,  it 
will  take  long  overdue  steps  forward  in  protecting  America’s  chil-
dren from unsafe products. We encourage the conference committee 
to  take  the  strongest  parts  of  each  bill.  In  particular,  we  believe 
that  the  Senate  bill’s  provisions  addressing  the  toxic  hazards  of 
lead  and  phthalates  in  children’s  products  are  important  steps  to 
take preventable hazards out of the marketplace. 

First,  the  hazards  of  bisphenol  A  and  phthalates  are  well  docu-
mented, as Dr. Myers and others have told you in their testimony. 
For  22  years,  U.S.  PIRG  Trouble  In  Toyland  safety  reports  have 
identified  hazards  to  a  population  that  is  notorious  for  putting  ev-
erything  in  their  mouths,  small  children.  We  have  increased  our 
focus in the last 10 years on chronic hazards posed by unnecessary 
exposure to lead, phthalates, and chemicals known to be toxic. 

In  1998,  we  joined  a  number  of  public  interest  groups  in  peti-
tioning the CPSC to ban polyvinyl chloride in all toys intended for 
children under the age of 5 because of the potential health hazards 
posed by phthalates. In 2003, the CPSC denied our petition. 

Phthalates  are  widely  used  and  can  be  found  in  many  children’s 
products, including teethers, bath books, raincoats, and as Senator 
Klobuchar pointed out, rubber duckies. 

Last  year,  U.S.  PIRG’s  partner  organization,  Environment  Cali-
fornia,  tested  five  of  the  most  popular  baby  bottle  brands  on  the 
market. Our researchers found that the bottles tested from all five 
brands  leached  bisphenol  A  at  levels  found  to  cause  harm  in  nu-
merous laboratory studies. Scientists have linked very low doses of 
bisphenol  A  to  cancers,  to  impaired  immune  function,  to  the  early 
onset  of  puberty,  obesity,  diabetes,  and  hyperactivity,  among  other 
problems. 

Phthalates  have  been  linked  to  a  number  of  serious  health  im-
pacts,  including  reproductive  defects,  birth  deformities,  liver  and 
thyroid damage, neurological impacts, and even cancer. 

In  April,  the  National  Toxicology  Program  at  NIH  finally  ac-

knowledged health concerns about children’s exposure to BPA. 

Given  the  significant  health  concerns  associated  with  both 
bisphenol  A  and  with  phthalates,  taking  a  precautionary  approach 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

44 

toward  the  use  of  these  chemicals  just  makes  sense.  In  other 
words,  if  there  is  evidence  that  these  chemicals  cause  harm  and  if 
we  have  safer  alternatives  with  which  to  replace  them,  then  why 
would we not use precaution and restrict their use? 

Second, other countries and a number of States and some manu-
facturers  are  leading  the  way  in  taking  action  on  these  chemicals. 
For  example,  the  European  Union  has  had  a  policy  restricting  the 
use  of  phthalates  since  1999.  At  least  14  countries  have  also  re-
stricted  the  use  of  phthalates  to  protect  children’s  health.  In  the 
United  States,  only  California  and  Washington  State  have  enacted 
phthalate  legislation.  A  Vermont  bill  is  on  the  Governor’s  desk 
right  now.  But  at  least  a  dozen  States  have  either  introduced  or 
are considering introducing legislation to restrict phthalate use. 

In  the  private  sector,  several  leading  manufacturers  of  toys  and 
baby  products  in  the  U.S.  have  stopped  using  phthalates  over  the 
last  few  years.  In  addition,  Wal-Mart  and  Toys  ‘‘R’’  Us  announced 
early this year that they will begin phasing out children’s toys con-
taining the chemical in the coming months. 

Last  month,  the  Canadian  Government  declared  bisphenol  A 
toxic  under  Canadian  law,  triggering  a  ban  on  baby  bottles  with 
that  chemical.  There  are  current  efforts  in  five  State  legislatures 
to  restrict  uses  of  BPA.  Senator  Chuck  Schumer  has  introduced  S. 
2928 banning BPA in all products intended for infants and children 
up age 7, a bill that U.S. PIRG supports. 

Consumers  cannot  be  expected  to  do  it  alone  and  cannot  expect 
all  industry  and  retailers  to  take  the  right  voluntary  steps.  The 
Federal  Government  should  regulate  these  and  other  toxic  chemi-
cals to protect our children’s health. 

First,  the  Federal  Government  should  take  action  based  on  the 
overwhelming  weight  of  evidence  showing  that  chemicals  like 
phthalates and bisphenol A may harm human health. 

U.S.  chemicals  policy  should  be  reformed  to  require  manufactur-
ers to provide all hazard and health impact information to the Fed-
eral Government so we can begin to assess the thousands of chemi-
cals currently on the market for which we have little or inadequate 
data. 

And  finally,  the  conference  committee  and  the  Congress  should 
pass a final version of the CPSC reform bill that includes the Fein-
stein  Amendment  banning  phthalates  in  children’s  products.  The 
amendment  will  serve  to  significantly  curb  children’s  routes  of  ex-
posure to these reproductive toxicants. 

We commend the Committee for conducting this important hear-
ing and we hope that you find our comments helpful. We would be 
happy  to  discuss  other  possible  actions  under  the  Committee’s  ju-
risdiction  to  protect  consumers  from  chronic  and  developmental 
hazards from unnecessary exposure to toxic chemicals in consumer 
products. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Hitchcock follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK, PUBLIC HEALTH ADVOCATE, 

U.S. PUBLIC INTEREST RESEARCH GROUP 

Chairman  Pryor,  Senator  Sununu,  Members  of  the  Committee:  I  am  Elizabeth 
Hitchcock, Public Health Advocate for the U.S. Public Interest Research Group. U.S. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

45 

PIRG is the federation of state PIRGs, which are non-profit, non-partisan public in-
terest advocacy organizations with one million members across the country. 

We  are  pleased  to  present  our  views  at  this  Oversight  Hearing  on  Bisphenol-A, 
Phthalates,  Consumer  Products  and  Consumer  Health.  The  state  PIRGs  have  long 
been  concerned  with  the  important  issues  of  toxics  in  consumer  products,  and  the 
ability of the Federal Government to protect all of us, but particularly our children, 
from preventable hazards. 

Since 1986, we have conducted toy safety research and education projects to avoid 
preventable deaths and injuries. While our annual Trouble In Toyland toy safety re-
ports 1 have  emphasized  the  hazards  posed  by  choking  on  small  parts,  we  have  ex-
panded  the  report  in  the  past  decade  to  focus  on  the  chronic  hazards  posed  by  un-
necessary exposure to lead,2 phthalates and other chemicals known to be toxic. 
Summary 

First,  Mr.  Chairman,  we  commend  you  for  your  efforts  to  improve  U.S.  product 
safety,  including  the  recent  Senate  passage  of  your  bill,  the  CPSC  Reform  Act. 
When  it  is  reconciled  with  the  House  bill,  it  will  take  significant  and  long  overdue 
steps  forward  in  protecting  America’s  children  from  unsafe  products.  We  encourage 
the conference committee to take the strongest parts of each bill. 

In particular, we believe that the Senate bill’s provisions addressing the toxic haz-
ards  of  lead  and  phthalates  in  children’s  products  are  important  steps  to  take  pre-
ventable hazards out of the marketplace. 

Recent  headlines  about  the  long  overdue  acknowledgement  of  the  National  Toxi-
cology  Program  of  the  U.S.  National  Institutes  of  Health  of  health  concerns  about 
children’s  exposure  to  Bisphenol-A  (BPA)  have  raised  concerns  among  consumers 
about this and other toxic chemicals. 

In  general,  U.S.  PIRG’s  policy  recommendations  concerning  toxic  chemicals  like 

Bisphenol-A and phthalates are that the Federal Government should: 

• Phase  Out  Dangerous  Chemicals.  The  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency 
should take action based on the overwhelming weight of evidence showing that 
chemicals like phthalates and bisphenol-A may harm human health. 

• The  U.S.  should  phaseout  the  use  of  Bisphenol-A,  especially  in  children’s  prod-
ucts. Due to the possible increased risks to small children and pregnant women, 
we strongly urge the removal of BPA from all products intended to contact food. 
• Reform U.S. Chemicals Policy. Manufacturers should be required to provide all 
hazard  and  health  impact  information  to  the  EPA  so  the  agency  can  begin  to 
assess the thousands of chemicals currently on the market for which it has little 
or inadequate data. 

• The Consumer Product Safety Commission should protect consumers, for exam-
ple,  by  labeling  these  products  with  the  names  of  the  chemicals  they  contain 
to  allow  parents  to  choose  less  toxic  products,  among  other  protective  actions. 
• The conference committee and the Congress should pass a final version of CPSC 
reform  legislation  including  the  Feinstein  amendment  banning  phthalates  in 
children’s  products  (incorporated  as  Section  40  of  H.R.  4040,  the  CPSC  Reform 
Act, as passed by the Senate).3 

1. Phthalates Are Ubiquitous With Exposure Linked To Health Effects 

Phthalates  are  a  family  of  chemicals,  including  diethyl  phthalate  (DEP), 
diethylhexyl  phthalate  (DEHP),  dibutyl  phthalate  (DBP),  butyl  benzyl  phthalate 
(BBP),  diisodecyl  phthalate  (DIDP),  diisononyl  phthalate  (DINP),  di-n-octyl  phthal-
ate (DNOP), and many other distinct types. The polyvinyl chloride (PVC) plastic in-
dustry  uses  large  amounts  of  phthalates  as  additives  to  improve  the  flexibility  of 
its  products,  including  home  siding,  flooring,  furniture,  food  packaging,  toys,  cloth-
ing,  car  interiors,  and  medical  equipment,  including  IV  bags.  In  addition,  other 
manufacturers use phthalates in personal care products such as soap, shampoo, deo-
dorant, hand lotion, nail polish, cosmetics, and perfume, as well as industrial prod-
ucts like solvents, lubricants, glue, paint, sealants, insecticides, detergent, and ink.4 
Phthalates  are  pervasive  in  the  environment  and  in  human  bodies.  In  2000,  the 
Centers  for  Disease  Control  (CDC)  found  high  levels  of  phthalates  and  their  trans-
formation products (known as metabolites) in every one of 289 adult Americans test-
ed,  including  women  of  childbearing  age.5 Larger  CDC  studies  in  2003 6 and  2005 7 
again found high levels of phthalates in almost every person tested. 

Numerous  scientists  have  documented  the  potential  health  effects  of  exposure  to 
phthalates in the womb or at crucial stages of development, including (but not lim-
ited to): 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

46 

• Reproductive  Defects.  Scientists  have  demonstrated  links  between  exposure  to 
phthalates  in  the  womb  with  abnormal  genital  development  in  baby  boys  and 
disruption  in  sexual  development.8 In  October  2005,  an  independent  panel  of 
scientists convened by the National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences 
and  the  National  Toxicology  Program  released  its  review  of  one  type  of  phthal-
ate,  diethylhexyl  phthalate  (DEHP).  The  panel  confirmed  that  DEHP  poses  a 
risk to reproductive and developmental health.9 
• Premature  Delivery.  A  study  published  in  November  2003  suggests  a  link  be-
tween  exposure  to  phthalates  and  pre-term  birth.  The  scientists  found 
phthalates and their breakdown products in the blood of newborn infants, with 
higher levels leading to a higher incidence of premature delivery.10 
• Early  Onset  Puberty.  One  study  of  Puerto  Rican  girls  suggests  that  phthalates 
may  be  playing  a  role  in  trends  toward  earlier  sexual  maturity.11 Scientists 
found  that  levels  of  DEHP  were  seven  times  higher  in  girls  with  premature 
breast development than levels in normal girls. 
• Lower  Sperm  Counts.  In  2003,  Drs.  Susan  Duty  and  Russ  Hauser  of  the  Har-
vard School of Public Health published one of the first studies linking phthalate 
exposure  with  harm  to  human  reproductive  health.12 Men  who  had  monobutyl 
or monobenzyl phthalate in their urine tended to have lower sperm counts, with 
the highest concentrations leading to the lowest sperm counts. 

2. History of Efforts to Ban Phthalates in Children’s Toys and Products 

In  1998,  the  state  PIRGs  and  several  other  environmental  and  consumer  groups 
petitioned the Consumer Product Safety Commission, asking the agency to ban poly-
vinyl  chloride  (PVC)  plastic  in  all  toys  intended  for  children  under  the  age  of  five 
because  of  the  potential  health  hazards  posed  by  diisononyl  phthalates  (DINP). 
While noting its position that ‘‘few if any children are at risk from the chemical,’’ 13 
in December 1998 CPSC asked the toy and baby products industry to remove DINP 
from  soft  rattles  and  teethers.  About  90  percent  of  manufacturers  indicated  at  that 
time  that  they  had  removed  or  would  remove  DINP  from  soft  rattles  and  teethers 
by early 1999. CPSC staff also asked the industry to find a substitute for phthalates 
in  other  products  intended  for  children  under  3  years  old  that  are  likely  to  be 
mouthed or chewed.14 

CPSC also convened a Chronic Hazard Advisory Panel to examine the existing sci-
entific  data  concerning  the  potential  risks  of  phthalates  to  humans.  In  June  2001, 
the  panel  concluded  that  while  the  majority  of  children  would  not  be  adversely  af-
fected  by  diisononyl  phthalate,  ‘‘there  may  be  a  DINP  risk  for  any  young  children 
who  routinely  mouth  DINP-plasticized  toys  for  seventy-five  minutes  per  day  or 
more.’’ 15 

Unfortunately,  in  February  2003,  CPSC  denied  the  state  PIRGs’  petition  to  ban 

PVC plastic in toys for young children.16 

Some  manufacturers  are  beginning  to  label  their  baby  products  and  toys  as 
‘‘phthalate-free,’’  which  should  provide  parents  the  information  they  need  to  make 
educated purchasing decisions. The U.S. government, however, does not regulate the 
‘‘phthalate-free’’  label  or  ensure  that  products  labeled  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  actually  do 
not  contain  phthalates.  Since  the  U.S.  government  has  not  established  any  guide-
lines  for  what  the  label  means,  or  established  any  standards  for  the  phthalate  con-
tent in children’s products, consumers can only assume that it means phthalates are 
not present in the item. 

In  2005,  to  test  the  reliability  of  the  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  label,  U.S.  PIRG  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  Chicago,  Illinois  to  test  eight  soft  plastic  toys 
labeled  as  not  containing  phthalates.  Of  the  eight  toys  tested,  six  contained  detect-
able  levels  of  phthalates.17 Based  on  these  results,  we  asked  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission (FTC) to investigate whether manufacturers’ use of the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ 
label  constitutes  unfair  or  deceptive  marketing  practices  when  the  product  actually 
contains phthalates.18 

With  the  results  of  the  FTC  investigation  still  pending,  we  once  again  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  the  fall  of  2006  to  test  10  soft  plastic  toys  la-
beled  as  not  containing  phthalates.19 Of  the  10  toys  tested,  just  two  contained  de-
tectable  levels  of  phthalates.  Some  of  the  items  that  tested  positive  for  phthalates 
in the first year did not in the second. While this may be good news for consumers, 
nothing in U.S. law has changed to hold manufacturers accountable to their ‘‘phthal-
ate-free’’  label  or  require  them  to  stop  using  phthalates.  Consumers  still  have  no 
guarantee that the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ products they purchase truly are phthalate-free, 
as evidenced by our test results. 

A number of individual states and other countries have taken action, however, to 
protect children’s health. In 1999, the European Union (EU) imposed temporary re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

47 

strictions on the use of six phthalates in toys and childcare products.20 This ban be-
came permanent in January 2006. The EU banned three phthalates classified as re-
productive toxicants—diethylhexyl phthalate (DEHP), butyl benzyl phthalate (BBP), 
and  dibutyl  phthalate  (DBP)—in  all  toys  and  childcare  articles.  The  EU  banned 
three other phthalates—DINP, diisodecyl phthalate (DIDP) and di-n-octyl phthalate 
(DNOP)—in  toys  and  childcare  articles  intended  for  children  under  3  years  of  age 
and that can be put in the mouth.21 

In the past year, California and Washington State have banned phthalates in chil-
dren’s  products;  Minnesota  and  Vermont  both  have  bills  on  their  Governor’s  desk; 
and  Rhode  Island,  New  York  and  Massachusetts  are  considering  similar  measures. 
In  March  2008,  the  U.S.  Senate  overwhelmingly  passed  the  CPSC  Reform  Act, 
with  an  amendment  by  Senator  Feinstein  that  eliminates  phthalates  in  children’s 
products  and  child  care  articles,  which  will  serve  to  significantly  curb  children’s 
routes  of  exposure  to  these  reproductive  toxicants.  We  urge  the  conferees  to  retain 
the phthalate provision, and its state savings clause, in the final bill. 
3. Bisphenol-A: Developmental, Neural and Reproductive Toxicant 

Scientists have linked very low doses of bisphenol-A to cancers, impaired immune 
function,  early  onset  of  puberty,  obesity,  diabetes,  and  hyperactivity,  among  other 
problems. 

We  know  that  bisphenol-A  can  leach  from  plastic  containers  and  cans  and  into 
food  and  beverages,  leading  to  potentially  significant  human  exposures.  A  recent 
study released by the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) found 
that  BPA  was  in  the  blood  of  95  percent  of  humans  they  tested.  The  median  level 
of BPA found in humans is higher than the level that causes adverse effects in ani-
mal studies. BPA raises particularly troubling health questions because it can affect 
the  endocrine  system,  mimicking  the  effects  of  estrogen  in  the  body.  Experiments 
in animals and with human cells strongly suggest exposures typical in the U.S. pop-
ulation  may  increase  susceptibility  to  breast  and  prostate  cancer,  reproductive  sys-
tem abnormalities, and, for exposure in the womb and early childhood, a host of de-
velopmental  problems.  Concerns  about  early  life  exposures  also  extend  to  early 
onset of puberty in females, potential prostate problems in males, and obesity. 

Last  year,  U.S.  PIRG’s  partner  organization,  Environment  California,  tested  five 
of the most popular baby bottle brands on the market (Avent, Dr. Brown’s, Evenflo, 
Gerber, and Playtex) to determine the amount of leaching from each bottle. Our re-
searchers  found  that  the  bottles  tested  from  all  five  brands  leached  bisphenol-A  at 
levels found to cause harm in numerous laboratory studies.22 

The  current  U.S.  Environmental  Protection  Agency  daily  upper  limit  for  BPA,  50 
micrograms  per  kilogram  of  body  weight,  is  based  on  industry-sponsored  experi-
ments  conducted  in  the  1980s.  Some  animal  studies  show  adverse  health  affects 
from  exposure  of  only  0.025  micrograms  per  kilogram  of  body  weight,  yet  a 
polycarbonate  baby  bottle  with  room  temperature  water  can  leach  2  micrograms  of 
BPA per liter. A 3-month-old baby drinking from a polycarbonate bottle may be ex-
posed to as much as 11 micrograms per kilogram of body weight daily. 

Aside from polycarbonate plastic bottles, BPA is also a food additive approved by 
the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA),  commonly  used  in  the  coatings  for  the 
inside  of  food  cans.  But  a  recent  report  by  the  National  Toxicology  Program  (NTP) 
questioned  previous  FDA  findings  that  BPA  is  safe  for  such  applications.  Their  re-
port,  issued  on  April  15,  2008,  expressed  ‘‘some  concern’’  based  on  animal  studies 
that  BPA  might  affect  the  neurological  systems  and  behavior  of  infants  and  chil-
dren. Among its conclusions, the NTP report states that, ‘‘the possibility that human 
development may be altered by bisphenol-A at current exposure levels cannot be dis-
missed.’’ 
Independent  Science  Shows  Harmful  Effects  from  BPA,  while  Industry  Science 

Shows None 

A  recently-published  review  of  scientific  studies  shows  that,  in  the  last  7  years 
(through  November  2005),  151  studies  on  the  low-dose  effects  of  BPA  have  been 
published.23 None  of  the  12  studies  funded  by  the  chemical  industry  reported  ad-
verse effects at low levels, whereas 128 of 139 government-funded studies found ef-
fects.  These  many  studies  were  conducted  in  academic  laboratories  in  the  U.S.  and 
abroad.  Even  the  12  industry-funded  studies  have  flaws,  however.  Of  the  industry 
studies,  two  had  its  positive  control  fail—an  indication  that  the  entire  experiment 
had failed, not that BPA had not caused an effect. 

Another industry study concluded BPA caused no effect, but an independent anal-
ysis of the experiment’s data by scientists convened by the National Toxicology Pro-
gram  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  &  Human  Services  concluded  that  in  fact 
there was an effect. Industry scientists had misreported their own results. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

48 

The  chemical  industry  relies  on  an  incomplete  review  of  scientific  studies  by  an 
effort funded by the American Plastics Council at the Harvard Center for Risk Anal-
ysis. The panel funded by the American Plastics Council only considered 19 studies 
in  concluding  in  2004  that  the  weight  of  the  evidence  for  low-dose  effects  of  BPA 
was  weak.24 As  of  November  2005,  there  were  151  published  studies  on  the  low- 
dose effects of BPA. 

The  last  U.S.  EPA  risk  assessment  for  BPA  was  based  on  research  conducted  in 
the 1980s and did not consider that BPA was a chemical estrogen. The most recent 
risk  assessment  of  BPA  was  based  on  a  comprehensive  review  of  the  scientific  lit-
erature  conducted  in  1998  by  the  European  Union,  with  some  selected  articles 
added through 2001, at which time few of the current 151 low-dose BPA studies had 
been published. The most recent review of scientific studies shows effects from expo-
sure  to  BPA  at  levels  significantly  below  the  current  ‘‘safe  exposure’’  level  estab-
lished by the U.S. based on experiments conducted prior to 1988. 
4. History of Efforts to Regulate Bisphenol-A 

In April 2008, the National Toxicology Program of the U.S. National Institutes of 
Health finally acknowledged health concerns about children’s exposure to BPA. Un-
fortunately, it is unclear whether this determination will lead to any Federal policy 
changes to protect children from BPA. On April 18th, the Canadian Government de-
clared  BPA  ‘‘toxic’’  under  Canadian  Law,  triggering  a  ban  on  BPA  baby  bottles  in 
Canada. There are current efforts in state legislatures in California, Massachusetts, 
Illinois,  New  York  and  Rhode  Island  to  restrict  uses  of  the  chemical.  On  April  29, 
Senator  Chuck  Schumer  introduced  S.  2928  banning  BPA  in  all  products  intended 
for  infants  and  children  up  to  age  7.  Senators  Boxer,  Clinton,  Durbin,  Feinstein, 
Kerry  and  Menendez  are  co-sponsors  of  the  bill,  which  U.S.  PIRG  supports.  The 
U.S. Food and Drug Administration announced it would review its regulatory policy 
on BPA. The FDA’s reliance on two industry studies finding BPA safe, despite over 
100  independent  scientific  studies  linking  the  chemical  to  an  array  of  illnesses,  in-
cluding breast and prostate cancer and obesity, is the subject of a Congressional in-
vestigation  headed  by  Chairman  John  Dingell  of  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce 
Committee. 

In  addition,  some  manufacturers  and  retailers  are  taking  action  on  the  chemical. 
Playtex  Infant  Care  announced  it  will  stop  selling  products  made  with  BPA  by  the 
end  of  the  year  and  will  give  one  million  free  samples  of  new  BPA-free  products  to 
potential customers. Wal-Mart and CVS announced they are phasing out BPA baby 
bottles in U.S. stores. Nalgene announced it would no longer use plastic made with 
BPA in its water bottles. 
5. U.S. PIRG’s Policy Recommendations 

Consumers  cannot  be  expected  to  do  it  alone—as  the  thousands  of  harmful  and 
untested  chemicals  currently  on  the  market  pose  a  super-human  challenge  to  com-
pletely avoid exposure. The U.S. Government must act in a manner that assists par-
ents,  and  ensure  that  products  on  the  market  are  not  potentially  harmful  for  chil-
dren. 

A. Phase Out Dangerous Chemicals. The U.S. Environmental Protection Agency 
should take action based on the overwhelming weight of evidence showing that 
chemicals  like  phthalates  and  bisphenol-A  may  harm  human  health.  The 
United  States  should  phaseout  the  use  of  these  chemicals—especially  in  chil-
dren’s products. Until the U.S. Government acts, state governments should con-
tinue to fill the regulatory gap and support policies to phaseout these chemicals 
as well. CPSC should ban the use of phthalates in all toys and products for chil-
dren 5 years old and under, and the U.S. should phaseout the use of Bisphenol- 
A,  especially  in  children’s  products.  The  Federal  Government  should  study  the 
health  effects  of  BPA  exposure  in  all  age  groups  and  pregnant  women,  and 
should focus on the products that have the greatest potential for causing human 
harm.  Due  to  the  possible  increased  risks  to  small  children  and  pregnant 
women, we strongly urge the removal of BPA from all products intended to con-
tact food. 
B.  Reform  U.S.  Chemicals  Policy.  Currently,  manufacturers  can  put  chemicals 
on the market without proving that they are safe. Manufacturers should be re-
quired  to  provide  all  hazard  and  health  impact  information  to  the  EPA  so  the 
agency can begin to assess the thousands of chemicals currently on the market 
for  which  it  has  little  or  inadequate  data.  Next,  manufacturers  of  chemicals 
should  be  required  to  conduct  an  alternatives  analysis  to  determine  if  they  are 
really  using  the  least  hazardous  chemical  for  each  application.  Finally,  EPA 
must  have  the  authority  to  ban  or  restrict  the  use  of  a  chemical  if  it  can  harm 
human health. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

49 

C.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  Should  Protect  Consumers.  The  Con-
sumer  Product  Safety  Commission  (CPSC)  has  an  obligation  to  protect  con-
sumers  from  dangerous  products.  The  CPSC  should  first  label  these  products 
with  the  names  of  the  chemicals  they  contain  to  allow  parents  to  choose  less 
toxic  products.  Second,  the  CPSC  should  take  the  precautionary  approach  and 
require  manufacturers  to  remove  chemicals  that  may  pose  a  particular  threat 
to fetuses, infants and children, particularly when the chemical is not necessary 
for the product to function according to design. In addition, CPSC and the Fed-
eral  Trade  Commission  should  look  into  manufacturers’  use  of  the  ‘‘phthalate- 
free’’  label  and  take  action  against  manufacturers  that  may  be  misleading  con-
sumers. 
D.  The  conference  committee  and  the  Congress  should  pass  a  final  version  of 
CPSC reform legislation including the Feinstein amendment banning phthalates 
in children’s products (incorporated as Section 40 of H.R. 4040 as passed by the 
Senate). The amendment will: 
• Prohibit the use of phthalates (any combination of certain listed chemicals in 
concentrations  exceeding  0.1  percent)  in  any  children’s  product  or  child  care 
article. 

• Require manufacturers to use the least toxic alternative to phthalates. 
• Prohibit the use of certain harmful alternatives—including substances known 
to  be,  likely  to  be,  or  suggestive  of  being  carcinogens;  and  reproductive  toxi-
cants identified as causing either birth defects, reproductive harm, or develop-
mental harm. 

• The  amendment  also  includes  an  important  ‘‘savings  clause’’  that  would  pre-
vent  Federal  preemption  of  stronger  state  laws  regulating  phthalates  in  toys 
or other product categories. 

Conclusion 

We commend you, Mr. Chairman, for conducting this important hearing. We hope 
that you find our comments helpful. We look forward to working with you and your 
committee  staff  to  move  legislation  addressing  these  concerns  forward.  We  would 
also  be  happy  to  discuss  other  possible  actions  under  the  Committee’s  jurisdiction 
to protect consumers from the chronic and developmental hazards from unnecessary 
exposure  to  toxic  chemicals  like  Bisphenol-A  and  phthalates  in  a  variety  of  con-
sumer products. Thank you. 
Endnotes 

1 These  reports  and  other  information  about  toy  safety  are  available  at  our  website 

www.toysafety.net. Our main website is www.uspirg.org. 

2 Lead, of course, can also pose acute hazards, at the levels (up to 99 percent by weight) found 

in toy jewelry. 

3 The  CPSC  Reform  Act  was  approved  in  Committee  as  S.  2045  (Pryor-Inouye)  and  a  sub-
stitute was brought to the floor as S. 2663 (Pryor-Inouye-Stevens-Collins). The Senate bill’s text 
was  then  substituted  for  that  of  the  House  bill  and  re-numbered  on  passage  as  H.R.  4040.  The 
Feinstein phthalates amendment (Section 40) was accepted on voice vote on the floor. 

4 Phthalate  Esters  Panel  of  the  American  Chemistry  Council,  What  are  Phthalates?, 
downloaded from www.phthalates.org on 14 April 2004; Catherine Dorey, Greenpeace, Chemical 
Legacy: Contamination of the Child, October 2003. 

5 BC Blount et al., ‘‘Levels of Seven Urinary Phthalate Metabolites in a Human Reference Pop-

ulation,’’ Environmental Health Perspectives 108: 979–982, 2000. 

6 Manori J. Silva et al., ‘‘Urinary Levels of Seven Phthalate Metabolites in the U.S. Population 
from  the  National  Health  and  Nutrition  Examination  Survey  (NHANES)  1999–2000,’’  Environ-
mental Health Perspectives 112: 331–338, March 2004. 

7 Centers for Disease Control, ‘‘Third National Report on Exposure to Toxic Chemicals’’, 2005. 
8 Shanna  H.  Swan  et  al.,  ‘‘Decrease  in  anogenital  distance  among  male  infants  with  prenatal 
phthalate  exposure,’’  Environmental  Health  Perspectives  113:  1056–1061,  August  2005;  L.E. 
Gray et al., ‘‘Perinatal Exposure to the Phthalates DEHP, BBP, and DINP, but not DEP, DMP, 
or DOTP, Alters Sexual Differentiation of the Male Rat,’’ Toxicological Science 58: 350–365, De-
cember  2000;  Vickie  Wilson  et  al.,  ‘‘Phthalate  Ester-Induced  Gubernacular  Lesions  are  Associ-
ated with Reduced Insl3 Gene Expression in the Fetal Rat Testis,’’ Toxicology Letters 146: 207– 
215,  2  February  2004;  J.S.  Fisher  et  al.,  ‘‘Human  ‘Testicular  Dysgenesis  Syndrome’:  A  Possible 
Model Using in-utero Exposure of the Rat to Dibutyl Phthalate,’’ Human Reproduction 18: 1383– 
1394, 2003. 

9 NIEHS, ‘‘Independent Panel to Evaluate a Chemical Used in Some Plastics (Di (2-ethylhexyl) 
phthalate) for Hazards to Human Development or Reproduction,’’ press release, October 5, 2005. 
10 G.  Latini  et  al.,  ‘‘In-Utero  Exposure  to  Di-(2-ethylhexyl)-phthalate  and  Human  Pregnancy 

Duration,’’ Environmental Health Perspectives 111:1783–1785, 2003. 

11 I.  Colo´n,  D.  Caro,  C.J.  Bourdony  and  O.  Rosario,  ‘‘Identification  of  Phthalate  Esters  in  the 
Serum  of  Young  Puerto  Rican  Girls  with  Premature  Breast  Development,’’  Environmental 
Health Perspectives 108: 895–900, 2000. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

50 

12 S.M.  Duty  et  al.,  ‘‘Phthalate  Exposure  and  Human  Semen  Parameters,’’  Epidemiology  14: 
269–277,  2003;  S.M.  Duty  et  al.,  ‘‘The  Relationship  Between  Environmental  Exposures  to 
Phthalates  and  DNA  Damage  in  Human  Sperm  Using  the  Neutral  Comet  Assay,’’  Environ-
mental Health Perspectives 111: 1164–1169, 2003. 

13 CPSC, ‘‘CPSC Releases Study on Phthalates in Teethers, Rattles and Other Children’s Prod-
ucts,’’  press  release,  December  2,  1998,  accessed  May  12,  2008  at  www.cpsc.gov/CPSCPUB/ 
PREREL/PRHTML99/99031.html. 

14 CPSC, ‘‘CPSC Releases Study on Phthalates in Teethers, Rattles and Other Children’s Prod-
ucts,’’  press  release,  December  2,  1998,  accessed  May  12,  2008  at  www.cpsc.gov/CPSCPUB/ 
PREREL/PRHTML99/99031.html. 

15 Report  to  the  U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  by  the  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory 
Panel  on  Diisononyl  Phthalate,  June  2001.  Accessed  May  12,  2008  at  http://www.cpsc.gov/LI-
BRARY/FOIA/Foia01/os/dinp.pdf. 

16 CPSC,  Letter  to  Jeffrey  Becker  Wise,  National  Environmental  Trust,  February  26,  2003, 

accessed May 12, 2008 at http://www.cpsc.gov/library/foia/foia03/petition/ageunder.PDF. 

17 U.S. PIRG Education Fund, Trouble in Toyland: The 20th Annual Survey of Toy Safety, No-

18 Letter  to  the  Honorable  Deborah  Platt  Majoras,  Chairman,  FTC,  November  21,  2005.  On 

file with the author. Our petition was later denied. 

19 Eight  of  the  toys  were  labeled  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  packaging.  One  item  was  labeled 
‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  manufacturer’s  website.  For  the  last  item,  the  manufacturer’s  website 
claimed not to use phthalates in any of its children’s products. 

20 ‘‘Results of Competitiveness Council, Brussels, 24th September 2004,’’ Memo/04/225. 
21 Bette  Hileman,  ‘‘EU  Bans  Three  Phthalates  from  Toys,  Restricts  Three  More,’’  Chemical 

vember 2005. 

and Engineering News, July 11, 2005. 

Environment California, 2007 

22 ‘‘Toxic Baby Bottles: Scientific study finds leaching chemicals in clear plastic baby bottles’’, 

23 vom  Saal,  F.  and  C.  Hughes,  An  Extensive  New  Literature  Concerning  Low-Dose  Effects 
of Bisphenol A Shows the Need for a New Risk Assessment. Environmental Health Perspectives 
113:926–933 (2005). 

24 vom  Saal,  F  and  C  Hughes,  An  Extensive  New  Literature  Concerning  Low-Dose  Effects  of 
Bisphenol  A  Shows  the  Need  for  a  New  Risk  Assessment.  Environmental  Health  Perspectives 
113:926–933 (2005). (‘‘The charge to the HCRA panel, which was to perform a weight-of-the evi-
dence evaluation of available data on the developmental and reproductive effects of exposure to 
BPA  in  laboratory  animals,  led  to  an  analysis  of  only  19  of  47  available  published  studies  on 
low-dose  effects  of  BPA.  The  deliberations  of  the  HCRA  were  in  2001–2002,  and  accordingly, 
a  cut-off  date  of  April  2002  was  selected  for  consideration  of  the  published  literature.  It  is  re-
grettable  that  the  relevance  of  the  analysis  was  further  undermined  by  a  delay  of  2.5  years  in 
publication of the report. During the intervening time, between April 2002 and the end of 2004, 
a large number of additional articles reporting low-dose effects of BPA in experimental animals 
have been published. The result is that by the end of 2004, a PubMed (National Library of Medi-
cine,  Bethesda,  MD)  search  identified  115  published  studies  concerning  effects  of  low  doses  of 
BPA in experimental animals.’’). 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you, Ms. Hitchcock. 
Senator  Kerry  has  to  leave  and  wants  to  say  a  few  words  before 

he goes. 

Senator  KERRY.  I  just  wanted  to  thank  the  panel  very  much.  I 
apologize  that  I  cannot  be  here.  I  particularly  want  to  thank  Pete 
Myers,  Dr.  Myers,  and  Dianne  Dumanoski  and  company  for  Our 
Stolen Future, just a superb piece of work which I wish more Amer-
icans  were  aware  of.  And  Ms.  Hitchcock,  thank  you  for  your  testi-
mony. 

Now,  I  will  submit  some  questions  in  writing,  if  that  is  permis-

sible, and a fair number. 

But  I  very  much  appreciate  your  testimony  today.  I  apologize. 

We just have competing hearings, and I am sorry. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you. 
Dr. Hentges? 

STATEMENT OF STEVEN G. HENTGES, PH.D., EXECUTIVE 

DIRECTOR, POLYCARBONATE/BPA GLOBAL GROUP, 

AMERICAN CHEMISTRY COUNCIL 

Dr.  HENTGES.  Thank  you,  Senator  Klobuchar  and  Members  of 
the  Committee.  The  American  Chemistry  Council  appreciates  the 
opportunity to testify today and we also appreciate your interest in 
understanding  the  safety  of  plastics  additives  in  consumer  prod-
ucts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

51 

We  have  also  provided  written  testimony,  and  I  ask  that  the 

written testimony be entered into the record. 

We  firmly  believe  that  good  public  health  policy  must  be  based 
on  facts  and  the  best  available  science,  and  consumers  should  ex-
pect no less. Therefore, we are committed to the safety of our prod-
ucts,  and  last  year  alone,  ACC  member  companies  invested  over 
$14 billion in environment, health, and safety programs helping to 
improve the understanding of our products. 

As you know, much of the information on chemical safety can be 
highly technical and difficult for consumers to put into perspective. 
That is why it is essential for scientific review processes to be thor-
ough  and  transparent  in  order  for  the  public  to  have  confidence  in 
assessments conducted by Government experts. 

Recent  press  reports  have  questioned  the  safety  of  phthalate 
esters and bisphenol A, compounds that are used in plastics to im-
part particular performance properties. Many of these reports have 
been  misleading  or  inaccurate  and  have  resulted  in  widespread 
confusion about the safety of plastics. In fact, both bisphenol A and 
phthalates  have  been  subjected  to  numerous  rigorous  and  com-
prehensive reviews by government agencies in the U.S. and around 
the  world.  After  more  than  5  decades  of  use,  no  reliable  evidence 
has shown bisphenol A or phthalates in consumer products to have 
caused any harm to any person. 

To  the  contrary,  recent  government  reviews  have  affirmed  the 
safety of bisphenol A and phthalates in common everyday products. 
The  clear  weight  of  scientific  evidence  provides  reassurance  that 
the  public  should  not  be  concerned  about  everyday  products  that 
contain either bisphenol A or phthalates. 

Phthalates  are  used  to  soften  or  plasticize  otherwise  rigid  PVC 
plastic,  which  is  used  to  make  many  consumer  products.  The  U.S. 
Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  the  National  Toxicology 
program, and the U.S. Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 
have  found  no  justification  for  restricting  the  use  of  phthalates  as 
a  plasticizer  in  toys  and  children’s  products.  The  CPSC  conducted 
a  5-year  health  risk  study  and  found  no  demonstrated  health  risk 
from the primary phthalate used in PVC toys or other products in-
tended for children 5 years of age and younger and no justification 
for banning its use. 

International  scientific  agencies  have  come  to  similar  conclu-
sions.  The  European  Union  conducted  a  decade-long  risk  assess-
ment  of  five  phthalates  and  concluded  that  the  primary  phthalate 
used in children’s toys was unlikely to pose a risk to consumers fol-
lowing inhalation, skin contact, or ingestion. 

In short, rigorous scientific reviews conducted by the government 
agencies  responsible  for  regulating  phthalates  in  consumer  prod-
ucts  do  not  support  restrictions  on  the  use  of  these  materials.  The 
science is simply not there to support such action. 

Bisphenol  A  is  used  primarily  to  make  clear,  shatter-resistant 
polycarbonate plastic and durable epoxy resins, both used in a wide 
array of consumer products. In the past 2 years alone, comprehen-
sive scientific assessments from the European Union, the U.S. Na-
tional Toxicology Program, Health Canada, NSF International, and 
the European Food Safety Authority have all been undertaken, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

52 

these  assessments  support  the  continued  safe  use  of  consumer 
products made from polycarbonate plastic and epoxy resins. 

Very  recently  the  FDA  said  we  believe  there  is  a  large  body  of 
evidence  that  indicates  that  FDA  regulated  products  containing 
BPA  currently  on  the  market  are  safe  and  that  exposure  levels  to 
BPA  from  food  contact  materials,  including  for  infants  and  chil-
dren, are below those that may cause health effects. 

Based  on  the  science,  bisphenol  A  is  not  banned  or  restricted 
anywhere  in  the  world.  Although  it  has  been  claimed  that  low 
doses  of  bisphenol  A  may  be  harmful,  the  so-called  low-dose  hy-
pothesis  is  just  that,  a  hypothesis  that  has  not  been  proven  and 
has not been accepted by any of the government agencies that have 
reviewed the science on bisphenol A. 

We  understand  that  the  public  wants  to  be  assured  that  the 
products they use are safe and have been evaluated using the best 
available  science.  We  agree.  In  the  case  of  phthalates  and 
bisphenol A, consumers can confidently rely on rich bodies of safety 
data  and  the  comprehensive  assessments  from  experts  in  the  U.S. 
and around the world. 

Thank  you  again  for  the  opportunity  to  address  the  Committee. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Hentges follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEVEN G. HENTGES, PH.D., EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

POLYCARBONATE/BPA GLOBAL GROUP, AMERICAN CHEMISTRY COUNCIL 

Summary of Testimony 

The  American  Chemistry  Council  represents  the  leading  business  of  chemistry. 
Products  supplied  by  the  chemistry  sector  are  essential  in  manufacturing,  agri-
culture,  energy,  transportation,  technology,  communications,  health,  education,  de-
fense, and virtually every aspect of our lives. Basic industrial chemicals are the raw 
materials for thousands of other products including plastics, water treatment chemi-
cals, detergents, pharmaceuticals and agricultural chemicals. These applications in-
clude  medicines  and  medical  technologies  that  save  lives,  computers  that  expand 
our  horizons,  foods  we  eat,  water  we  drink,  cars  we  drive,  homes  in  which  we  live, 
and clothes we wear. 

We understand that recent media attention has created public concern and confu-
sion about some of these chemicals—a family of compounds called phthalate esters, 
and another compound called bisphenol A. We are pleased to present this testimony 
to help address some of the confusion. 

Bisphenol  A  is  a  single  compound  used  primarily  to  make  polycarbonate  plastic 
and epoxy resins. It is also used to make resins used as dental sealants and compos-
ites. Only trace levels of residual bisphenol A remain in these materials and in con-
sumer products made from these materials. 

Phthalate  esters  describe  a  family  of  compounds  used  in  many  applications.  The 
largest  use  is  as  an  additive  to  plasticize,  or  soften,  polyvinyl  chloride.  Before  the 
addition of a plasticizer, polyvinyl chloride (vinyl) is actually a hard plastic. 

These materials have been in use for decades. They have been subjected to exten-
sive  study  worldwide,  including  by  independent  researchers  as  well  as  government 
agencies,  and  scientific  review  is  ongoing.  U.S.  regulatory  agencies  charged  with 
regulating  these  compounds  in  various  applications,  after  reviewing  the  large  body 
of  scientific  data,  have  reached  conclusions  supporting  their  safe  use  in  important 
applications.  The  scientific  evidence  supports  the  continued  use  of  these  important 
materials. 
Bisphenol A 

Bisphenol  A  is  a  chemical  building  block  used  primarily  to  make  polycarbonate 
plastic  and  epoxy  resins.  The  safety  of  products  made  from  these  materials  is  sup-
ported by a 50 year safety track record of use and an equally long history of testing. 
Polycarbonate is a lightweight, highly shatter-resistant plastic with optical clarity 
comparable  to  glass.  Epoxy  resins  have  an  exceptional  combination  of  toughness, 
chemical  resistance  and  adhesion.  The  unique  attributes  of  these  materials  make 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

53 

them  ideal  for  use  in  a  wide  array  of  products,  many  of  which  improve  the  health 
and safety of consumers. 

The manufacturing processes to make polycarbonate plastic and epoxy resins con-
vert virtually all bisphenol A into the plastic or resin, leaving behind only trace lev-
els  of  residual  bisphenol  A,  typically  less  than  50  parts  per  million  (0.005  percent 
by  weight),  in  the  finished  materials.  Consumers  frequently  benefit  from  products 
made  from  these  materials,  but  come  into  contact  with  very  little  bisphenol  A  from 
use of these products. 

Typical Products Made From Polycarbonate Plastic and Epoxy Resins 

Health Care 

• Eyeglass lenses 
• Incubators 
• Critical components of medical devices 

(e.g., kidney dialyzers, blood oxygenators, 
drug infusion units) 

Electronic 

• Digital media (CDs and DVDs) 
• Electronic product housings (e.g., cell 

phones, computers) 

• Printed circuit boards laminates 

Security 

• Blast and bullet resistant shielding 
• Police shields 
• Protective visors 

Sports Safety 

• Bicycle and football helmets 
• Sunglasses and visors 
• Skiing and diving goggles 

Automotive, Marine, and Aerospace 

• Headlamp lenses, mirror housings and 

bumpers 

• Instrument panels 
• Primer coatings 
• Fiber reinforced composites 

Building and Construction 

• Roof, skylight and greenhouse glazing 
• Corrosion resistant coatings for steel 

pipes/fittings, structural steel (e.g., 
bridges), concrete reinforcement bar 

• Decorative and industrial flooring 

Home Appliances 

• Components of kitchen appliances (e.g., 

food processors, refrigerators) 
• Electrical appliance housings 

Food Containers 

• Baby and water bottles 
• Home food storage containers and 

tableware 

• Food/beverage can coatings 

In recent years, independent government and scientific bodies worldwide have ex-
amined  the  scientific  evidence  supporting  the  safety  of  bisphenol  A.  In  every  case, 
these  assessments  support  the  conclusion  that  bisphenol  A  is  not  a  risk  to  human 
health at the extremely low levels to which people might be exposed. 

Each  of  these  assessments  comprehensively  examined  the  potential  reproductive 
and  developmental  toxicity  of  bisphenol  A.  Based  on  the  weight  of  evidence,  these 
assessments uniformly demonstrate that bisphenol A is not a selective reproductive 
or  developmental  toxicant.  The  most  recent  evaluations  of  bisphenol  A  are  briefly 
summarized  below  along  with  their  key  conclusions  regarding  reproductive  and  de-
velopmental toxicity. 
Bisphenol A is Deemed Safe for Use by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration 

FDA  regulates  the  use  of  bisphenol  A  in  food  contact  materials,  such  as 
polycarbonate  used  in  baby  bottles  and  water  bottles,  and  in  epoxy  resins  used  to 
coat  cans  containing  food  products.  The  U.S.  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA) 
said  in  July  2007  that  ‘‘FDA  is  unaware  of  any  specific  study  in  which  humans  ex-
posed  to  BPA  through  any  food  containers  experienced  miscarriages,  birth  defects  or 
cancer. Furthermore, human exposure levels to BPA from its use in food contact ma-
terials is in fact many orders of magnitude lower than the levels of BPA that showed 
no adverse effects in animal studies.’’ 

More  recently  (April  2008),  in  response  to  public  confusion  from  media  reports 
about  bisphenol  A,  FDA  formed  an  FDA-wide  task  force  to  review  current  research 
and new information on bisphenol A for all FDA-regulated products. FDA confirmed 
that  it  has  been  reviewing  the  emerging  literature  on  bisphenol  A  on  a  continuous 
basis.  FDA  also  confirmed  that  based  on  its  ongoing  review,  it  believes  there  is  a 
large  body  of  evidence  that  indicates  that  FDA-regulated  products  containing 
bisphenol A currently on the market are safe and that exposure levels to bisphenol 
A  from  food  contact  materials,  including  for  infants  and  children,  are  below  those 
that may cause health effects. 

FDA’s  position  is  consistent  with  two  risk  assessments  for  BPA  conducted  by  the 
European  Food  Safety  Authority  (EFSA)  Scientific  Panel  on  Food  Additives, 
Flavourings, Processing Aids and Materials in Contact with Food and the Japanese 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

54 

National  Institute  of  Advanced  Industrial  Science  and  Technology.  Each  of  these 
documents  considered  the  question  of  a  possible  low-dose  effect  and  concluded  that 
no current health risk exists for bisphenol A at the current exposure level. FDA said 
in  April  2008  that  it  is  not  recommending  that  anyone  discontinue  using  products 
that  contain  bisphenol  A  while  FDA  continues  its  risk  assessment  process.  See 
http://www.fda.gov/oc/opacom/hottopics/bpa.html. 
FDA’s Conclusions are Consistent with Those of the European Food Safety Authority 
The  European  Food  Safety  Authority  (EFSA)  was  established  by  the  European 
Parliament in 2002 to provide the European Commission, the European Parliament 
and  the  European  Member  States  with  a  sound  scientific  basis  for  legislation  and 
policies related to food safety. Included in the scope of EFSA’s work are assessments 
of the safety of food packaging and other materials that contact food. 

In January 2007, EFSA released a comprehensive assessment of bisphenol A that 
was  conducted  by  an  expert  panel  consisting  of  21  independent  scientific  experts 
from  across  the  European  Union.1 The  assessment,  which  builds  upon  and  updates 
an  earlier  assessment,2 comprehensively  evaluated  studies  on  the  toxicity,  metabo-
lism and pharmacokinetics, and dietary exposure of bisphenol A. 

In  general,  the  findings  and  conclusions  of  the  EFSA  assessment  are  consistent 
with those of the more recent CERHR evaluation (see below). The assessment estab-
lished  a  Tolerable  Daily  Intake  (TDI)  of  50  μg/kg  bw/day  and  concluded  that  ‘‘peo-
ple’s  dietary  exposure  to  BPA,  including  that  of  infants  and  children,  is  estimated 
to be well below the new TDI.’’ 

The  TDI  was  based  on  the  most  sensitive  no-effect-levels  from  multi-generation 
studies  conducted  in  the  rat  and  mouse  (see  below  for  more  information  on  these 
studies). For both studies, the most sensitive no-effect-level was for systemic toxicity 
(e.g., liver effects) at 5 mg/kg bw/day. The no-effect-levels for reproductive and devel-
opmental  effects  in  both  studies  were  at  a  higher  dose  (50  mg/kg  bw/day)  that  the 
dose  at  which  systemic  effects  occurred.  The  EFSA  panel  further  concluded  that 
‘‘low-dose effects’’ of bisphenol A in rodents have not been demonstrated in a robust 
and reproducible way. 
Bisphenol  A  has  been  Extensively  Reviewed  by  the  NTP  Center  for  the  Evaluation 

of Risks to Human Reproduction 

The Center for the Evaluation of Risks to Human Reproduction (CERHR) was es-
tablished by the U.S. National Toxicology Program and the National Institute of En-
vironmental  Health  Sciences  in  1998  to  serve  as  an  environmental  health  resource 
to  the  public  and  to  regulatory  and  health  agencies.  A  primary  function  of  CERHR 
is  to  assess  the  potential  for  adverse  effects  on  reproduction  and  development 
caused  by  agents  to  which  humans  may  be  exposed.  This  is  accomplished  through 
rigorous  evaluations  of  the  scientific  literature  by  independent  panels  of  scientists. 
The CERHR evaluation comprehensively reviewed the large scientific database on 

bisphenol A, including: 

kinetics) 

• Chemistry, use and human exposure 
• General  toxicology  and  biological  effects  (including  metabolism  and  pharmaco-
• Reproductive toxicity 
• Developmental toxicity 
To  reach  its  conclusions,  the  expert  panel  considered  the  quality,  quantity,  and 
strength of the scientific evidence that exposure to bisphenol A might cause adverse 
effects on human reproduction and/or development of the fetus or infant. The overall 
findings  of  the  expert  panel  evaluation  were  announced  at  a  public  meeting  in  Au-
gust  2007,  and  the  final  CERHR  report  was  released  in  November  2007.  Subse-
quently,  NTP  released  a  draft  ‘‘Brief’’  based  on  the  CERHR  report  on  April  14, 
2008.3 

Based  on  the  weight  of  scientific  evidence,  the  expert  panel  found  no  serious  or 
high level concerns for adverse effects of bisphenol A on human reproduction or de-
velopment.  The  draft  NTP  Brief  agreed  with  these  conclusions:  ‘‘the  NTP  has  neg-
ligible  concern  that  the  exposure  of  pregnant  women  to  bisphenol  A  will  result  in 
fetal or neonatal mortality, birth defects or reduced birth weight and growth in their 
offspring,’’  and  ‘‘the  NTP  concurs  with  the  conclusion  of  the  CERHR  Expert  Panel 
on Bisphenol A that there is negligible concern that exposure to bisphenol A causes 
reproductive  effects  in  non-occupationally  exposed  adults,  and  minimal  concern  for 
workers  exposed  to  higher  levels  in  occupational  settings.’’  For  several  specific  po-
tential  health  effects  (regarding  neural  and  behavioural  effects,  and  effects  on  the 
prostate  gland,  acceleration  in  puberty  in  females,  and  the  mammary  gland),  the 
NTP  draft  Brief  expressed  ‘‘some  concern,’’  but  again  no  serious  or  high  level  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

55 

cerns. Additional research was suggested by the NTP draft Brief, since data is inad-
equate to reach a firm conclusion. 
The  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Supports  Bisphenol  A’s  Continued  Safe  Use 
Under  the  EU  Existing  Substances  Directive,  the  EU  conducted  a  comprehensive 
risk assessment of bisphenol A that was published in 2003.4 An updated risk assess-
ment is in the final stages and is expected to be published in early 2008. 

The  EU  risk  assessment  comprehensively  evaluated  studies  on  the  toxicity,  me-
tabolism  and  pharmacokinetics,  and  exposure  of  bisphenol  A.  In  general,  the  find-
ings  and  conclusions  of  the  EU  risk  assessment  are  consistent  with  those  of  the 
CERHR  evaluation.  The  2003  risk  assessment  established  an  overall  no-effect-level 
of 50 mg/kg bw/day, which was based on the no-effect-level for reproductive and de-
velopmental  effects  in  a  multi-generation  study  conducted  in  the  rat.  The  no-effect- 
level from the rat multi-generation study has subsequently been affirmed by the re-
sults  of  a  multi-generation  study  in  the  mouse  (see  below  for  information  on  both 
multi-generation  studies).  The  updated  risk  assessment,  based  on  the  most  recent 
scientific  information,  retains  the  overall  no-effect-level  of  50  mg/kg  bw/day,  now 
based on both the rat and mouse studies. 

The  2003  EU  risk  assessment  was  reviewed  by  the  Scientific  Committee  for  Tox-
icity, Ecotoxicity, and the Environment (CSTEE), which is an independent scientific 
advisory  committee  to  the  European  Commission.5 The  CSTEE  agreed  with  the 
overall  no-effect-level  and  stated  that  ‘‘a  number  of  high  quality  studies  on  the  re-
productive  and  developmental  effects  of  bisphenol  A  are  already  available  and  do 
not support low-dose effects.’’ The CSTEE further stated that ‘‘there is no convincing 
evidence  that  low  doses  of  bisphenol  A  have  effects  on  developmental  parameters 
in offspring . . .’’ 
The  Japanese  National  Institute  of  Advanced  Industrial  Science  and  Technology’s 

Review Supports the Continued Safe Use of Bisphenol A 

The  Japanese  National  Institute  of  Advanced  Industrial  Science  and  Technology 
(AIST),  which  is  affiliated  with  the  Japanese  Ministry  of  Economy,  Trade  and  In-
dustry  is  Japan’s  largest  public  research  organization.  A  comprehensive  human 
health  and  environmental  risk  assessment  on  bisphenol  A,  conducted  by  scientists 
at  AIST’s  Research  Center  for  Chemical  Risk  Management,  was  published  in  No-
vember 2005.6 

Based  on  a  thorough  review  of  the  toxicological  profile  of  bisphenol  A  combined 
with estimates of human exposure, AIST concluded that ‘‘current exposure levels of 
BPA will not pose any unacceptable risk to human health.’’ 

Along with systemic toxicity, a key toxicological endpoint for the AIST assessment 
was  reproductive  toxicity.  Similar  to  the  EFSA  assessment,  the  most  sensitive  no- 
effect-level  was  5  mg/kg  bw/day  for  systemic  toxicity  in  a  multi-generation  study 
conducted  in  the  rat.  The  no-effect-level  for  reproductive  toxicity  was  50  mg/kg  bw/ 
day, at which systemic effects also occurred. The AIST assessment further concluded 
that  findings  from  studies  claiming  reproductive  effects  at  much  lower  doses  were 
not  considered  to  be  robust  in  comparison  to  the  consistent  findings  from  studies 
reporting no low-dose effects. 
Health Canada’s Recent Review is Supportive of Continued Use of Bisphenol A 

In  April  2008,  Health  Canada  opened  a  comment  period  on  a  proposal  to  ban 
polycarbonate baby bottles. This event has been the subject of some confusion in the 
media,  because  the  reviewing  scientists  concluded  ‘‘that  bisphenol  A  exposure  to 
newborns  and  infants  is  below  levels  that  may  pose  a  risk.’’  The  Canadian  govern-
ment  nevertheless  proposed  moving  forward  with  a  ban  on  polycarbonate  baby  bot-
tles based on a policy decision that the ‘‘gap between exposure and effect is not large 
enough.’’  Canada  also  proposed  to  set  limits  on  BPA  in  infant  formula  and  to  work 
with industry on alternatives for food packaging. 

Canada did not suggest that parents and caregivers stop using polycarbonate bot-
tles while the proposal is being considered. Canada did not suggest that stores stop 
selling  polycarbonate  baby  bottles  while  the  proposal  is  being  considered.  Canada 
did  recommend  that  parents  and  caregivers  continuing  to  use  polycarbonate  baby 
bottles ‘‘do not put boiling water in them.’’ 
Recent,  High  Quality  Studies  Animal  Studies  Have  Been  Completed  on  Bisphenol  A 
The effects of bisphenol A on fertility and reproductive performance have been in-
vestigated in three high quality studies in rats and mice using internationally vali-
dated  guidelines  (two-generation  and  three-generation  studies  in  the  rat,  two-gen-
eration  study  in  mice)  and  in  a  continuous  breeding  study  in  mice.  Developmental 
toxicity studies in rats and mice have also been conducted. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

56 

• No  effect  on  fertility  was  seen  in  the  rat  two-generation  study  at  the  four  low- 
dose  levels  tested  (0.2–200  μg/kg  bw/day).  In  the  rat  three-generation  study,  a 
reduction  in  litter  size  was  seen  only  at  the  top  dose  of  500  mg/kg  bw/day, 
which  also  produced  clear  parental  systemic  toxicity  (significant  body  weight 
gain  reduction  in  both  sexes  and  renal  tubule  degeneration  in  females).  No  ef-
fects  on  reproduction  or  development  were  seen  at  the  five  lower  doses  tested 
(1 μg/kg bw/day to 50 mg/kg bw/day) and no parental systemic effects were seen 
at the four lowest doses (5 mg/kg bw/day and below). 
• Consistent with the rat studies, bisphenol A produced parental systemic toxicity 
in the mouse two-generation study at the two highest doses tested (50 and 600 
mg/kg  bw/day),  resulting  in  a  NOEL  of  5  mg/kg  bw/day.  The  NOEL  for  repro-
ductive  and  developmental  effects  was  50  mg/kg  bw/day.  No  treatment  related 
effects were seen at the four lowest doses tested (3 μg/kg bw/day to 5 mg/kg bw/ 
day). 
• In  the  continuous  breeding  study  in  mice,  no  effects  on  fertility  were  seen  at 
300 mg/kg bw/day. Fertility effects were only observed at doses of approximately 
600  mg/kg  bw/day  and  above,  at  which  parental  systemic  toxicity  was  present. 
• No  evidence  that  bisphenol  A  is  a  developmental  toxicant  was  observed  in 
standard  developmental  studies  in  rats  and  mice.  In  rats,  a  maternal  LOAEL 
and  fetal  NOAEL  of  160  and  640  mg/kg  bw/day,  respectively,  were  identified. 
In mice, maternal and fetal NOAELs were 250 and 1,000 mg/kg bw/day, respec-
tively. 

Individually and collectively, these studies, these studies consistently demonstrate 

that bisphenol A is not a selective reproductive or developmental toxicant. 

In addition, effects claimed to occur at low doses in small-scale unvalidated stud-
ies, have not been corroborated in the large-scale multi-generation studies conducted 
according  to  internationally  validated  guidelines.  Additional  detail  on  these  studies 
is provided below. 
Three-Generation Reproductive Toxicity Study in CD Sprague-Dawley Rats 

The study followed the U.S. EPA OPPTS test guideline 837.3800, with additional 
assessments  beyond  the  guideline  requirements,  and  was  conducted  under  Good 
Laboratory Practice requirements.7 Strengths of the study include: 

• Oral route of administration, which is most relevant for human exposure. 
• Wide  dietary  dose  range  (6  dose  groups  ranging  from  0.015  to  7500  ppm 
bisphenol  A  in  the  diet,  corresponding  to  intakes  of  approximately  1  μg/kg  bw/ 
day to 500 mg/kg bw/day). 

• Large group size (30 animals per dose level). 
• Multiple endpoints examined, including a thorough histologic evaluation. 
Parental  systemic  toxicity  (a  guideline  requirement)  was  produced  at  the  two 
highest  doses,  resulting  in  a  NOAEL  of  5  mg/kg  bw/day.  The  NOAEL  for  reproduc-
tive and developmental effects was 50 mg/kg bw/day. 
Two-Generation Reproductive Toxicity Study in CD–1 Swiss Mice 

The  study  followed  the  internationally  accepted  OECD  416  test  guideline,  with 
additional  assessments  beyond  the  guideline,  and  was  conducted  under  Good  Lab-
oratory Practice requirements.8 The study was preceded by a full two-generation re-
productive  toxicity  study  on  17β-estradiol,  which  was  then  also  used  as  a  positive 
control in the bisphenol A study. Strengths of the study include: 

• Oral route of administration, which is most relevant for human exposure. 
• Wide  dietary  dose  range  (6  dose  groups  ranging  from  0.018  to  3500  ppm 
bisphenol  A  in  the  diet,  corresponding  to  intakes  of  approximately  3  μg/kg  bw/ 
day to 600 mg/kg bw/day). 

• Large group size (28 animals per dose level). 
• Multiple endpoints examined, including a thorough histologic evaluation. 
In  addition,  maternal  and  paternal  toxicity  (a  guideline  requirement)  was  pro-
duced at the two highest doses, additional F1 male offspring were retained for eval-
uation  concurrent  with  F1  parental  males,  a  positive  control  was  used  to  dem-
onstrate that the test system was responsive to a known estrogen, and two negative 
control  groups  were  used  to  increase  the  baseline  historical  database  in  mice  and 
to define the intrinsic variability in endpoints of interest. 

Consistent  with  the  three-generation  study  in  rats,  systemic  toxicity  was  identi-
fied  at  the  two  highest  doses,  resulting  in  a  no  observed  effect  level  (NOEL)  of  5 
mg/kg  bw/day.  The  NOEL  for  reproductive  and  development  effects  was  50  mg/kg 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

57 

bw/day. Also consistent with the three-generation rat study, no treatment-related ef-
fects  were  found  at  doses  ranging  from  3μg/kg  bw/day  to  5  mg/kg  bw/day  and  the 
study  did  not  corroborate  effects  claimed  to  occur  in  this  low  dose  range  in  small- 
scale studies. 
Two-Generation Reproductive Toxicity Study in CD Sprague-Dawley Rats 

In  a  third  comprehensive  study,  bisphenol  A  has  been  tested  in  a  two-generation 
reproductive  toxicity  study  in  CD  Sprague-Dawley  rats.9 This  study,  which  focused 
on  low  doses,  followed  the  internationally  accepted  OECD  416  test  guideline  and 
was conducted under Good Laboratory Practice requirements. Strengths of the study 
include: 

• Oral route of administration. 
• Large group size (25 animals per dose level). 
• Wide  variety  of  hormonally  sensitive  endpoints  examined,  including  behavioral 

measurements. 

Consistent  with  the  three-generation  rat  study  and  the  two-generation  mouse 
study, no treatment-related effects were found in the low-dose range from 0.2 to 200 
μg/kg  bw/day  and  the  study  did  not  corroborate  effects  claimed  to  occur  in  this  low 
dose range in small-scale studies. 
National Toxicology Program Continuous Breeding Study in Mice 

Bisphenol  A  was  administered  in  the  diet  during  a  one-week  pre-mating  period 
and a 14-week mating trial to groups of twenty male and female CD1 mice (F0 gen-
eration)  at  concentrations  of  0,  0.25,  0.5  or  1.0  percent;  daily  intakes  of  bisphenol 
A  are  estimated  to  have  been  0,  300,  600  and  1200  mg/kg  bw/day  in  males,  and  0, 
325,  650  and  1300  mg/kg  bw/day  in  females.10 In  the  continuous  breeding  phase, 
a statistically significant decrease in maternal body weight was observed after each 
litter  (between  6  and  9  percent),  at  the  top  dose,  on  postnatal  day  0  compared  to 
controls. At study termination, a small but statistically significant decrease in body 
weight (4 percent) was observed in treated females compared to controls. 

A  subsequent  one  generation  study  to  further  evaluate  parental  toxicity  of 
bisphenol  A  to  CD1  mice  observed  significant  parental  toxicity  at  doses  of  650  or 
1300 mg/kg bw/day.11 Key evidence of parental systemic toxicity was increased liver 
and kidney weights with hepatocellular hypertrophy and renal tubule degeneration/ 
regeneration, reduced body weights and body weight gain. In the continuous breed-
ing  study,  a  statistically  significant  decrease  compared  to  controls  was  observed  in 
the  number  of  litters  produced  per  pair  (4.5  and  4.7  compared  to  5.0  for  controls), 
litter  size  (6.5  and  9.8  compared  to  12.2  for  controls)  and  the  number  of  live  pups 
per litter (6.3 and 9.7 compared to 12.1 for controls) in the high and mid-dose group. 
No effects on fertility were observed in the low-dose group. A statistically significant 
decrease  in  litter  size  (controls:  11.4,  treated  males:  9.1,  treated  females:  5.9)  and 
number  of  live  pups  per  litter  (controls:  11.3,  treated  males:  8.4,  treated  females: 
5.5)  were  observed  in  the  cross-over  mating.  In  the  continuous  breeding  phase,  a 
statistically  significant  decrease  in  live  pup  weight  (6  percent)  on  postnatal  day  0 
was  observed  in  females  at  the  top  dose  after  adjustment  for  litter  size,  including 
live  and  still  births.  In  the  continuous  breeding  phase  a  small  but  statistically  sig-
nificant  decrease  in  body  weight  gain  (4  percent)  was  only  observed  in  treated  fe-
males  at  study  termination.  No  effect  was  observed  on  the  sex  ratio  in  the  F1  gen-
eration. In the F1 litters used in the cross-over breeding experiment, post natal (day 
0)  pup  weights  were  significantly  increased  in  males  (9–11  percent)  and  in  females 
(8–10 percent) in the mid- and high-dose. 

This study, conducted at high doses, is superseded by the more recent two genera-

tion study in mice. 
National Toxicology Program Developmental Toxicity Study in Mice 

Bisphenol A has been tested for developmental toxicity in a NTP study using CD– 
1 mice.12 Two tests were performed and as the same signs of maternal toxicity were 
observed in both tests the data were combined. Groups of 29–34 time-mated female 
mice were gavaged with 0, 500, 750, 1000 or 1250 mg/kg bw/day in corn oil on days 
6 to 15 of gestation. Animals were sacrificed on day 17 of gestation and the fetuses 
were  subjected  to  routine  external,  visceral  and  skeletal  examinations.  Data  were 
also provided on the additional dose level of 250 mg/kg bw/day, which was used only 
in  the  first  test.  Some  maternal  deaths  were  observed  at  doses  of  750  mg/kg  bw/ 
day  and  above  and  a  decrease  in  maternal  body  weight  gain  of  4–10  percent  and 
32–43  percent,  for  both  the  treatment  and  gestation  period  was  observed  at  1,000 
and  1,250  mg/kg  bw/day,  respectively.  Other  significant  signs  of  maternal  toxicity 
were observed at 500, 750, 1000 or 1250 mg/kg bw/day as well as a dose-related sta-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

58 

tistically  significant  increase  in  mean  relative  liver  weight  (9–26  percent)  was  ob-
served  in  dams  in  all  bisphenol  A  treatment  groups  as  compared  to  controls.  At 
1250  mg/kg  bw/day  a  statistically  significant  increase  was  observed  in  percent  re-
sorptions  per  litter  (40  percent  as  compared  to  14  percent  in  controls).  A  dose-re-
lated  decrease  in  mean  fetal  body  weight  per  litter  was  observed  in  the  bisphenol 
A treated groups that was statistically significant at 1,250 mg/kg bw/day when com-
pared  to  the  control  value;  1  percent,  1  percent,  9  percent  and  14  percent  at  500, 
750,  1,000  and  1,250  mg/kg  bw/day,  respectively.  No  statistically  significant  effect 
was  observed  on  the  number  of  implantation  sites  per  dam,  the  number  of  live 
fetuses  per  litter  and  the  sex  ratio.  Bisphenol  A  administration  had  no  significant 
effect  on  the  percent  of  fetuses  malformed  per  litter  or  the  percent  of  litters  with 
malformations.  Overall,  a  significant  increase  in  resorptions  and  decrease  in  fetal 
body weight was observed only at 1,250 mg/kg bw/day in the presence of severe ma-
ternal toxicity. 
National Toxicology Program Developmental Toxicity Study in Rats 

Bisphenol  A  was  studied  for  developmental  toxicity  potential  in  a  NTP  study.13 
In  the  main  study,  two  trials  were  performed  and  the  data  from  both  tests  were 
combined.  In  total,  groups  of  27–29  time-mated  CD  rats  were  gavaged  with  0,  160, 
320, 640 or 1,280 mg/kg bisphenol A in corn oil on days 6 to 15 of gestation. Animals 
were sacrificed on day 20 of gestation and the fetuses were subjected to routine ex-
ternal,  visceral  and  skeletal  examination.  At  1,280  mg/kg,  deaths  were  observed  in 
7/27  females  and  because  of  this  high  mortality  rate,  the  top  dose  group  was  not 
included  in  statistical  analyses.  Compared  to  controls,  a  statistically  significant  de-
crease  in  mean  maternal  body  weight  gain  was  observed  in  dams  at  all  dose  levels 
for  the  treatment  period  (35–54  percent)  and  the  gestation  period  (11–14  percent). 
No effect was observed on gravid uterine weights. When maternal body weight gain 
was  corrected  for  gravid  uterine  weight  a  statistically  significant  decrease  was  still 
apparent  at  all  dose  levels  (26–34  percent).  Pregnancy  rates  were  not  affected  by 
treatment with bisphenol A, nor was there any effect on the number of implantation 
sites  per  litter,  percent  resorptions  per  litter,  number  of  live  fetuses  per  litter,  sex 
ratio,  mean  fetal  body  weight  per  litter,  percent  fetuses  malformed  per  litter  and 
percent  litters  with  malformed  fetuses.  In  conclusion,  this  study  provides  no  evi-
dence  of  developmental  toxicity  in  the  rat  at  exposure  levels  which  are  toxic  to  the 
mother.  A  maternal  NOEL  could  not  be  identified;  instead  a  LOAEL  of  160  mg/kg 
was identified for clinical signs of toxicity and a statistically significant decrease (26 
percent)  in  body  weight  gain.  No  fetal  effects  were  seen  at  the  highest  dose  level 
evaluated, 640 mg/kg. 
‘‘Low-Dose’’ Studies are Unvalidated 

Although bisphenol A has been shown to have some weak ‘‘estrogen-like’’ activity 
in  a  number  of  in  vitro  and  in  vivo  screening  assays,  molecular  biology  studies 14 
have demonstrated that bisphenol A does not act as a weak estrogen mimic but ex-
hibits a distinct mechanism of action from estradiol at the estrogen receptor. Never-
theless,  the  potency  of  this  activity  in  screening  assays  generally  ranges  from  3  to 
5 orders of magnitude less than that of estradiol. 

It  should  also  be  noted  that  many  of  the  studies  investigating  endocrine  modu-
lating activity are essentially screening tests and many employ experimental proto-
cols  that  have  not  been  validated.  This  information  in  conjunction  with  the  known 
extensive  metabolism  of  bisphenol  A  to  non-estrogenic  metabolites  (see  below)  pro-
vides a scientific basis for the lack of toxicological effects at low doses in the multi- 
generation  studies  described  above.  Effects  claimed  to  occur  at  low  doses  in  small- 
scale  unvalidated  studies  have  not  been  corroborated  in  the  large-scale  multi-gen-
eration studies conducted according to internationally validated guidelines. 

The small-scale unvalidated studies have been evaluated in the comprehensive as-
sessments  described  above.  Each  of  these  assessments  applied  a  ‘‘weight-of-evi-
dence’’ approach to evaluate the body of information available for bisphenol A. Each 
assessment  relied  on  the  results  of  the  two-  and  three-generation  studies  described 
above for its overall conclusion. 
Metabolism and Pharmacokinetics Data Supports Results from Animal Studies 

The  potential  for  a  substance  to  cause  reproductive  or  developmental  toxicity  is 
substantially  influenced  by  metabolism  and  pharmacokinetics.  These  parameters 
have been very well characterized for bisphenol A in numerous animal studies (i.e., 
rodents and primates) and in several human volunteer studies. 

Overall,  these  studies  indicate  that  bisphenol  A  has  a  low  potential  to  cause  ad-
verse health effects in humans and, in particular, effects mediated by an estrogenic 
mode of action. Key findings from these studies are summarized below: 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

59 

• Humans  Efficiently  Metabolize  and  Eliminate  Bisphenol  A  from  the  Body— 
Human  volunteer  studies  confirm  that  bisphenol  A  is  efficiently  metabolized  to 
a glucuronide conjugate after oral exposure.15,16,17 Studies in animals and with 
isolated  liver  cells  have  shown  that  this  metabolic  process  occurs  in  the  intes-
tinal  wall 18 and  in  the  liver 19,20,21,22 both  of  which  must  be  crossed  before 
bisphenol A can enter into circulation in the body after oral exposure. 
In the first human study, volunteers were treated with a single 5 mg oral dose 
of  bisphenol  A  per  person,  which  is  approximately  1000  times  greater  than  a 
typical  daily  intake  of  bisphenol  A  (see  Section  6  below).  No  parent  bisphenol 
A  was  found  in  blood  at  any  time  point  and  all  bisphenol  A  was  excreted  in 
urine as the glucuronide. The elimination half-life for the glucuronide conjugate 
was approximately 4 hours, which means that any bisphenol A to which people 
are  exposed  should  virtually  all  be  eliminated  from  the  body  within  approxi-
mately 24 hours. 

• Bisphenol  A  Has  Low  Bioavailability  and  Does  Not  Accumulate  in  the  Body— 
The  human  volunteer  studies  confirm  that  bisphenol  A  has  very  low  bio-
availability  (i.e.,  very  little  parent  bisphenol  A  will  reach  target  tissues)  after 
oral  exposure.  The  rapid  elimination  of  bisphenol  A  indicates  that  bisphenol  A 
has very low potential (if any) to bioaccumulate in the body. 
Low  bioavailability,  efficient  metabolism  of  bisphenol  to  the  glucuronide,  and 
low potential to bioaccumulate have also been demonstrated in numerous stud-
ies  on  laboratory  animals,  some  of  which  are  cited  here.23,24,25,26,27,28,29  In-
cluded  are  studies  that  demonstrate  that  metabolism  of  bisphenol  A  is  not  al-
tered during pregnancy 30 and that neonatal animals also efficiently metabolize 
bisphenol A from an early age in neonatal life.31 

• Bisphenol  A  Metabolites  are  Not  Estrogenic—The  primary  metabolite  of 
bisphenol A, the glucuronide, has been shown to exhibit no estrogenic activity.32 
The  bisphenol  A  sulfate  metabolite,  which  may  be  present  at  lower  levels,  has 
also  been  shown  to  exhibit  no  estrogenic  activity.33 These  studies  indicate  that 
bisphenol  A  is  not  likely  to  cause  estrogenic  effects  since  the  metabolites  of 
bisphenol  A  that  enter  the  body  have  no  known  biological  activity  and,  in  par-
ticular, have no estrogenic activity. 

Bisphenol A Presents Very Low Potential for Human Exposure 

Numerous  studies  have  been  conducted  to  directly  measure  human  exposure  to 
bisphenol A by urinary biomonitoring and to indirectly estimate human exposure by 
analysis  of  potential  sources  of  exposure.  These  data  consistently  indicate  that 
human  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  is  essentially  all  through  the  diet  and  is  extremely 
low. Typical human exposure to bisphenol A is less than 0.1 μg/kg bw/day. Key find-
ings from these studies are summarized below: 

• Biomonitoring Studies Confirm Extremely Low Human Exposure—Since the glu-
curonide  metabolite  of  bisphenol  A  is  rapidly  and  completely  eliminated  into 
human  urine,  human  exposure  can  readily  be  estimated  by  urinary  biomoni-
toring  for  bisphenol  A  (after  hydrolysis  of  conjugates).  Numerous  studies  con-
ducted  worldwide  indicate  that  typical  human  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  is  less 
than 0.1 μg/kg bw/day. 
The  largest  study  was  conducted  by  the  U.S.  Centers  for  Disease  Control  and 
Prevention as part of their NHANES 2003–2004 program.34 This study reported 
urinary  bisphenol  A  data  for  more  than  2500  individuals  ranging  in  age  from 
6–85. Due to the study design, the data is representative of the U.S. population. 
In  this  study,  the  median  concentration  of  bisphenol  A  in  urine  (after  hydrol-
ysis)  was  2.8  ng/ml.  Based  on  this  data,  the  typical  daily  intake  of  bisphenol 
A for the population is estimated to be approximately 0.05 μg/kg bw/day. 
Many smaller-scale studies from Japan,35,36,37,38,39 Korea,40,41 Europe,42 and the 
U.S.,43,44,45,46,47,48,49 have  reported  similar  results.  Included  are  two  studies  in 
which urine samples were collected over 24-hour periods.50,51 
• Potential  Exposure  From  Consumer  Products  is  Very  Low—Consumer  products 
made  from  polycarbonate  plastic  or  epoxy  resins  contain  only  trace  levels  of 
bisphenol  A,  typically  less  than  50  parts  per  million  (0.005  percent  by  weight), 
which limits potential exposure to bisphenol A from use of products. Human ex-
posure to bisphenol A is essentially all through the diet 52 and numerous studies 
have  been  conducted  to  examine  the  potential  for  bisphenol  A  to  migrate  from 
polycarbonate  plastic  or  epoxy  resins  into  a  food  or  beverage.  Of  particular  in-
terest  are  the  many  studies  on  polycarbonate  baby  bottles 53,54,55,56,57,58 and 
canned foods and beverages.59 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

60 

Calculated  human  exposure  estimates  based  on  measured  migration  data  com-
bined  with  consumption  patterns 59(k),60 are  generally  consistent  with  exposure 
estimates  directly  measured  by  biomonitoring.  Both  confirm  that  human  expo-
sure  to  bisphenol  A  from  all  sources,  including  from  use  of  consumer  products, 
is extremely low. 
• Exposure  to  Bisphenol  A  Is  Within  Government-Set  Safe  Limits  The  European 
Food  Safety  Authority  recently  established  a  Tolerable  Daily  Intake  for 
bisphenol  A  of  50  μg/kg  bw/day  based  on  an  up-to-date  scientific  review.2 This 
value  is  identical  to  the  Reference  Dose  set  by  the  U.S.  Environmental  Protec-
tion  Agency.61 The  typical  daily  intake  of  bisphenol  A  is  approximately  1,000 
times  lower  than  these  acceptable  levels  and  poses  no  known  risks  to  human 
health. 

Phthalate Esters 

The  dozen  or  so  phthalates  in  use  today  have  thousands  of  applications.  Their 
chief  use  is  to  make  vinyl  soft  and  flexible,  without  sacrificing  its  durability.  They 
are  used  as  softeners  (or  plasticizers)  in  toys,  cars  and  products  found  in  the  home 
and  in  hospitals.  For  example,  they  are  an  important  ingredient  in  life-saving  and 
life-supporting  vinyl  medical  devices.  One  member  of  the  phthalate  family  is  used 
in  perfumes  and  other  personal  care  products  to  make  their  fragrances  last  longer. 
Another  type  of  phthalate  is  used  in  items  such  as  tool  handles  and  nail  polish  to 
help resist chipping. 

Recent  discussion  regarding  phthalates  has  focused  on  its  use  in  toys  and  child 
care  items.  An  extensive  body  of  research  on  phthalates,  including  several  recently 
completed  U.S.  and  EU  risk  assessments,  demonstrates  that  the  use  of  phthalates, 
and  in  particular  diisononyl  phthalate  (DINP),  as  a  plasticizer  in  toys  and  objects 
used by children poses little to no risk to children. 

With  respect  to  toys  and  children’s  products,  discussion  typically  focuses  on  the 
use  of  six  phthalates:  di(2-ethylhexyl)  phthalate  (DEHP),  dibutyl  phthalate  (DBP), 
and  butyl  benzyl  phthalate  (BBP)—in  the  materials  used  in  manufacturing  toys  or 
objects used by children, and another three—diisononyl phthalate (DINP), diisodecyl 
phthalate  (DIDP)  and  di-n-octyl  phthalate  (DNOP)—in  such  products  that  children 
can  put  in  their  mouths.62 This  discussion  apparently  occurs  because,  despite  the 
conclusions  of  the  European  risk  assessments  on  phthalates,  the  EU  acted  to  limit 
the uses of these phthalates in toys before the risk assessments were final. 

In  the  late  1990s,  a  question  arose  as  to  whether  use  of  phthalates  in  vinyl  toys 
might present a health risk to children. The concern was based primarily on effects 
in rats that were treated with very high oral doses of phthalates, and on the knowl-
edge  that  some  phthalate  could  migrate  out  of  vinyl  toys  if  and  when  they  were 
mouthed by children, and thus be ingested. At the time, information was sparse and 
uncertain  regarding  how  much  phthalate  actually  would  migrate  out  of  mouthed 
toys  and  the  amount  of  time  children  actually  mouthed  toys.  Initial  calculations 
using  very  conservative  assumptions  for  these  parameters  showed  that  exposure  to 
phthalates would be lower than the levels at which effects are seen in animal stud-
ies,  but  that  the  margin  of  safety  (MOS)  might  be  less  than  considered  desirable 
for DINP and DEHP. 

In  1999,  the  EU  instituted  an  emergency  temporary  ban  on  DBP,  BBP,  DNOP, 
DEHP, DINP and DIDP in toys intended to be put in the mouths of children under 
three,  and  began  considering  more  permanent  legislative  measures.63 At  the  same 
time,  actions  were  initiated  to  bring  more  certainty  to  the  science.  The  European 
Commission’s  Joint  Research  Center  (JRC),  the  Netherlands’  TNO  Nutrition  and 
Food  Research  Institute,  the  United  States  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission 
(CPSC),  and  the  Canadian  Ministry  of  Health  (Health  Canada)  collaborated  to  de-
velop a reliable method for measuring phthalate migration from mouthed vinyl toys. 
In the meantime, The EU was in the process of conducting in-depth and comprehen-
sive  risk  assessments  of  DBP,  BBP,  DEHP,  DINP  and  DIDP  as  part  of  its  effort 
to evaluate and control risks from existing substances. In the U.S., the CPSC under-
took an exhaustive assessment of the risks posed by DINP in children’s toys, which 
included  a  state-of-the-art  study  of  children’s  mouthing  behaviors  and  migration 
testing using the method developed by the European/North American collaboration. 
By 2003, these efforts had revealed that the risk posed by the use of DINP in chil-
dren’s  toys—even  those  that  are  mouthed—is  insignificant.  The  CPSC  found  that 
PVC  toys  and  other  items  intended  for  children  under  five  posed  ‘‘no  demonstrated 
health risk.’’ 64 The European Union’s risk assessment for DINP concluded: ‘‘The end 
products  containing  DINP  (clothes,  building  materials,  toys  and  baby  equipment) 
and  the  sources  of  exposure  (car  and  public  transport  interiors,  food  and  food  pack-
aging)  are  unlikely  to  pose  a  risk  for  consumers  (adults,  infants  and  newborns)  fol-
lowing inhalation, skin contact and ingestion.’’ 65 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

61 

Paradoxically,  at  the  same  time  the  science  was  providing  reassurance  about  the 
use of phthalates in children’s products, European politicians were urging more and 
more stringent restrictions on such use, resulting in the permanent ban in 2005 on 
the use DEHP, DBP and BBP in toys, and DINP, DIDP and DNOP in toys intended 
to  be  mouthed.  Since  1999,  the  risk  assessments  conducted  by  the  CPSC  and  the 
EU  have  provided  high-quality  scientific  evidence  that  the  use  of  most  phthalate 
plasticizers, in particular DINP, in toys and children’s articles poses little to no risk 
to  children.  Contrary  to  assertions  made  by  some,  there  is  little  uncertainty  about 
these conclusions. There are always remaining questions to be addressed by science; 
however,  phthalates  are  among  the  best  studied  compounds  in  the  world,  and  the 
risk assessments are based on recent, state-of-the-art studies. 

In the meantime, early concerns from the 1990s about DEHP with respect to car-
cinogenicity  observed  in  rodents  following  high  dosing  were  investigated  and  ad-
dressed  following  additional  research.  In  2000,  based  on  its  judgment  that  the  ro-
dent  results  were  not  relevant  to  humans,  the  arm  of  the  World  Health  Organiza-
tion  called  the  International  Agency  for  Research  on  Cancer  (IARC)—the  inter-
national  authority  on  cancer—changed  its  classification  for  DEHP  to  ‘‘not  classifi-
able’’ as a human carcinogen. Regulatory agencies in Europe and Canada have also 
reached the same conclusion. 

Accordingly,  based  on  the  science  and  the  use  patterns  for  phthalates,  no  restric-
tion on the use of phthalates in toys and childcare articles is warranted at this time. 
The  United  States  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  Risk  Assessment  for  Vinyl 
Toys  Containing  Phthalates  Found  Minimal  to  No  Risk  to  Children  Five  Years 
of Age or Under 

In  late  1998,  The  National  Environmental  Trust  and  other  organizations  peti-
tioned the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) to ban the use of pol-
yvinyl  chloride  (PVC  or  vinyl)  in  products  intended  for  children  5  years  of  age  or 
under.  A  reason  asserted  for  the  ban  was  alleged  health  effects  from  the  phthalate 
used as a plasticizer in vinyl children’s products—diisononyl phthalate (DINP). The 
CPSC  therefore  undertook  an  intensive  investigation  of  the  toxicology  of  DINP  and 
of potential exposure of children to DINP from vinyl products.66 

For  its  review,  CPSC  convened  a  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel  (CHAP)—a 
seven-member  panel  of  independent  scientific  experts  who  conducted  a  detailed  re-
view  of  the  potential  health  hazards  posed  by  DINP  in  products  mouthed  by  chil-
dren. The CHAP met three times over the course of a year and accepted voluminous 
comments  from  representatives  of  both  industry  and  public  interest  groups.  The 
160-page  CHAP  report  was  published  on  June  15,  2001  and  is  available  on  the 
CPSC website.67 
The  CHAP  found  that  120  μg/kg/day  was  an  Acceptable  Daily  Intake  (ADI)  of 
DINP  for  humans—i.e.,  the  amount  of  chemical  a  person  can  be  exposed  to  on  a 
daily  basis  over  an  extended  period  of  time  (up  to  a  lifetime)  with  a  negligible  risk 
of  suffering  adverse  effects.  Based  on  this  ADI,  the  CHAP  concluded  that  a  young 
child  would  have  to  routinely  mouth  DINP-plasticized  toys  for  75  minutes  or  more 
per  day  in  order  to  pose  a  possible  DINP  exposure  risk.  However,  finding  no  evi-
dence  that  children  mouth  such  toys  for  such  extensive  periods,  the  Report  con-
cluded  that  exposure  to  DINP  for  toys  containing  phthalates  poses  little  or  no  risk 
of injury to children. 

To  verify  these  conclusions,  the  CPSC  then  conducted  a  state-of-the-art  study  of 
the  amount  of  time  children  mouth  objects,  and  it  conducted  additional  studies  of 
the rate of migration of DINP from vinyl when mouthed, using a methodology devel-
oped and validated by the TNO Nutrition and Food Research Institute, CPSC, Can-
ada  Health  and  the  European  Commission’s  JRC.68 On  September  23,  2002,  the 
CPSC released a briefing package, summarizing the CPSC staff investigation of the 
potential  risks  of  DINP  in  children’s  vinyl  products.69 The  executive  summary  of 
that package states: 

Based  upon  the  observation  study,  staff  concludes  it  is  very  unlikely  that  chil-
dren will mouth soft plastic toys for more than 75 minutes a day.70 

*

*

*

*

*

*

* 

The staff concurs with the CHAP conclusion that exposure to DINP from DINP- 
containing  toys  would  be  expected  to  pose  a  minimal  to  non-existent  risk  of  in-
jury for the majority of children. The new data from the behavioral observation 
study  not  only  confirm  this  conclusion,  but  also  demonstrate  that  children  are 
exposed  to  DINP  at  lower  levels  than  the  CHAP  assumed  when  it  reached  its 
conclusion. Also, since children mouth other products even less than they mouth 
toys  and  dermal  exposure  is  expected  to  be  negligible,  there  would  be  no  jus-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

tification  for  taking  action  against  other  products  intended  for  children  5  years 
old and younger. 

62 

CPSC  estimated  that  the  most  highly  exposed  group  of  children  (those  aged  3– 
12  months)  had  mean  exposures  to  DINP  of  0.07  μ/kg/day  with  a  95th  percentile 
value  of  0.44.  This  is  well  below  the  CHAP  and  CPSC  conservative  ADI  of  120  μg/ 
kg/day. CPSC also estimated worst case exposures hypothetically assuming that all 
toys,  teethers  and  rattles  were  made  with  DINP-plasticized  vinyl  (in  reality,  only 
a  portion  of  toys  are  made  with  soft  plastic,  only  about  a  third  of  the  soft  plastic 
toys contain DINP, and no rattles or teethers contain DINP). Even under these con-
servative  conditions,  the  estimated  DINP  exposures  for  children  3–12  months  were 
2.91  μg/kg/day  (mean)  and  10.71  μg/kg/day  (95th  percentile),  still  well  below  the 
ADI. Additional detail on the CPSC analysis is provided in Appendix 1. 

The  overall  CPSC  staff  risk  assessment  information  and  conclusions  have  been 
published  in  the  peer  reviewed  literature.71 The  authors  conclude  that  ‘‘oral  expo-
sure to DINP from mouthing soft plastic toys is not likely to present a health hazard 
to children.’’ 72 

On  February  21,  2003,  the  CPSC  Commissioners  voted  unanimously  to  deny  the 
petition.73 As indicated in the denial letter to petitioners, the Commissioners denied 
the petition based on the finding of CPSC that ‘‘there is no demonstrated health risk 
posed by PVC toys or other products intended for children 5 years of age and young-
er.’’ 74 

The CPSC evaluation considered the conditions most likely to result in exposures 
of DINP to children and used very conservative (i.e., health-protective) assumptions. 
CPSC  considered  children  in  those  age  groups  that  most  often  mouth  items;  it  con-
sidered exposure from such mouthing, which would be expected to exceed that which 
could  occur  by  dermal  contact;  and  it  conservatively  evaluated  situations  in  which 
DINP was assumed to be used to a much greater extent in children’s products than 
it  actually  is.  As  explained  in  Appendix  1,  the  acceptable  daily  intake  (ADI)  used 
by  CPSC  also  was  quite  conservative—a  value  100  times  below  levels  at  which  no 
effects have been observed in animal studies. Even with such conservatism, the po-
tential  exposures  were  still  well  below  the  ADI.  Thus,  the  CPSC  concluded  no  re-
strictions on the use of DINP in children’s articles are warranted. 
EU  Risk  Assessments  Demonstrate  That  The  Use  of  Phthalates  in  Vinyl  Toys  and 

Childcare Articles Poses Little or No Risk to Children 

Like  the  CPSC  assessment,  the  EU’s  risk  assessments  of  phthalates  support  the 
safety  of  the  use  of  phthalate  esters  in  toys  and  children’s  products.  As  part  of  its 
existing chemicals program, the EU has published risk assessments for three of the 
six  phthalates  typically  noted  as  of  concern  for  children’s  products,  DBP,75 DIDP 76 
and  DINP,77 and  has  completed  draft  assessments  of  BBP 78 and  DEHP.79 The  re-
maining of the six phthalates, DNOP, has apparently not been the subject of an EU 
risk  assessment  because  the  production  of  this  particular  plasticizer  ceased  more 
than  10  years  ago.  The  EU  risk  assessments,  which  incorporate  the  most  modern 
and up-to-date data and methodology available to the EU, specifically include a con-
sideration  of  risks  to  children  from  all  potential  sources,  including  toys  and 
childcare articles. 
The EU Risk Assessment for DINP Concurs With the CSPC Assessment, Finding No 

Likely Risk to Children 

The  most  relevant  EU  risk  assessment—that  for  DINP—was  published  in  2003. 
Unlike  the  CPSC  risk  assessment,  which  was  intended  only  to  determine  the  risk 
to  children  from  mouthing  objects,  the  EU  assessment  included  an  investigation  of 
the  risk  to  newborns,  infants,  children  and  adults  from  all  routes  of  exposure.  The 
EU  assessment  explicitly  considered  exposures  of  newborns,  infants  and  children 
from  multiple  sources,  including  food  and  food-related  uses,  toys  and  baby  equip-
ment,  car  and  public  transport  interiors,  and  building  material  and  furniture.  The 
EU  risk  assessment  found  no  likely  risk  to  humans  under  any  exposure  scenario. 
As stated in the risk assessment summary document with respect to consumer expo-
sures: 

The  end  products  containing  DINP  (clothes,  building  materials,  toys  and  baby 
equipment) and the sources of exposure (car and public transport interiors, food 
and  food  packaging)  are  unlikely  to  pose  a  risk  for  consumers  (adults,  infants 
and newborns) following inhalation, skin contact and ingestion.80 

The EU risk assessment also found no likely risk to adults, children or infants from 
environmental exposures, or from combined consumer and environmental exposures. 
The EU’s finding of no risk to children under three was based on several calculated 
MOSs  (Margins  of  Safety),  all  of  which  are  above  the  CSTEE’s  recommended  MOS 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

of  at  least  100.  The  EU  risk  assessment  reported  the  following  MOSs  with  respect 
to children: 

63 

• 176 (kidney effects) and 552 (fertility effects) for infants and newborns exposed 

to DINP from multiple consumer pathways, including toys; 

• 107  (kidney  and  liver  effects)  and  336  (testicular  effects)  for  infants  for  com-

bined environmental and consumer exposures, including toys. 

Thus,  the  most  advanced  and  up-to-date  EU  risk  assessment  for  DINP  concurs 
with that of the CPSC: DINP exposure from the mouthing of soft plastic toys poses 
no  likely  risk  to  children.  Further,  the  EU  risk  assessment  for  DINP  demonstrates 
that exposure to DINP from other potential sources also poses no likely health risk. 
Under  such  circumstances,  prohibiting  the  use  of  DINP  in  toys  and  childcare  arti-
cles, whether or not they can be mouthed, is wholly scientifically unfounded. 
U.S.  National  Toxicology  Program  Risk  Assessments  Support  the  Use  of  Phthalate 

Esters 

The  National  Toxicology  Program’s  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human 
Reproduction (NTP) has completed extensive risk assessments on the six phthalates 
that  are  the  subject  of  various  legislative  inquiries  with  respect  to  toys  and  chil-
dren’s articles. The NTP assessed risks to human reproduction and development by 
creating a 16-member independent panel of scientific experts that reviewed the tox-
icity  and  exposure  information  related  to  each  phthalate.  After  three  public  meet-
ings  at  which  the  key  studies  and  issues  were  discussed,  the  expert  panel  issued 
a  report  to  NTP  for  each  phthalate.  Based  on  the  expert  panel  reports,  NTP  then 
published  a  Brief  for  each  phthalate,  in  which  it  reported  its  level  of  concern  that 
the  various  phthalates  cause  developmental  or  reproductive  effects  in  humans.  The 
NTP  Brief,  expert  panel  report  and  responses  to  public  comments  were  combined 
in  a  Monograph  published  for  each  phthalate.81 The  NTP’s  conclusions  for  each 
phthalate were: 

• For DINP, the NTP found ‘‘minimal concern’’ for developmental or reproductive 

• For  DIDP,  the  NTP  found  ‘‘minimal  concern’’  for  developmental  effects  in 

• For BBP, the NTP found ‘‘minimal concern’’ for developmental effects in fetuses 

effects in children; 

fetuses and children; 

and children; 

• For DBP, the NTP did not express a concern level for fetuses and children, pri-
marily because of the low possibility of exposure from toys, but found ‘‘minimal 
concern’’  for  developmental  effects  when  pregnant  women  are  exposed  to  aver-
age levels of DBP; 

• For  DNOP,  the  NTP  did  not  express  a  concern  level  for  fetuses  and  children, 
also based on the low possibility of exposure, but expressed ‘‘negligible concern’’ 
for effects on adult reproductive systems; 

• For DEHP, the NTP expressed ‘‘serious concern’’ only for critically ill male pre-
maturely  born  infants  with  very  high  medical  exposures,  ‘‘concern’’  for  infants 
of  mothers  with  intensive  medical  treatments,  and  ‘‘some  concern’’  for  children 
older than 1 year, based on very high assumed exposures from all sources. 

In  sum,  the  NTP  risk  assessments  typically  expressed  minimal  concern  for  ad-
verse  developmental  effects  in  fetuses  and  children,  in  particular  for  DINP,  the 
phthalate most commonly used in toys. The only concern above ‘‘minimal’’ expressed 
by NTP was for very high exposures to DEHP, which is not used in the manufacture 
of  children’s  articles  intended  to  be  mouthed  and  therefore  unlikely  to  approach 
these exposure levels. 

An extensive body of research on phthalates, including several recently completed 
U.S. and EU risk assessments, demonstrates that the use of phthalates as a plasti-
cizer in toys and objects used by children poses little to no risk to children. 
Additivity is Not a Concern 

Some have expressed concern that exposures to phthalates could be added up and 
that  this  total  could  present  a  health  hazard.  Currently,  reports  of  human  hazard 
associated with aggregate or cumulative exposures to phthalates are limited, and no 
reproducible evidence of human hazard has been reported. However, based on recent 
U.S. Centers for Disease Control (CDC) biomonitoring data, humans are exposed to 
extremely low levels of several phthalates simultaneously (the detection of multiple 
phthalate metabolites in the urine confirms exposure, but does not inform consider-
ations  of  hazard  or  risk).  Exposure  data  published  by  the  CDC  indicate  that  levels 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

64 

of  phthalates  to  which  humans  are  exposed  are  much  lower  than  doses  with  which 
additivity has been demonstrated in rodents. 

It  is  also  seen  from  the  CDC  data  that  maximum  exposure  in  the  most  sensitive 
human  subpopulations  are  still  orders  of  magnitude  less  than  doses  with  which 
additivity  has  been  demonstrated  in  rodents.82 Since  the  current  reference  dose  for 
DBP  (EPA  IRIS)  is  0.3  mg/kg/day,  the  estimated  theoretical  toxicity  threshold  for 
combined  exposure  to  the  most  potent  phthalate  rodent  toxicants  DEHP,  DBP, 
DIBP,  and  BBP  would  also  be  orders  of  magnitude  higher  than  the  RfD  for  DBP 
based  on  the  simple  dose  addition  model.  It  should  be  noted  that  synergistic  ef-
fects—where the presence of one chemical enhances the effects of the second—do not 
appear to be seen in tests. 
Recent Human Studies Contain Serious Flaws and Do Not Suggest a Need for Action 
Several  recent  statistical  studies  have  been  cited  as  supporting  the  view  that 
phthalates  may  pose  risks  of  reproductive  health  risks  to  humans  from  phthalates. 
These  studies,  however,  while  suggesting  areas  where  additional  scientific  inquiry 
is desirable, are by no means dispositive, and in some cases contradict earlier find-
ings in rodent studies. 
Main Study 

Danish  researcher  Katharina  Main  and  co-authors  of  the  study,  ‘‘Human  Breast 
Milk  Contamination  with  Phthalates  and  Alterations  of  Endogenous  Reproductive 
Hormones  in  Infants  Three  Months  of  Age,’’  have  suggested  that  exposure  to 
phthalates  affect  reproductive  hormones  in  baby  boys.83 Main’s  study  involved  tak-
ing  breast  milk  samples  during  the  first  three  post-natal  months  from  the  mothers 
of  130  boys  and  analyzing  the  samples  for  various  phthalate  esters  metabolites. 
Sixty-two of the boys exhibited cryptorchidism, and 68 did not. The study, however, 
does  not  support  Main’s  claims  because  it  found  no  association  between  phthalate 
monoester  levels  and  cryptorchidism.  In  addition,  there  was  no  significant  correla-
tion  between  MEHP  and  serum  samples  of  gonadotropins,  sex-hormone  binding 
globulin (SHBG), testosterone and inhibin B. 
Hauser Study 

A  second  frequently  cited  study,  conducted  by  Hauser  et  al.,  (2006),  did  not  dem-
onstrate an association between semen quality and levels of DEP metabolites in the 
urine.84 The subjects were 463 males from subfertile couples and a group of control 
men.  In  general,  the  above  statistical  study  provides  results  that  are  anecdotal  in 
nature.  They  show  a  statistical  association  between  a  common  chemical,  or  class  of 
chemicals  often  used  in  personal  care  products,  and  a  selected  reproductive  param-
eter.  However,  there  is  no  causal  relationship  established,  and  there  is  no  evalua-
tion of other common, non-phthalate environmental chemicals. The latter evaluation 
would be necessary to establish that the increases in phthalate levels were not sim-
ply  a  biomarker  of  exposure  to  environmental  chemicals  in  general,  as  opposed  to 
a specific toxicant. 
Swan Study 

A  third  study  which  has  been  reported  to  associate  phthalates  with  reproductive 
health risks was conducted by Shanna Swan et al.85 This study was intended to test 
the  hypothesis  that  in  utero  exposure  to  phthalic  acid  diesters  blocks  the  action  of 
testosterone in the male human fetus as reflected by changes in the anogenital dis-
tance (AGD), adjusted for body weight. Testosterone inhibition alters this parameter 
in  reproductive  tract  studies  of  laboratory  animals.  This  study  examines  statistical 
associations between physical genital measurements in 85 boys, up to 28 months of 
age,  and  a  corresponding  set  of  measurements  of  phthalate  monoester  metabolites 
in single spot urine samples collected from their mothers during the pregnancy. The 
hypothesis  of  Swan  et  al.  i.e.,  that  exposures  in  the  environment  to  several 
phthalates  pose  a  hazard  to  male  reproductive  development,  is  not  supported,  how-
ever, due to five major flaws in the study: 

1.  The  urine  samples  collected  from  the  pregnant  women  are  neither  reliable 
nor  valid  for  measuring  their  exposure  to  phthalates.  The  samples  taken  were 
not adjusted for variable fluid intake, were not adjusted for the time of day the 
samples were taken, and otherwise did not follow standard procedures, making 
the  samples  useless  for  obtaining  accurate  measurements  of  phthalate  expo-
sures. 
2.  The  anogenital  distance  (AGD)  measurement  is  of  no  known  significance  in 
humans. It is not a standard measurement in the practice of medicine and has 
never  been  related  to  any  reproductive  system  problems.  It  is  also  difficult  to 
measure  accurately.  Twenty  percent  of  the  boys  measured  were  dropped  from 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

65 

the  analysis  because  the  researchers  judged  that  reliable  measurements  could 
not  be  obtained  for  those  boys.  It  is  quite  possible  that  many  of  the  measure-
ments on the remaining 80 percent also were not accurate. 
3.  Converting  the  AGD  to  an  anogenital  index  (AGI)  was  an  attempt  to  correct 
for  varying  weight  and  age,  but  ignores  the  fact  that  while  the  AGD  does 
change with those two variables, the changes are not linear, and the correction 
is  therefore  incorrect.  Also,  the  researchers  did  not  compensate  for  other  vari-
ables, like height or premature birth, in the infant’s history. 
4.  In  addition  to  the  normal  variations  in  weight  and  age,  some  measured  in-
fants  were  pre-term  or  even  premature  (which  could  well  affect  variables  such 
as AGD, and genital effects), but were not excluded from the study. 
5.  It  appears  the  researchers  used  the  wrong  statistical  model  to  get  their  re-
sults. The statistical association claimed by the researchers is based on a model 
that  predicts  a  relatively  rapid  decrease  in  AGI  at  low  phthalate  levels  and 
much smaller decreases at higher levels. But this relationship is not biologically 
plausible;  it  should  be  the  other  way  around.  Thus,  there  is  some  question  re-
garding the results of a study based on a possibly incorrect model. 

The  Swan  study  has  been  widely  criticized  as  having  significant  flaws,  and  it  is 

also noted as having been misreported by the press: 

[We] examined this study carefully and found some methodological problems, as 
well as a clear misinterpretation of the results by the press. The baby boys were 
not  ‘‘demasculinized’’  in  any  way:  the  boys  had  a  smaller  anogenital  index, 
which  is  a  measure  of  the  distance  from  the  anus  to  the  scrotum,  adjusted  for 
weight. In rats, under high doses of phthalates, this anatomical change also oc-
curs,  as  does  damage  to  the  reproductive  systems  of  the  rats.  In  humans,  no 
damage  to  the  reproductive  system  was  measured  at  all.  And  the  shortened 
anogenital  distance  was  well  within  normal  ranges  for  baby  boys.  (See  http:// 
www.stats.org/stories/WSJlgiveslskewedlphthaloct05l05.htm) 

Colon Study 

A Puerto Rican study measured blood levels of a variety of substances—including 
phthalates—in  young  Puerto  Rican  girls  with  a  condition  called  thelarche,  or  pre-
mature  breast  development.86 Reporting  of  the  study  results  appeared  to  have 
caused confusion. In fact, the authors of the study stated that phthalate esters ‘‘can-
not  be  interpreted  as  the  cause  of  premature  thelarche  in  Puerto  Rican  girls.’’  Sev-
eral key points in support of this conclusion follow: 

1.  Phthalates  have  been  tested  for  their  ability  to  act  as  estrogens.  The  weight 
of  the  scientific  evidence  demonstrates  that  these  substances  are  not  estro-
genic.2 Without  a  strong  indication  that  phthalates  could  induce  an  estrogenic 
response in laboratory animals, it is unscientific speculation to suggest that es-
trogen-induced effects, such as thelarche, could be produced by phthalates. 
2.  The  authors  observe  the  possibility  for  multiple  causes  of  thelarche:  ‘‘It  may 
well  be  that  the  etiology  of  the  various  manifestations  of  premature  sexual  de-
velopment (including thelarche) on this island is multifactorial.’’ 
3.  Thelarche  has  been  studied  for  years.  Researchers  have  identified  numerous 
possible  causes  and  the  authors  themselves  note:  ‘‘The  following  have  already 
been  associated  with  premature  sexual  development  in  Puerto  Rico:  the  pres-
ence of anabolic steroids in poultry and consumption of soy-based formula with 
a high phytoestrogen content by Puerto Rican infants.’’ 
4.  There  is  a  considerable  body  of  scientific  research  that  indicates  phthalates 
do  not  affect  the  female  endocrine  system.  In  a  recent  review  of  the  data  on 
phthalates,  the  National  Toxicology  Program  Center  for  Evaluation  of  Risks  to 
Human  Reproduction  (CERHR)  Expert  Panel  expressed  no  concern  related  to 
developmental effects in girls from phthalate exposures. 

The  apparent  high  incidence  of  thelarche  in  this  population  seems  unusual  and 
warrants  continued  investigation.  The  Colon  study  does  not  show  phthalates  to  be 
a  causative  factor  and,  for  the  reasons  stated  above,  believes  it  is  highly  unlikely 
that phthalates are a factor for thelarche. 

In  general,  the  above  statistical  studies  provide  results  that  are  anecdotal  in  na-
ture.  They  show  a  statistical  association  between  a  common  chemical,  or  class  of 
chemicals  used  in  personal  care  products,  and  a  selected  reproductive  parameter. 
However,  there  is  no  causal  relationship  established,  and  there  is  no  evaluation  of 
other common, non-phthalate environmental chemicals. The latter evaluation would 
be  necessary  to  establish  that  the  increases  in  phthalate  levels  were  not  simply  a 
biomarker  of  exposure  to  environmental  chemicals  in  general,  as  opposed  to  a  spe-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

66 

cific  toxicant.  Significantly,  EPA  has  found  that  Swan  and  other  epidemiological 
studies  purporting  to  show  a  correlation  between  phthalate  exposure  and  reproduc-
tive  effects  are  unsuitable  for  use  in  the  risk  assessment  process  because  they  can-
not demonstrate causation.87 
Conclusion 

From a toxicological perspective, BPA and phthalates are among the most well de-
fined  chemicals  on  Earth.  They  have  been  the  subject  of  hundreds  of  studies  in  lab 
animals  and  numerous  government-sponsored  assessments.  Accordingly,  based  on 
the  science  and  the  use  patterns  for  these  compounds,  no  restriction  on  their  uses 
in current applications is warranted at this time. 

APPENDIX 1 

Extended  Summary  of  the  United  States  Consumer  Product  Safety 

Commission Risk Assessment of the Phthlate Ester, DINP 

In  1998,  the  United  States  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  (CPSC),  in  re-
sponse  to  a  petition  from  several  organizations  to  ban  the  use  of  PVC  in  products 
intended for children 5 years of age or under, undertook a rigorous investigation of 
the  toxicology  of  DINP  and  of  potential  exposure  of  children  to  DINP  from  vinyl 
products.  As  part  of  its  investigation,  CPSC  convened  a  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory 
Panel  (CHAP)—a  seven-member  panel  of  independent  experts  who  conducted  a  de-
tailed  review  of  the  potential  health  hazards  posed  by  DINP  in  products  mouthed 
by  children.  The  CHAP  report,  which  was  published  on  June  15,  2001,88 came  to 
the following conclusions regarding overall risk from exposure to DINP: 

• ‘‘The  CHAP  concludes  that  humans  do  not  currently  receive  DINP  doses  from 
DINP-containing consumer products that are plausibly associated with a signifi-
cant increase in cancer risk.’’ 

• ‘‘[T]he  risk  to  reproductive  and  developmental  processes  in  humans  due  to 

DINP exposure is extremely low or non-existent.’’ 

• ‘‘There may be a DINP risk to young children who routinely mouth DINP-plasti-
cized toys for 75 minutes per day or more. For most children, exposure to DINP 
from DINP-containing toys would be expected to pose a minimal to non-existent 
risk of injury.’’ 

The  CHAP  based  its  conclusions  regarding  children’s  risk  on  a  plausible  upper- 
bound  estimate  of  DINP  exposure  of  0.28  mg/kg/day  for  0–18  month  old  children, 
assuming  those  children  mouth  soft  plastic  toys  for  3  hours  every  day.89 However, 
in  reaching  its  conclusion,  the  CHAP  emphasized  the  uncertainty  associated  with 
available  DINP  migration  rate  data,  and  questioned  the  robustness  of  existing 
mouthing  behavior  studies  relied  upon  to  calculate  the  upper-bound  estimate,  stat-
ing  that  ‘‘important  covariates  such  as  developmental  age,  physical  condition,  eth-
nicity,  and  other  sociodemographic  indicators  are  not  reported.’’ 90 Because  of  these 
uncertainties,  the  CHAP  described  its  estimated  child  DINP  exposures  as  ‘‘prelimi-
nary at best.’’ 91 

To  more  accurately  estimate  potential  child  exposures  to  DINP,  the  CPSC  con-
ducted  an  extensive,  state-of-the-art  study  to  quantify  the  cumulative  time  per  day 
that young children spend mouthing all objects, including toys, and conducted addi-
tional  migration  rate  studies.  The  child  mouthing  study,  described  in  Greene 
(2002) 92 and  Kiss  (2001),93 was  conducted  in  two  phases,  in  which  more  than  550 
children ranging in age from 0 through 36 months were observed and their mouth-
ing  behaviors  recorded.  In  Phase  1,  the  mouthing  behaviors  of  491  children  ages  0 
through 81 months were observed and recorded to the nearest minute by their par-
ents or legal guardians for four 15-minute periods over 2 days. In Phase 2, a trained 
observer  observed  and  recorded  the  mouthing  behaviors  of  169  children  (109  of 
whom had participated in Phase I) ages 3 through 26 months for a total of 4 hours 
on at least two different days. The observer conducted the observations at different 
times  of  the  day,  and  if  the  child  attended  a  child  care  facility  outside  the  home, 
attempts  were  made  to  observe  the  child  there  as  well.  Children  were  selected  to 
ensure  that  the  subjects  were  reasonably  representative  of  the  overall  population 
with regard to race, income, type of child care and gender. 

The  CPSC’s  mouthing  study  revealed  that  for  all  objects  other  than  pacifiers, 

which do not contain DINP, estimated average daily mouthing times were: 

• 70 minutes for children between 3 months and 1 year of age; 
• 48 minutes for children between 1 year and 2 years; and 
• 37 minutes for children between 2 and 3 years of age. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

67 

For all soft plastic items other than pacifiers, which comprise the items that could 

contain DINP, estimated average daily mouthing times were only; 

• 1.3 minutes for the 3–12 month olds; 
• 1.9 minutes for the 1–2 year olds; and 
• 0.8 minutes for the 2–3 year olds. 
Significantly,  these  data  show  that  for  even  the  youngest  children,  who  typically 
mouth  the  most,  the  average  mouthing  time  for  all  objects  other  than  pacifiers  is 
below the 75 minutes per day potential risk threshold identified by the CHAP. More 
importantly,  the  average  amount  of  time  children  spend  mouthing  soft  plastic  toys, 
the  objects  that  could  contain  DINP,  is  less  than  2  minutes  per  day—far  below 
CHAP’s  75  minutes  per  day  threshold,  and  far  below  prior  mouthing  estimates.  In 
addition,  these  mouthing  times  are  significantly  lower  than  the  times  estimated  by 
the  Dutch  Consensus  Group  study  relied  upon  by  the  EU,  which  found  average 
mouthing times for ‘‘plastic toys’’ of 17 minutes for 0–18 month olds.94 As stated by 
the  CPSC  in  its  Executive  Summary  ‘‘[t]hese  new  mouthing  data  are  much  lower 
than earlier estimates and show an even smaller risk of exposure to DINP for chil-
dren mouthing and chewing soft plastic toys.’’ 

In  addition  to  the  mouthing  study,  the  CPSC  also  performed  a  migration  rate 
study 95 using a modified head over heals (HoH) method developed and validated by 
the TNO Nutrition and Food Research Institute, CPSC, Canada Health and the Eu-
ropean  Commission’s  JRC.96 CSPC  tested  41  children’s  products  that,  according  to 
their labeling, could be mouthed, sucked or chewed. Using the HoH method, the re-
lease of DINP was found to range from 1.05 to 11.09 μg/min/10cm2. 

Assuming that a child mouths a typical variety of objects and toys, the CPSC esti-
mated that the most highly exposed group of children (those aged 3–12 months) had 
mean  exposures  to  DINP  of  0.07  μg/kg/day  with  a  95th  percentile  value  of  0.44  μg/ 
kg/day. These mean and 95th percentile exposure levels are, respectively, more than 
1,700  and  270-fold  below  CHAP  and  CPSC’s  Acceptable  Daily  Intake  (ADI)  of  120 
μg/kg/day. 

The ADI is an estimate of the amount of chemical a person can be exposed to on 
a daily basis for an extended period of time (up to a lifetime) with a negligible risk 
of  suffering  deleterious  effects.  The  ADI  for  DINP  was  calculated  using  a  Bench-
mark Dose (BD05) of 12 mg/kg/day and dividing by a 100-fold safety factor. The BD05 
is generally considered more robust than a NOAEL, whose value is tied to an arbi-
trarily  chosen  dose  level,  because  it  takes  into  account  all  available  dose  response 
data.  For  DINP,  the  CPSC  calculated  the  BD05 by  fitting  a  mathematical  model  to 
pooled dose response data from two chronic exposure studies (Lington et al., 1997; 97 
Moore 1998 98). In this case, the BD05 of 12 mg/kg/day is not only more robust than 
a  NOAEL  from  a  single  study,  but  is  more  conservative,  as  its  value  is  lower  than 
either  of  the  two  studies’  reported  NOAELs.  Thus,  the  CSPC  data  indicate  that  a 
typical child’s exposure to DINP from soft plastic toys is well below the ADI, a con-
servative estimate of safe exposure levels of DINP. 

In  addition  to  estimating  exposure  to  a  typical  child,  the  CPSC  also  conducted  a 
worst-case  exposure  estimate,  hypothetically  assuming  that  all  toys,  teethers  and 
rattles  that  the  children  mouthed  were  made  with  DINP-plasticized  vinyl,  when  in 
reality,  only  a  portion  of  toys  are  made  with  soft  plastic,  only  about  a  third  of  soft 
plastic  toys  contain  DINP,  and  no  rattles  or  teethers  contain  DINP.  Even  applying 
these very conservative assumptions, the estimated DINP exposures for children 3– 
12  months  were  only  2.91  μg/kg/day  (mean)  and  10.71  μg/kg/day  (95th  percentile), 
still well below the CPSC’s conservative ADI of 120 μg/kg/day. 

On  September  23,  2002,  the  CPSC  released  a  briefing  package  that  summarized 
the CPSC staff investigation of the potential risks of DINP in children’s vinyl prod-
ucts.99 The executive summary of that package states: 

Based  upon  the  observation  study,  staff  concludes  it  is  very  unlikely  that  chil-
dren will mouth soft plastic toys for more than 75 minutes a day.100 

*

*

*

*

*

*

* 

The staff concurs with the CHAP conclusion that exposure to DINP from DINP- 
containing  toys  would  be  expected  to  pose  a  minimal  to  non-existent  risk  of  in-
jury for the majority of children. The new data from the behavioral observation 
study  not  only  confirm  this  conclusion,  but  also  demonstrate  that  children  are 
exposed  to  DINP  at  lower  levels  than  the  CHAP  assumed  when  it  reached  its 
conclusion. Also, since children mouth other products even less than they mouth 
toys  and  dermal  exposure  is  expected  to  be  negligible,  there  would  be  no  jus-
tification  for  taking  action  against  other  products  intended  for  children  5  years 
old and younger. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

68 

The  overall  CPSC  staff  risk  assessment  information  and  conclusions  have  been 
published  in  the  peer  reviewed  literature.101 In  this  publication,  the  authors  state 
that  they  ‘‘conclude  that  oral  exposure  to  DINP  from  mouthing  soft  plastic  toys  is 
not likely to present a health hazard to children.’’ 102 

On  February  21,  2003,  the  CPSC  Commissioners  voted  unanimously  to  deny  the 
petition  to  ban  the  use  of  PVC  in  products  intended  for  children  5  years  of  age  or 
under.103 As indicated in the denial letter to petitioners, the Commissioners denied 
the petition based on the finding of CPSC that ‘‘there is no demonstrated health risk 
posed by PVC toys or other products intended for children 5 years of age and young-
er.’’ 104 
Endnotes 

1 European  Food  Safety  Authority.  January  29,  2007.  Opinion  of  the  Scientific  Panel  on  Food 
Additives,  Flavourings,  Processing  Aids  and  Materials  in  Contact  with  Food  (AFC)  related  to 
2,2-BIS(4-HYDROXYPHENYL)PROPANE.  A  summary  report  and  full  report  are  available  at 
http://www.efsa.europa.eu/en/science/afc/afclopinions/bisphenolla.html. 

2 European  Commission.  April  17,  2002.  Opinion  of  the  Scientific  Committee  on  Food  on 

Bisphenol A. Available at http://ec.europa.eu/food/fs/sc/scf/out128len.pdf. 

3 Information  on  the  CERHR  evaluation,  including  the  April  14  NTP  draft  brief,  is  available 
at  http://cerhr.niehs.nih.gov/chemicals/bisphenol/bisphenol.html.  The  final  report  will  also  be 
posted on this site. 

4 European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report—4,4’-isopropylidenediphenol  (Bisphenol-A).  2003. 
Available  at  http://ecb.jrc.it/DOCUMENTS/Existing-Chemicals/RISKlASSESSMENT/SUM-
MARY/bisphenolasum325.pdf  (summary)  and  http://ecb.jrc.it/DOCUMENTS/Existing-Chemi-
cals/RISKlASSESSMENT/REPORT/bisphenolareport325.pdf (full report). 

5 European  Commission.  May  22,  2002.  Scientific  Committee  on  Toxicity,  Ecotoxicity  and  the 
Environment  (CSTEE);  Opinion  on  the  results  of  the  Risk  Assessment  of:  Bisphenol  A;  Human 
Health  Part.  Available  at  http://ec.europa.eu/health/phlrisk/committees/sct/documents/ 
out156len.pdf. 

6 An  abstract  and  detailed  summary  of  the  bisphenol  A  risk  assessment  are  available  at 

http://unit.aist.go.jp/crm/mainmenu/el1-10.html. 

7 Tyl,  R.W.,  Myers,  C.B.,  Marr,  M.C.,  Thomas,  B.F.,  Keimowitz,  A.R.,  Brine,  D.R.,  Veselica, 
M.M., Fail, P.A., Chang, T.Y., Seely, J.C., Joiner, R.L., Butala, J.H., Dimond, S.S., Cagen, S.Z., 
Shiotsuka,  R.N.,  Stropp,  G.D.,  and  Waechter,  J.M.  2002.  Three-generation  reproductive  toxicity 
study of dietary bisphenol A in CD Sprague-Dawley rats. Toxicological Sciences. 68:121–146. 

8 Tyl,  R.W.,  Myers,  C.B.,  and  Marr,  M.C.  2007.  Two-generation  reproductive  toxicity  evalua-
tion of bisphenol A (BPA; CAS No. 80–05–7) administered in the feed to CD–1 Swiss mice (modi-
fied OECD 416). RTI International. 

9 Ema,  M.,  Fujii,  S.,  Furukawa,  M.,  Kiguchi,  M.,  Ikka,  T.,  and  Harazono,  A.  2001.  Rat  two- 

generation reproductive toxicity study of bisphenol A. Reproductive Toxicology. 15:505–523. 

10 Reel,  J.R.,  J.D.  George,  C.B.  Myers,  A.D.  Lawton,  and  J.C.  Lamb  IV.  1985.  Bisphenol  A: 
Reproduction  and  Fertility  Assessment  in  CD–1  Mice  When  Administered  in  the  Feed.  Final 
Study Report, NTP/NIEHS Contract No. N01–ES–2–5014, National Technical Information Serv-
ice (NTIS) Accession No. PB86–103207. 

11 Tyl,  R.W.,  Myers,  C.B.,  and  Marr,  M.C.  2002.  Abbreviated  one-generation  study  of  dietary 

bisphenol A (BPA in CD–1 (Swiss) mice. RTI International. 

12 George, J.D., Price, C.J., Tyl, R.W., Marr, M.C., and Kimmel, C.A. 1985. Teratologic evalua-
tion of bisphenol A (CAS No. 80–05–7) administered to CD–1 mice on gestational days 6 through 
15. National Technical Information Service (NTIS) Accession No. PB85–205102. 

13 George, J.D., Price, C.J., Tyl, R.W., Marr, M.C., and Kimmel, C.A. 1985. Teratologic evalua-
tion  of  bisphenol  A  (CAS  No.  80–05–7)  administered  to  CD  rats  on  gestational  days  6  through 
15. National Technical Information Service (NTIS) Accession No. PB85–205110. 

14 Gould,  J.C.,  Leonard,  L.S.,  Maness,  S.C.,  Wagner,  B.L.,  Conner,  K.,  Zacharewski,  T.,  Safe, 
S.,  McDonnell,  D.P.,  Gaido,  K.W.  1998.  Bisphenol  A  interacts  with  the  estrogen  receptor  alpha 
in a distinct manner from estradiol. Molecular and Cellular Endocrinology. 142:203–214. 

15 Vo¨lkel,  W.,  Bittner,  N.,  and  Dekant,  W.  2005.  Quantitation  of  bisphenol  A  and  bisphenol 
A  glucuronide  in  biological  samples  by  HPLC-MS/MS.  Drug  Metabolism  and  Disposition. 
33:1748–1757. 

16 Vo¨lkel,  W.,  Colnot,  T.,  Csanady,  G.A.,  Filser,  J.G.,  and  Dekant,  W.  2002.  Metabolism  and 
kinetics of bisphenol A in humans at low doses following oral administration. Chemical Research 
in Toxicology. 15:1281–1287. 

17 Tsukioka,  T.,  Terasawa,  J.,  Sato,  S.,  Hatayama,  Y.,  Makino,  T.,  and  Nakazawa,  H.  2004. 
Development  of  analytical  method  for  determining  trace  amounts  of  BPA  in  urine  samples  and 
estimation of exposure to BPA. Journal of Environmental Chemistry. 14:57–63. 

18 Inoue, H., Yuki, G., Yokota, H., and Kato, S. 2003. Bisphenol A glucuronidation and absorp-

tion in rat intestine. Drug Metabolism and Disposition. 31:140–144. 

19 Pritchett,  J.J.,  Kuester,  R.K.,  and  Sipes,  I.G.  2002.  Metabolism  of  bisphenol  A  in  primary 
cultured  hepatocytes  from  mice,  rats,  and  human.  Drug  Metabolism  and  Disposition.  30:1180– 
1185. 

20 Elsby,  R.,  Maggs,  J.L.,  Ashby,  J.,  and  Park,  B.K.  2001.  Comparison  of  the  modulatory  ef-
fects  of  human  and  rat  liver  microsomal  on  the  estrogenicity  of  bisphenol  A:  Implications  for 
extrapolation  to  humans.  The  Journal  of  Pharmacology  and  Experimental  Therapeutics. 
297:103–113. 

21 Nakagawa,  Y.  and  Tayama,  S.  2000.  Metabolism  and  cytotoxicity  of  bisphenol  A  and  other 

bisphenols in isolated rat hepatocytes. Archives of Toxicology. 74:99–105. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

69 

22 Yokota, H., Iwano, H., Endo, M., Kobayashi, T., Inoue, H., Ikushiro, S., and Yuasa, A. 1999. 
isoform  of  UDP- 

Glucuronidation  of  the  environmental  oestrogen  bisphenol  A  by  an 
glucuronosyltransferase, UGT2B1 in the rat liver. Biochemical Journal. 340:405–409. 

23 Knaak,  J.B.  and  Sullivan,  L.J.  1966.  Metabolism  of  bisphenol  A  in  the  rat.  Toxicology  and 

Applied Pharmacology. 8:175–184. 

24 Upmeier,  A.,  Degen,  G.H.,  Diel,  P.,  Michna,  H.,  and  Bolt,  H.  2000.  Toxicokinetics  of 
bisphenol A in female DA/Han rats after a single i.v. and oral administration. Archives of Toxi-
cology. 74:431–436. 

25 Pottenger,  L.H.,  Domoradzki,  J.Y.,  Markham,  D.A.,  Hansen,  S.C.,  Cagen,  S.Z.,  and 
Waechter,  J.M.  2000.  The  relative  bioavailability  and  metabolism  of  bisphenol  A  in  rats  is  de-
pendent upon the route of administration. Toxicological Sciences. 54:3–18. 

26 Yoo,  S.D.,  Shin,  B.S.,  Lee,  B.M.,  Lee,  K.C.,  Han,  S.-Y.,  Kim,  H.S.,  Kwack,  S.J.,  and  Park, 
K.L. 2001. Bioavailability and mammary excretion of bisphenol A in Sprague-Dawley rats. Jour-
nal of Toxicology and Environmental Health, Part A. 64:417–426. 

27 Takahashi,  O.  and  Oishi,  S.  2000.  Disposition  of  orally  administered  2,2-bis(4- 
hydroxyphenyl)propane (Bisphenol A) in pregnant rats and the placental transfer to fetuses. En-
vironmental Health Perspectives. 108:931–935. 

28 Kurebayashi,  H.,  Harada,  R.,  Stewart,  R.K.,  Numata,  H.,  and  Ohno,  Y.  2002.  Disposition 
of  a  low  dose  of  bisphenol  A  in  male  and  female  Cynomolgus  monkeys.  Toxicological  Sciences. 
68:32–42. 

29 Kurebayashi, H., Nagatsuka, S.-I., Nemoto, H., Noguchi, H., and Ohno, Y. 2005. Disposition 
of  low  doses  of  14C-bisphenol  A  in  male,  female,  pregnant,  fetal,  and  neonatal  rats.  Archives  of 
Toxicology. 79:243–252. 

30 Domoradzki,  J.Y.,  Pottenger,  L.H.,  Thornton,  C.M.,  Hansen,  S.C.,  Card,  T.L.,  Markham, 
D.A.,  Dryzga,  M.D.,  Shiotsuka,  R.N.,  and  Waechter  Jr.,  J.M.  2003.  Metabolism  and  pharmaco-
kinetics  of  bisphenol  A  (BPA)  and  the  embryo-fetal  distribution  of  BPA  and  BPA- 
monoglucuronide in CD Sprague-Dawley rats at three gestational stages. Toxicological Sciences. 
76:21–34. 

31 Domoradzki,  J.Y.,  Thornton,  C.M.,  Pottenger,  L.H.,  Hansen,  S.C.,  Card,  T.L.,  Markham, 
D.A.,  Dryzga,  M.D.,  Shiotsuka,  R.  N.,  and  Waechter,  J.M.  2004.  Age  and  dose  dependency  of 
the pharmacokinetics and metabolism of bisphenol A in neonatal Sprague-Dawley rats following 
oral administration. Toxicological Sciences. 77:230–242. 
32 Matthews,  J.B.,  Twomey,  K.,  and  Zacharewski,  T.R.  2001.  In  vitro  and  in  vivo  interactions 
of  bisphenol  A  and  its  metabolite,  bisphenol  A  glucuronide,  with  estrogen  receptors  α  and  β. 
Chemical Research in Toxicology. 14:149–157. 

33 Shimizu,  M.,  Ohta,  K.,  Matsumoto,  Y.,  Fukuoka,  M.,  Ohno,  Y.,  and  Ozawa,  S.  Sulfation  of 
bisphenol  A  abolished  its  estrogenicity  based  on  proliferation  and  gene  expression  in  human 
breast cancer MCF–7 cells. Toxicology in Vitro. 16:549–556 (2002). 

34 Calafat, a. M., Ye, X., Wong, L.-Y., Reidy, J.A., and Needham, L.L. 2007 (on-line). Exposure 
of  the  U.S.  population  to  bisphenol  A  and  4-tertiary-octylphenol:  2003–2004.  Environmental 
Health Perspectives. In press. 

35 Ouchi, K. and Watanabe, S. 2002. Measurement of bisphenol A in human urine using liquid 
chromatography  with  multi-channel  coulometric  electrochemical  detection.  Journal  of  Chroma-
tography B. 780:365–370. 

36 Hanaoka, T., Kawamura, N., Hara, K., and Tsugane, S. 2002. Urinary bisphenol A and plas-
ma hormone concentrations in male workers exposed to bisphenol A diglycidyl ether and mixed 
organic solvents. Occupational and Environmental Medicine. 59:625–628. 

37 Matsumoto,  A.,  Kunugita,  N.,  KIitagawa,  K.,  Isse,  T.,  Oyama,  T.,  Foureman,  G.L.,  Morita, 
M., and Kawamoto, T. 2003. Bisphenol A levels in human urine. Environmental Health Perspec-
tives. 111:101–104. 

38 Fujimaki,  K.,  Arakawa,  C.,  Yoshinaga,  J.,  Watanabe,  C.,  Serizawa,  S.,  Imai,  H.,  Shiraishi, 
H.,  and  Mizumoto,  Y.  Estimation  of  intake  level  of  bisphenol  A  in  Japanese  pregnant  women 
based on measurement of urinary excretion level of the metabolite. Japanese Journal of Hygiene. 
59:403–408. 

39 Kawaguchi,  M.,  Sakui,  N.,  Okanouchi,  N.,  Ito,  R.,  Saito,  K.,  Izumi,  S.,  Makino,  T.,  and 
Nakazawa,  H.  2005.  Stir  bar  sorptive  extraction  with  in  situ  derivatization  and  thermal 
desorption-gas  chromatography-mass  spectrometry  for  measurement  of  phenolic  xenoestrogens 
in human urine samples. Journal of Chromatogrpahy B. 820:49–57. 

40 Kim,  Y.-H.,  Kim,  C.-S.,  Park,  S.,  Han,  S.Y.,  Pyo,  M.-Y.,  and  Yang,  M.  2003.  Gender  dif-
ferences in the levels of bisphenol A metabolites in urine. Biochemical and Biophysical Commu-
nications. 312:441–448. 

41 Yang,  M.,  Kim,  S.-Y.,  Lee,  S.-M.,  Chang,  S.-S.,  Kawamoto,  T.,  Jang,  J.-Y.,  and  Ahn,  Y.-O. 
2003.  Biological  monitoring  of  bisphenol  A  in  a  Korean  population.  Archives  of  Environmental 
Contamination. 44:546–551. 

42 Vo¨lkel,  W.,  Bittner,  N.,  and  Dekant,  W.  2005.  Quantitation  of  bisphenol  A  and  bisphenol 
A  glucuronide  in  biological  samples  by  HPLC–MS/MS.  Drug  Metabolism  and  Disposition. 
33:1748–1757. 

43 Brock,  J.W.,  Yoshimura,  Y.,  Barr,  J.R.,  Maggio,  V.L.,  Graiser,  S.R.,  Nakazawa,  H.,  and 
Needham,  L.L.  2001.  Measurement  of  bisphenol  A  levels  in  human  urine.  Journal  of  Exposure 
Analysis and Environmental Epidemiology. 11:323–328. 

44 Calafat, A.M., Kuklenyik, Z., Reidy, J.A., Caudill, S.P., Ekong, J., and Needham, L.L. 2005. 
Urinary concentrations of bisphenol A and 4-nonyl phenol in a human reference population. En-
vironmental Health Perspectives. 113:391–395. 

45 Tsukioka, T., Brock, J., Graiser, S., Nguyen, J., Nakazawa, H., and Makino, T., 2003. Deter-
mination of trace amounts of bisphenol A in urine by negative-ion chemical-ionization-gas chro-
matography/mass spectrometry. 19:151–153. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

70 

46 Kuklenyik, Z., Ekong, J., Cutchins, C.D., Needham, L.L., and Calafat, A. M. 2003. Simulta-
neous  measurement  of  urinary  bisphenol  A  and  alkylphenols  by  automated  solid-phase  extrac-
tive derivatization gas chromatography/mass spectrometry. Analytical Chemistry. 75:6820–6825. 
47 Ye, X., Kuklenyik, Z., Needham, L.L., and Calafat, A.M. 2005. Quantification of urinary con-
jugates of bisphenol A, 2,5-dichlorophenol, and 2-hydroxy-4-methoxybenzophenone in humans by 
online  solid  phase  extraction-high  performance  liquid  chromatography-tandem  mass  spectrom-
etry. Analytical and Bioanalytical Chemistry. 383(4):638–644. 

48 Ye,  X.,  Kuklenyik,  Z.,  Needham,  L.L.,  and  Calafat,  A.M.  2005.  Automated  on-line  column- 
switching HPLC-MS/MS method with peak focusing for the determination of nine environmental 
phenols in urine. Analytical Chemistry. 77:5407–5413. 

49 Liu,  Z.,  Wolff,  M.S.,  and  Moline,  J.  2005.  Analysis  of  environmental  biomarkers  in  urine 

using an electrochemical detector. Journal of Chromatography B. 819:155–159. 

50 Arakawa,  C.,  Fujimaki,  K.,  Yoshinaga,  J.,  Imai,  H.,  Serizawa,  S.,  and  Shiraishi,  H.  2004. 
Daily  urinary  excretion  of  bisphenol  A.  Environmental  Health  and  Preventive  Medicine.  9:22– 
26. 

51 Tsukioka,  T.,  Terasawa,  J.,  Sato,  S.,  Hatayama,  Y.,  Makino,  T.,  and  Nakazawa,  H.  2004. 
Development  of  analytical  method  for  determining  trace  amounts  of  BPA  in  urine  samples  and 
estimation of exposure to BPA. Journal of Environmental Chemistry. 14:57–63. 

52 Wilson,  N.K.,  Chuang,  J.C.,  Lyu,  C.,  Menton,  R.,  and  Morgan,  M.K.  2003.  Aggregate  expo-
sures of nine preschool children to persistent organic pollutants at day care and at home. Jour-
nal of Exposure Analysis and Environmental Epidemiology. 13:187–202. 

53 Food  and  Consumer  Product  Safety  Authority.  2005.  Migration  of  bisphenol  A  and  plasti-

cizers from plastic feeding utensils for babies. Report No. ND05o410. 

54 Central  Science  Laboratory.  2004.  A  study  of  the  migration  of  bisphenol  A  from 

polycarbonate feeding bottles into food simulants. Test Report L6BB–1008. 

55 Brede,  C.,  Fjeldal,  P.,  Skjevrak,  I.,  and  Herikstad,  H.  2003.  Increased  migration  levels  of 
bisphenol A from polycarbonate baby bottles after dishwashing, boiling and brushing. Food Ad-
ditives and Contaminants. 20:684–689. 

56 Earls, A.O., Clay, C.A., and Braybrook, J.H. 2000. Preliminary investigation into the migra-
tion of bisphenol A from commercially-available polycarbonate baby feeding bottles. Final Report 
prepared  by  LGC  Consumer  Safety  Team  for  the  Consumer  Affairs  Directorate,  Department  of 
Trade and Industry. 

57 Biles,  J.E.,  McNeal,  T.P.,  Begley,  T.H.,  and  Hollifield,  H.C.  1997.  Determination  of 
bisphenol-A in reusable polycarbonate food-contact plastics and migration to food-simulating liq-
uids. Journal of Food and Agricultural Chemistry. 45:3541–3544. 

58 Mountfort, K.A., Kelly, J., Jickells, S.M., and Castle, L. 1997. Investigations into the poten-
tial  degradation  of  polycarbonate  baby  bottles  during  sterilization  with  consequent  release  of 
bisphenol A. Food Additives and Contaminants. 14:737–740. 

59 (a)  Brotons,  J.,  Olea-Serrano,  M.,  Villalobos,  M.,  Pedraza,  V.,  and  Olea,  N.  1995. 
Xenoestrogens  released  from  lacquer  coatings  in  food  cans.  Environmental  Health  Perspectives. 
103:608–612;  (b)  Biles,  J.E.,  McNeal,  T.P.,  and  Begley,  T.H.  1997.  Determination  of  bisphenol 
A  migrating  from  epoxy  can  coatings  to  infant  formula  liquid  concentrates.  Journal  of  Agricul-
tural  and  Food  Chemistry.  1997(45):4697–4700;  (c)  Yoshida,  T.,  Horie,  M.,  Hoshino,  Y.,  and 
Nakazawa,  H.  2001.  Determination  of  bisphenol  A  in  canned  vegetables  and  fruit  by  high  per-
formance  liquid  chromatography.  Food  Additives  and  Contaminants.  18(1):69–75;  (d)  Imanaka, 
M.,  Hino,  S.,  Kadota,  M.,  and  Utsugi,  J.  2001.  Study  on  bioactive  substance  (bisphenol  A)  in 
food  products.  OKama  Prefecture  Institute  of  Health  and  Environmental  Research  Annual  Re-
port.  Volume  25:64;  (e)  Imanaka,  M.,  Sasaki,  K.,  Nemoto,  S.,  Ueda,  E.,  Murakami,  E.,  Miyata, 
D.,  and  Tonogai,  Y.  2001.  Determination  of  bisphenol  A  in  foods  using  GC/MS.  Shokuhin 
Eiseigaku  Zasshi  42(2):71–8;  (f)  Goodson,  A.,  Summerfield,  W.,  and  Cooper,  I.  2002.  Survey  of 
bisphenol  A  and  bisphenol  F  in  canned  foods.  Food  Additives  and  Contaminants.  19:796–802; 
(g)  Munguia-Lopez,  E.M.,  Peralta,  E.,  Gonzalez-Leon,  A.,  Vargas-Requena,  C.,  and  Soto-Valdez, 
H.  2002.  Migration  of  bisphenol  A  (BPA)  from  epoxy  can  coatings  to  jalapen˜ o  peppers  and  an 
acid  food  simulant.  Journal  of  Agricultural  and  Food  Chemistry.  50(25):7299–7302;  (h)  Kuo,  H. 
and  Ding,  W.  2004.  Trace  determination  of  bisphenol  A  and  phytoestrogens  in  infant  formula 
powders by gas chromatography-mass spectrometry. Journal of Chromatography A. 1027:67–74; 
(i)  Braunrath,  R.  and  Cichna,  M.  2005.  Sample  preparation  including  sol-gel  immunoaffinity 
chromatography  for  determination  of  bisphenol  A  in  canned  beverages,  fruits  and  vegetables. 
Journal  of  Chromatography  A.  1062(2):189–198;  (j)  Munguia-Lopez,  E.M.,  Gerardo-Lugo,  S., 
Peralta,  E.,  Bolumen,  S.,  and  Soto-Valdez,  H.  2005.  Migration  of  bisphenol  A  (BPA)  from  can 
coatings into a fatty-food simulant and tuna fish. Food Additives and Contaminants. 22(9):892– 
898;  (k)  Thomson,  B.M.  and  Grounds,  P.R.  2005.  Bisphenol  A  in  canned  foods  in  New  Zealand: 
An  exposure  assessment.  Food  Additives  and  Contaminants.  22(1):65–72;  (l)  Maragou,  N.C., 
Lampi, E.N., Thomaidis, N.S., and Koupparis, M.A. 2006. Determination of bisphenol A in milk 
by  solid  phase  extraction  and  liquid  chromatography-mass  spectrometry.  Journal  of  Chroma-
tography. 1129(2):165–173; (m) Sajiki, J., Miyamoto, F., Fukata, H., Mori, C., Yonekubo, J., and 
Hayakawa,  K.  2007.  Bisphenol  (BPA)  and  its  source  in  foods  in  Japanese  markets.  Food  Addi-
tives and Contaminants. 24(1):103–112. 

60 (a)  Miyakawa,  H.,  Shimamura,  Y.,  Suzuki,  K.,  Ibe,  A.,  and  Saito,  K.  2004.  Determination 
of  bisphenol  A  in  total  diet  study  samples  by  GC/MS.  Tokyo-to-Kenko  Anzen  Kenkyu  Senta 
Kenkyu  Nenpo.  Volume  Date  2004,  55:157–161;  (b)  Higuchi,  M.,  Miyata,  D.,  Kawamura,  S., 
Ueda,  E.,  Imanaka,  M.,  and  Tonogai,  Y.  2004.  Estimation  of  daily  intake  of  phenols  in  hospital 
meal  samples.  Shokuhin  Eiseigaku  Zasshi.  45(6):339–343;  (c)  Wilson,  N.K.,  Chuang,  J.C.,  Mor-
gan,  M.K.,  Lordo,  R.A.,  and  Sheldon,  L.S.  2007.  An  observational  study  of  the  potential  expo-
sures  of  preschool  children  to  pentachlorophenol,  bisphenol-A,  and  nonylphenol  at  home  and 
daycare. Environmental Research. 103(1):9–20. 

61 Available on the Internet at http://www.epa.gov/iris. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

71 

62 Phthalates are a group of chemicals with a variety of uses, and not all phthalates are used 
in  the  same  applications.  Of  the  six  phthalates  typically  discussed,  DNOP,  DEHP,  DIDP  and 
DINP are used principally to plasticize—i.e., soften and make less brittle—vinyl (or PVC). How-
ever,  DNOP,  DEHP  and  DIDP  are  used  much  less  often  in  vinyl  toys  than  DINP.  Similarly, 
BBP  also  is  used  in  vinyl  products,  but  almost  exclusively  in  vinyl  flooring.  Dibutyl  phthalate 
(DBP) currently is not used in vinyl; it is used primarily in latex adhesives and cellulose plastics 
and  as  a  solvent  for  dyes.  DINP  is  by  far  the  phthalate  most  commonly  used  in  vinyl  toys  and 
children’s  products.  Child  safety  is  a  primary  reason  for  manufacturing  flexible  vinyl  toys,  as 
they  are  soft  and  durable,  so  will  not  break  and  form  small  pieces  that  are  a  choking  hazard 
or have sharp edges. 

63 See  ENDS  Environment  Daily,  EU  phthalate  ban  decision  postponed,  November  22,  1999, 
available  at:  www.environmentdaily.com/articles/index.cfm?action=article&ref=6501.  At  that 
time,  members  of  CSTEE  questioned  whether  the  science  supported  a  finding  of  an  immediate 
risk and expressed their disagreement with the imposition of the emergency ban. 

64 CPSC,  Petition  Denial  at  3  (quoting  Memorandum  from  Marilyn  L.  Wind  to  the  Commis-

sion, Response to Petition HP 99–1 (August 13, 2002), at 16–17). 

65 European  Chemicals  Bureau  (2003).  1,2-Benzenedicarboxylic  acid,  di-C8-10-branched  alkyl 
esters,  C9-rich  and  di-‘‘isononyl’’  phthalate  (DINP),  CAS  Nos:  68515–48–0  and  28553–12–0, 
EINECS  Nos:  271–090–9  and  249–079–5,  Summary  Risk  Assessment  Report,  Special  Publica-
tion I.03.101, p. 18, available at http://ecb.jrc.it/. 

66 A more extensive summary of the CPSC report is attached to these comments. 
67 CHAP (2001). Report to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission by the Chronic Haz-
ard  Advisory  Panel  on  Diisononyl  Phthalate  (DINP),  June  2001,  available  at  http:// 
www.cpsc.gov/LIBRARY/FOIA/Foia01/os/dinp.pdf. 

68 See  Simoneau,  C.  (2000)  Standard  Operation  Procedure,  ‘‘Determination  of  release  of 
diisonylphthalate  (DINP)  in  saliva  stimulant  from  toys  and  childcare  articles’’,  JRC,  European 
Commission, November 11, 2000. 

69 CPSC  (2002).  Response  to  Petition  Requesting  Ban  of  Use  of  PVC  in  Products  (HP  99–1). 
U.S.  Consumer  Products  Safety  Commission,  Bethesda,  MD,  (‘‘CPSC  Risk  Assessment’’)  avail-
able  at  http://www.cpsc.gov/library/foia/foia02/brief/briefing.html  (This  URL  takes  you  to 
Commission  briefing  packages  for  Fiscal  Year  2002.  The  first  seven  links  on  that  page  are  the 
complete  staff  briefing  package  on  PVC/DINP.  The  first  link  (Part  1)  contains  the  staff  memo 
with  the  substance  of  their  conclusions  and  recommendations.  The  remainder  of  that  link  and 
the other links provide supporting documentation.). 

70 CPSC’s  mouthing  study  found  that  children’s  mouthing  times  for  soft  plastic  objects  was 

less than 2 minutes per day. Id. 

71 Babich,  M.,  Chen,  S-B.,  Greene,  M.,  Kiss,  C.,  Porter,  W.,  Smith,  T.,  Wind,  M.  and  Zamula, 
W.  (2004).  Risk  assessment  of  oral  exposure  to  diisononyl  phthalate  from  children’s  products. 
Regulatory Toxicology and Pharmacology 40:151–167. 

72 Id. at 165. 
73 Letter  from  Todd  A.  Stevenson,  Secretary,  CPSC,  to  Jeffrey  Becker  Wise,  Policy  Director, 
National  Environmental  Trust  (February  26,  2003)  (Petition  Denial);  available  at  http:// 
www.cpsc.gov/library/foia/foia03/petition/Ageunder.pdf. 

74 CPSC,  Petition  Denial  at  3  (quoting  Memorandum  from  Marilyn  L.  Wind  to  the  Commis-

sion, Response to Petition HP 99–1 (August 13, 2002), at 16–17). 

75 European  Chemicals  Bureau,  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  Dibutyl  Phthalate, 
CAS  No:  84–74–2,  EINECS  No:  201–557–4,  Risk  Assessment,  with  Addendum  to  the  Environ-
mental Section—2004, 1st Priority List, Volume 29 (2003). 

76 European  Chemicals  Bureau,  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  European  Chemi-
cals  Bureau,  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  1,2-Benzenedicarboxylic  Acid,  Di-C9-11- 
Branched Alkyl Esters, C10-Rich and Di-‘‘Isodecyl’’ Phthalate (DIDP), CAS Nos: 68515–49–1 and 
26761–40–0, EINECS Nos: 271–091–4 and 247–977–1, Risk Assessment, 2nd Priority List, Vol-
ume 36 (2003). 

77 European  Chemicals  Bureau,  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  1,2- 
Benzenedicarboxylic Acid, Di-C8-10-Branched Alkyl Esters, C9-Rich and Di-‘‘Isononyl’’ Phthalate 
(DINP), CAS Nos: 68515–48–0 and 28553–12–0, EINECS Nos: 271–090–9 and 249–079–5, Risk 
Assessment, 2nd Priority List, Volume 35 (2003). 

78 European  Chemicals  Bureau,  European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  Benzyl  Butyl 
Phthalate, CAS No: 85–68–7, EINECS No: 201–622–7. Final Report of Norwegian Pollution Con-
trol Authority (2006). 

79 European  Union  Risk  Assessment  Report:  Bis(2-ethylhexyl)  phthalate,  CAS  No:  117–81–7, 

EINECS No: 204–211–0. Final Report of the Swedish Chemical Inspectorate (2006). 

80 European Chemicals Bureau, DINP Risk Assessment at 18. 
81 The NTP Monographs are available at: http://cerhr.niehs.nih.gov/reports/index.html. 
82 Maximum  estimated  human  daily  exposure  to  one  of  the  most  commonly  used  phthalates, 

DEHP, was calculated from measurements in children aged 3–14 (3.1 μg/kg/d). 

83 K.M.  Main  et  al.,  ‘‘Human  Breast  Milk  Contamination  with  Phthalates  and  Alterations  of 
Endogenous  Reproductive  Hormones  in  Infants  Three  Months  of  Age,’’  Environmental  Health 
Perspectives 114 (2006). 

84 R. Hauser et al., Altered Semen Quality in Relation to Urinary Concentrations of Phthalate 

Monoester and Oxidative Metabolites,’’ Epidemiology 17, no 6 (2006). 

85 S.  H.  Swan  et  al.,  ‘‘Decrease  in  Anogenital  Distance  among  Male  Infants  with  Prenatal 

Phthalate Exposure,’’ Environmental Health Perspectives 113 (2007). 

86 Ivelisse  Colon,  Doris  Caro,  Carlos  J.  Bourdony,  and  Osvaldo  Rosario,  ‘‘Identification  of 
Phthalate  Esters  in  the  Serum  of  Young  Puerto  Rican  Girls  with  Premature  Breast  Develop-
ment,’’ Environmental Health Perspectives, Vol. 108, No. 9 (Sept. 2000). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

72 

87 See,  EPA  Draft  Toxicological  Review  of  Dibutyl  Phthalate  (Di-n-Butyl  Phthalate):  In  Sup-
port  of  the  Summary  Information  in  the  Integrated  Risk  Information  System  (IRIS),  available 
at: http://oaspub.epa.gov/eims/eimscomm.getfile?pldownloadlid=457421. 

88 CHAP (2001). Report to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission by the Chronic Haz-
ard  Advisory  Panel  on  Diisononyl  Phthalate  (DINP),  June  2001,  available  at  http:// 
www.cpsc.gov/LIBRARY/FOIA/Foia01/os/dinp.pdf. 

89 The  3-hour  upper  bound  exposure  estimate  was  based  on  mouthing  time  data  reported  in 
a  Dutch  Consensus  Group  study.  RIVM  (1998).  Phthalate  Release  from  Soft  PVC  Baby  Toys. 
National  Institute  of  Public  Health  and  Environmental  Protection  (RIVM),  Report  from  the 
Dutch Consensus Group. RIVM Report 31 3320 002, Ko¨nemann W.H. (ed), Bilthoven, The Neth-
erlands. 

90 Id. at 30. 
91 Id. 
92 Greene,  M.A.  (2002)  Mouthing  times  among  young  children  from  observational  data.  U.S. 

Consumer Product Safety Commission, Bethesda, MD. 

93 Kiss,  C.  (2001)  A  mouth  observation  study  of  children  under  6  years.  Consumer  Products 

Safety Commission, Bethesda MD. 

94 See CHAP (2001). Report to the U.S. Consumer Product Safety Commission by the Chronic 

Hazard Advisory Panel on Diisononyl Phthalate (DINP), June 2001, p. 20. 

95 See  Chen,  S.B.  (2002)  Screening  of  toys  for  PVC  and  Phthalates  Migration.  U.S.  Consumer 

Products Safety Commission, Bethesda MD. 

96 See  Simoneau,  C.  (2000)  Standard  Operation  Procedure,  ‘‘Determination  of  release  of 
diisonylphthalate  (DINP)  in  saliva  stimulant  from  toys  and  childcare  articles’’,  JRC,  European 
Commission, November 11, 2000. 

97 Lington  A.W.,  Bird  M.G.,  Plutnick  R.T.,  Stubblefield  W.A.,  Scala  R.A.  (1997)  Chronic  tox-
icity  and  carcinogenic  evaluation  of  diisononyl  phthalate  in  rats.  Fundam  Appl  Toxicol  36:  79– 
89. 

98 Moore M.R. (1998) Oncogenicity study in mice with di(isononyl)phthalate including ancillary 
hepatocellular  proliferation  and  biochemical  analyses.  Covance  Laboratory  Report  2598–105, 
January 29, 1998. 

99 CPSC  (2002).  Response  to  Petition  Requesting  Ban  of  Use  of  PVC  in  Products  (HP  99–1). 
U.S.  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission,  Bethesda,  MD,  (CPSC  Risk  Assessment)  available 
at http://www.cpsc.gov/library/foia/foia02/brief/briefing.html (This URL links to Commission 
briefing packages for Fiscal Year 2002. The first seven links on that page are the complete staff 
briefing  package  on  PVC/DINP.  The  first  link  (Part  1)  contains  the  staff  memo  with  the  sub-
stance of their conclusions and recommendations. The remainder of that link and the other links 
provide supporting documentation.). 

100 CPSC’s  mouthing  study  found  that  children’s  mouthing  times  for  soft  plastic  objects  was 

less than 2 minutes per day. Id. 

101 Babich,  M.,  Chen,  S-B.,  Greene,  M.,  Kiss,  C.,  Porter,  W.,  Smith,  T.,  Wind  M.  and  Zamula 
W.  (2004).  Risk  assessment  of  oral  exposure  to  diisononyl  phthalate  from  children’s  products. 
Regulatory Toxicology and Pharmacology 40: 151–167. 

102 Id. at 165. 
103 Letter  from  Todd  A.  Stevenson,  Secretary,  CPSC,  to  Jeffrey  Becker  Wise,  Policy  Director, 
National  Environmental  Trust  (February  26,  2003)  (Petition  Denial);  available  at  http:// 
www.cpsc.gov/library/foia/foia03/petition/Ageunder.pdf. 

104 Petition Denial at 3 (quoting Memorandum from Marilyn L. Wind to the Commission, Re-

sponse to Petition HP 99–1 (August 13, 2002), at 16–17). 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Dr.  Hentges, 

and to all the witnesses. 

Dr. Myers, your research seems to point to the fact that we have 
a  long  way  to  go  before  finding  out  the  full  effect  of  certain 
phthalates  in  PVC  plastic  or  BPA  in  our  food  and  beverage  con-
tainers.  Are  there  any  studies  that  you  know  of  that  are  looking 
into the low dosage exposure to which you referred in your opening 
statement? 

Dr.  MYERS.  Yes,  there  are  studies  underway,  both  experimental 
with animals and epidemiological studies of people. There is a cen-
ter  at  the  University  of  Rochester  that  is  leading  the  way  in  both 
looking  at  the  effects  of  exposure  to  individual  phthalates  as  well 
as mixtures of phthalates and bisphenol A. It is a very interesting, 
cutting-edge area of science right now. 

Additionally, there are efforts underway in California with Stan-
ford  University  and  the  University  of  Missouri  also  looking  at  a 
prediction  that  arises  out  of  some  very  interesting  science  on 
bisphenol A, that there should be an association between low levels 
of  bisphenol  A  and  an  increase  in  the  rate  of  spontaneous  mis-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

73 

carriage in people. That study is now funded and we are anxiously 
awaiting for the results. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  You  mentioned  that  study.  Was  that  the 
Center  for  Disease  Control  that  showed  this  high  amount  of  addi-
tives in individuals tested? 

Dr. MYERS. No. The studies that I just referred to—— 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. It was in your opening. No, no, no. In your 

opening statement when you talk about the high amount of—— 

Dr.  MYERS.  Oh,  when  I  said  that  the  levels  in  people  today  are 

above those—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Higher than animals. 
Dr.  MYERS.—sufficient  to  cause  harm  in  animals,  that  is  the  re-
sult  of  an  analysis  done  by  38  leading  scientists  on  bisphenol  A 
that  were  brought  together  with  funding  from  the  National  Insti-
tutes  of  Health  a  year  ago  November.  And  as  part  of  an  extensive 
review of the BPA literature, the scientists there, led by a professor 
from  the  University  of  Missouri  named  Wade  Welshons,  took  the 
existing  data  and  did  some  new  analyses  asking  how  can  we  com-
pare  what  is  in  animals  when  we  see  adverse  effects.  What  is  in 
the  serum  of  those  animals  and  how  does  that  compare  with  data 
from  the  serum  of  people,  the  average  level  in  Americans  today? 
And  what  that  analysis  concluded—and  it  is  published  now  in  Re-
productive  Toxicology.  It  was  published  in  August  of  2007.  What 
that  study  concluded  was  that  the  average  levels  in  people  are 
above those sufficient to cause harm in animals. 

And another interesting thing about that analysis was that it re-
veals that if you look at what is in people today, we cannot explain 
it  based  on  known  sources  of  exposure.  Actually  one  of  the  things 
the  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  ought  to  be  looking  at 
is  the  use  of  BPA  in  thermal  paper.  It  is  widely  used  in  thermal 
paper. Those receipts you get when you go to the gas station, what-
ever. At least in some formulations of that thermal paper, the con-
centrations of bisphenol A dust are quite high. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Can  you  talk  about  the  life  cycle  of  those 

additives in your system? 

Dr. MYERS. They are metabolized. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Do they go away? 
Dr.  MYERS.  They  go  away  relatively  rapidly,  and  that  is  one  of 
the  challenges.  If  they  go  away  as  rapidly  as  they  do,  which  they 
do, why is that we find the levels that we find in people? There are 
some  significant  sources  of  exposure  that  we  have  not  yet  identi-
fied. It is not just coming in from food. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  One  of  the  groups  came  in  to  talk  to  us 
about  this.  They  talked  about  how  a  ban  on  the  phthalates  or  the 
BPA  would  lead  manufacturers  to  use  plastic  additives  that  have 
not even been tested yet. What are the alternatives? 

Dr. MYERS. There certainly are alternatives for some uses. I was 
in  Japan  last  November  in  the  Christmas  shopping  season,  and 
bisphenol  A  is  not  allowed  to  be  used.  Manufacturers  in  Japan 
have chosen not to use polycarbonate plastic for kids’ toys and they 
do  not  allow  the  phthalates  in  kids’  toys.  And  there  is  no  lack  of 
toys in Japanese stores during Christmas shopping time. 

We  have  heard  that  Nalgene  has  committed  to  replacing 
bisphenol A in its bottles. They are using a couple different formu-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

74 

that? 

lations,  one  they  have  used  for  a  long  time,  polypropylene,  which 
is,  as  far  as  we  can  tell,  perfectly  safe.  They  have  now  introduced 
two  new  types,  one  of  which  is  stainless  steel  which  looks  to  be 
fine.  It  is  not  a  plastic.  We  are  not  sure  about  the  other  one,  and 
some testing should be done on that. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Dr.  Hentges,  did  you  want  to  comment  on 

Dr. HENTGES. Any specific part of it you would like? 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  I  was  asking  him  about  what  these 
products  would  be  replaced  with  if  we  make  a  decision,  as  many 
manufacturers are starting to do, to make phthalate-free products. 
Dr.  HENTGES.  Right.  Well,  if  we  think  about  why  products  are 
used,  they  are  used  because  of  the  attributes,  the  properties  they 
have.  So,  for  example,  polycarbonate  plastic  is  used  because  it  is 
clear.  It  is  highly  shatter-resistant,  and  it  has  other  useful  prop-
erties  as  well.  Epoxy  resins,  also  made  from  bisphenol  A,  are  used 
because they also have a fairly unique set of properties. 

So  to  replace  those,  there  are  a  couple  of  initial  hurdles  that 
have  to  be  gone  over.  One  is  to  find  something  that  performs  be-
cause  these  products  perform  a  function.  They  are  used  for  some-
thing. So we have to find an alternative that works at least as well 
as what we are replacing. 

But then since we are talking here about safety, we also have to 
be  sure  that  these  products  really  are  at  least  as  safe  as  what  we 
are  replacing.  And  in  the  case  of  bisphenol  A,  there  are  no  alter-
natives  that  have  been  tested  as  thoroughly  as  bisphenol  A,  that 
have  been  vetted  so  carefully,  so  frequently  by  government  agen-
cies around the world. 

So  we  have  two  very  big  challenges  in  order  to  find  alternatives 
that we can be confident are going to be better than what we have 
today. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  I  showed  those  two  bottles  over  there, 
the  Nalgene  bottles,  and  they  did  one  that  did  not  have  the  BPA 
in it. Are you saying that is not safe then? 

Dr.  HENTGES.  No.  I  am  not  saying  it  is  not  safe,  but  it  is  made 
from  something.  I  do  not  know  what  it  is  made  from.  I  cannot  tell 
by looking at. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. I can give it to you. 
Dr.  HENTGES.  Well,  I  still  probably  could  not  tell  by  looking  at 
it,  but  it  is  made  from  something.  And  the  question  then  is,  how 
much data is available to know that that something is safe? 

Again, the benchmark that I can speak to is bisphenol A because 
we  have  an  extraordinarily  rich  scientific  database  there  that  sup-
ports  the  safety  of  bisphenol  A,  and  that  data  has  been  reviewed 
repeatedly  around  the  world,  leading  to  the  conclusions  that  you 
have heard, that bisphenol A is safe for use in that kind of a prod-
uct. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Now, your testimony does admit to evidence 
that an infant can be harmed by phthalates if she mouths a plastic 
toy for about an hour. Would that be a correct characterization? 

Dr. HENTGES. I think on that question, I am going to have to beg 
off.  I  do  not  have  the  great  personal  knowledge  on  phthalates,  but 
I can commit to providing a written answer on that one as a follow 
up for the record. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

75 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  Well,  we  are  going  to  find  it  in  your 

testimony here, if we could just take a second. 

Dr.  HENTGES.  It  is  the  follow  up  questions  where  I  am  going  to 

have some difficulty because—— 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK, but you do remember saying that? 
Dr. HENTGES. I can read what I said. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. It is in the written testimony. 
Dr. HENTGES. Oh, the written, OK. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  I  think  here  you  say  based  on  this  ADI,  it 
was  concluded  that  a  young  child  would  have  to  routinely  mouth 
the plasticized toys for 75 minutes or more per day in order to pose 
a possible DINP exposure risk. 

Dr.  HENTGES.  I  will  commit  to  coming  back  with  a  written  re-

sponse for the record on that. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. OK. 
We have also heard testimony that when boiling water is poured 

into a bottle that contains BPA, it could create a problem. 

Dr. HENTGES. That I can speak to. There are quite a few studies 
that examine polycarbonate baby bottles. Usually it is baby bottles 
that are tested to understand how much bisphenol A can leach out 
of  those  under  a  very  wide  range  of  conditions.  And  some  of  the 
best  data  has  been  published  very  recently.  Several  studies  have 
been published by different institutions in Europe, and one of those 
studies  specifically  looked  at—all  of  them  together  look  at  a  wide 
range  of  real-life  use  conditions.  But  one  of  them  looked,  in  par-
ticular, at the effect of temperature and, in particular, the effect of 
pouring boiling water directly into the bottle. And what these stud-
ies collectively found is that there are really no real-life use condi-
tions  that  would  lead  to  an  unsafe  situation  where  the  level  of 
bisphenol A could be harmful, that it could exceed a safe level. And 
in  particular,  even  when  boiling  water  was  poured  into  the  baby 
bottles, that did not lead to an unsafe condition. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  But  is  that  not,  as  Dr.  Myers  was  saying, 
based  on  these  high  levels  of  the  chemical  as  opposed  to  some  of 
the low-dose levels that he is talking about? 

Dr. HENTGES. No. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. Then why would this company change their 

product in response to concerns about this? 

Dr.  HENTGES.  Well,  let  me  start  with  the  first  part.  In  Europe, 
where  these  studies  on  baby  bottles  were  conducted,  just  about  1 
year  ago,  the  European  Food  Safety  Authority  published  their  re-
port  on  the  safety  of  bisphenol  A.  And  this  was  a  comprehensive 
evaluation  of  the  available  science,  and  it  included—in  fact,  it  was 
probably  largely  focused  on  studies  that  examined  low  doses,  low 
levels  of  bisphenol  A.  Based  on  all  of  those  studies,  based  on  the 
weight  of  evidence  from  those  studies,  they  established  what  they 
call a Tolerable Daily Intake or, in simple terms, a safe level. 

Then comparing that to the levels that came out of the baby bot-
tles  in  those  studies  that  I  referred  to,  those  levels  are  far  lower 
than  the  safe  level  that  was  determined  based  on  studies  that 
looked at low doses of bisphenol A. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Dr. Myers, do you want to respond? 
Dr.  MYERS.  Yes.  It  is  simply  not  true.  The  levels  of  bisphenol  A 
that  will  leach  out  of  baby  bottles—and  studies  in  the  United 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

76 

States  have  shown  this—are  within  the  range  that  cause  harm  in 
animals at low doses. That is a matter of—it is in the scientific lit-
erature. 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Ms.  Hitchcock,  do  you  want  to  respond  at 

all? 

Ms. HITCHCOCK. No. 
Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  OK.  Thank  you  very  much.  I  appreciate  it. 
Senator  PRYOR [presiding].  Thank  you,  Senator  Klobuchar. 
Thank  you  for  covering  for  me.  I  had  to  do  a  quick  conference  call 
in the back room, and I apologize for my absence. 

Let  me  follow  up  on  that,  if  I  can.  There  are  clearly  two  strong 
opinions  on  the  safety  level,  and  I  think  one  of  the  reasons  there 
might be two strong opinions is—is it possible that you all are look-
ing at different studies, or are you just interpreting the same stud-
ies differently? Do you want to take a stab at that? 

Dr.  MYERS.  Sure.  The  studies  that  I  am  looking  at  typically  are 
funded  by  the  National  Institutes  of  Health.  It  is  very  interesting. 
The  studies  by  the  National  Institutes  of  Health  typically  do  not 
begin  with  a  toxicological  perspective.  They  look  at  different 
endpoints,  and  they  use  much  more  sophisticated  tools  to  get  at 
what  are  the  biological  mechanisms  underlying  impacts  that  they 
are seeing. These are studies that are published in the proceedings 
of the National Academy of Sciences. They are published in Science 
and Nature, in the premier scientific journals of the world. And the 
bulk of those, over 90 percent of those studies, show adverse effects 
in animals at low levels. 

Those  are  the  studies  that  I  think  we  need  to  be  looking  at  be-
cause  they  are  asking—in  my  opening  my  comments,  I  talked 
about  a  new  way—a  new  framework  for  thinking  about  toxicology 
and  how  the  EPA  and  the  FDA  and  the  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Commission  are  really  missing  the  boat  on  this  because  they  are 
focused  on  old  toxicological  endpoints.  They  are  not  using  modern 
molecular  genetics  in  their  work.  So  I  am  looking  at  new  science. 
They are looking at old science. 

Senator PRYOR. Do you have a comment on that? 
Dr. HENTGES. Yes. Going back to where you started, are we look-
ing  at  different  studies,  no,  I  do  not  think  we  are  looking  at  dif-
ferent  studies.  We  all  have  the  same  body  of  scientific  information 
to  look  at,  and  there  are,  indeed,  many  hundreds  of  studies  on 
bisphenol  A.  But  those  studies  vary  vastly  in  size,  scope,  quality, 
relevance  to  human  health.  There  is  no  single  study  that  is  really 
going  to  give  us  the  answer  about  whether  bisphenol  A  is  safe  or 
not. 

We  review  all  of  those  studies  together  in  a  weight  of  evidence 
fashion,  and  our  conclusion  is  that  bisphenol  A  is  safe  for  use  in 
consumer  products  of  the  type  that  you  are  considering.  But  more 
important  than  our  view  is  the  view  of  the  many  independent  sci-
entific  and  government  bodies  around  the  world  who  have  also  re-
viewed the science, who have reviewed all of it together and drawn 
a  conclusion  based  on  the  full  weight  of  scientific  evidence.  Those 
conclusions,  more  importantly,  support  the  safety  of  consumer 
products made from bisphenol A. 

Senator PRYOR. Let me, if I can, ask each of the three of you the 
same  question.  I  will  go  ahead  and  start  with  you,  if  I  may.  That 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

77 

is, are you satisfied with the job the FDA and the CPSC have done 
on these chemicals that we have been talking about today? 

Dr.  HENTGES.  Well,  focusing  on  FDA  and  bisphenol  A,  because 
they  regulate  food  contact  products  made  from  polycarbonate  plas-
tic or epoxy resins, we do have confidence that FDA has been moni-
toring  the  science  quite  carefully.  We  believe  that  they  have  the 
scientific  capability  and  credibility  to  do  that.  We  have,  however, 
because there is new information available from the recent reports, 
encouraged  FDA  to  refresh  their  view,  to  update,  make  sure  they 
have  looked  at  everything,  and  provide  their  conclusions.  That  is 
very  important  because  consumers  are  getting  a  lot  of  confusing 
and conflicting information, and we believe that FDA has the capa-
bility  to  cut  through  that  confusion  and  provide  a  clearer  view  to 
consumers about the safety of products made from bisphenol A. 

Senator  PRYOR.  By  the  way,  consumers  and  the  U.S.  Senate  are 
getting confusing information. There is a sharp disagreement here. 
But  Ms.  Hitchcock,  would  you  like  to  answer  whether  you  think 

FDA and CPSC are doing a good job to date? 

Ms.  HITCHCOCK.  In  the  presence  of  the  confusing  information 
that consumers and the U.S. Senate are getting about bisphenol A 
and about phthalates, I would say no. And we would urge them to 
do  a  better  job.  I  noted  in  my  testimony  that  we  need  to  reform 
U.S. chemicals policy so that we are not testing chemicals that are 
on the market on our children and on ourselves before we actually 
know what the effects are. We are hearing from two scientists here 
and we are hearing a diversity of opinion about the safety of these 
chemicals.  Where  there  is  a  doubt,  we  ought  not  be  putting  them 
in the hands and the mouths of our children. 
Senator PRYOR. Did you have a comment? 
Dr.  MYERS.  My  comment  will  not  surprise  you,  Senator.  I  think 
the  FDA  right  now  is  failing  the  American  people  miserably.  We 
have  seen  that  in  other  cases  over  the  last  year.  It  is  no  different 
here.  They  are  not  asking  the  right  questions.  They  are  not  using 
modern scientific methods to ask those questions. Molecular genet-
ics,  as  it  has  developed  over  the  last  15  years,  has  changed  the 
types  of  questions  we  should  be  asking  about  how  contaminants 
can interfere with health. We used to worry about high doses caus-
ing  mutations,  high  doses  causing  birth  defects  directly.  Now  we 
know  that  low  doses,  by  interfering  with  how  genes  are  being 
turned on and off during development, can have profoundly impor-
tant  health  consequences  that  are  not  revealed  by  the  procedures 
that the FDA, the EPA, and the CPSC use today. 

We have been blind-sided by these effects. These things are well 
known  to  endocrinologists,  medical  practitioners  of  the  science  of 
endocrinology.  It  is  not  something  new  to  them.  It  is  only  when 
over  the  last  15  years  we  have  learned  that  some  contaminants 
possess  characteristics  like  hormones  that  we  have  realized  we 
have  not  been  asking  the  right  questions.  And  that  is  actually  a 
much bigger challenge than just dealing with BPA and phthalates. 
There  are  probably  a  lot  of  other  contaminants  that  share  these 
characteristics.  In  fact,  we  know  there  are,  and  we  are  similarly 
being blind-sided on those cases as well. 

Senator PRYOR. I really did not have any more questions. I know 
that some of our colleagues will have questions that they will sub-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

78 

mit  in  writing,  and  we  would  like  to  leave  the  record  open  for  2 
weeks and allow Senators to ask questions and would love a timely 
response when you all receive those. 

But  I  do  want  to  thank  you.  This  is  an  important  issue.  I  really 
think the sharp disagreement on this panel underscores the reason 
we  had  this  hearing  in  the  first  place—to  try  to  start  the  process 
for  the  Senate  and  the  Congress  to  really  get  to  the  facts  of  this. 
It  may  be  what  you  said  a  few  moments  ago.  It  may  be  that  the 
Government needs to update and upgrade their testing capabilities, 
and that may solve this problem. Then again, it may be that these 
chemicals are safe, if we did that. 

But I do think it is important for us, the American Government, 
to  get  our  policy  right.  And  I  do  think,  Ms.  Hitchcock  said  some-
thing that most Senators would agree with. If there is a substantial 
risk,  even  if  it  is  not  exactly  known  exactly  what  the  level  is,  err 
on the side of caution, especially when it comes to children. I think 
you are going to see that here in the Senate. 

So  I  would  appreciate  you  all  continuing  to  work  with  us  and 
continuing  to  talk  to  us  and  our  staffs  about  where  you  think  this 
should be heading. We know Senator Schumer has a bill. We know 
that  there  are  others  out  there  who  are  working  on  legislation  in 
different forms and fashion. So this is going to be an issue that we 
will continue to work through. 

So, again, I want to thank this panel and the previous panels for 

being here. 

This hearing is adjourned. 
[Whereupon, at 12:06 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

NORRIS E. ALDERSON, PH.D. 

Question  1.  What  research  is  being  done  to  determine  the  effects  these  chemicals 

have on wildlife? 

Answer. FDA’s primary concern in evaluating the safety of these chemicals under 
the  Federal  Food,  Drug,  and  Cosmetic  Act  is  their  potential  for  human  health  ef-
fects. Numerous studies in the literature have been conducted to evaluate the effects 
of these chemicals on assessments of both human and ecological health. Accordingly, 
some of the studies that FDA relies on in making human safety decisions could po-
tentially  be  applied  to  the  safety  of  wildlife.  The  Environmental  Protection  Agency 
(EPA)  or  the  Department  of  the  Interior  (DOI),  however,  would  be  the  appropriate 
Federal entities to address the effects on wildlife. 

Question  2.  What  are  the  known  effects  of  these  harmful  plastic  chemicals  on 

wildlife? 

Answer. There are many issues with regard to the disposal of plastics and its po-
tential harm to the environment, including wildlife. Again, although FDA considers 
all  relevant  safety  data  when  reviewing  uses  of  food  additives  for  human  consump-
tion, either EPA or DOI is better suited to address these issues. 

Question 3. Is there any evidence that humans can be exposed to these chemicals 

through the food, specifically seafood, which we eat? 

Answer.  Yes,  consumers  may  be  exposed  to  BPA  and  phthalates  as  a  result  of 
their  authorized  uses  in  food  contact  materials.  We  are  limiting  our  comments  to 
that exposure source. 

Bisphenol-A  (BPA)  is  a  chemical  building  block  of  epoxy-based  enamels  used  in 
food  cans.  These  epoxy  enamels  are  used  to  coat  the  inside  of  food  cans  to  impart 
resistance to corrosion of the metal by the packaged food. By controlling degradation 
of the can, food is preserved from microbiological contamination. Many foods, includ-
ing  seafood  products,  are  packaged  in  cans  coated  with  epoxy  enamels.  Consumers 
may  be  exposed  to  minute  amounts  of  BPA  as  it  may  migrate  from  the  epoxy  coat-
ing to food during storage. 

Phthalate  plasticizers  are  approved  for  use  with  some  food  wrapping  polymers 
where  they  impart  cling  and  flexibility  properties  to  the  wrap.  Although  phthalate 
plasticizers  have  been  authorized  for  such  uses  for  many  years,  FDA’s  research  of 
the regulated industry indicates that these uses have been largely discontinued, and 
nearly  all  currently  available  commercial  food  wraps  are  either  unplasticized 
polyolefin  materials  having  no  phthalates,  or  are  materials  plasticized  with  alter-
nate materials (such as citrates). It might be possible to find some polyvinyl chloride 
or  polyvinylidene  chloride  food  wraps  on  the  market  that  are  still  plasticized  with 
phthalates,  and  if  those  wraps  were  used;  some  phthalate  plasticizer  would  be 
transferred  to  the  food.  The  higher  the  fat  content  of  the  wrapped  food,  the  more 
phthalate plasticizer would be transferred. Accordingly, the amount of phthalates in 
the  food  would  vary  based  on  the  wrap  used  to  prepare  seafood  for  sale  and  the 
amount  of  fat  content  in  the  seafood.  For  this  reason  some  phthalates  such  as  Di- 
2-ethylhexyl phthalate are restricted from use in contact with high fat content foods. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

NORRIS E. ALDERSON, PH.D. 

Question  1.  The  U.S.  National  Toxicology  Program  released  a  report,  in  early 
April,  regarding  the  reproductive  and  developmental  hazards  associated  with 
bisphenol-A  (BPA).  Shortly  after  the  report  was  released  the  FDA  announced  that 
it would look into the safety of baby bottles, formula cans, and other products made 
with BPA. What has the FDA done to move this investigation forward? 

(79) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

80 

Answer.  Commissioner  of  Food  and  Drugs  Andrew  C.  von  Eschenbach,  M.D.  has 
formed an Agency-wide BPA Task Force to conduct a review, encompassing all FDA- 
regulated product lines, of the concerns raised about BPA. The Task Force is under-
taking  a  broad  review  of  current  research  and  information  on  BPA,  and  is  actively 
reviewing  the  National  Toxicology  Program’s  (NTP)  Draft  Brief.  Members  of  the 
Task Force have met with NTP staff to discuss their findings and better understand 
NTP’s  approach  to  evaluating  the  underlying  data.  Also,  staff  of  FDA’s  National 
Center  for  Toxicological  Research  (NCTR)  is  discussing  with  NTP  additional  re-
search needs relating to BPA. 

In  addition  to  looking  at  the  food  and  beverage  containers  that  have  been  the 
focus  of  recent  concerns  as  well  as  our  regulatory  efforts  over  the  years,  the  Task 
Force  is  conducting  an  inventory  of  all  products  regulated  by  FDA’s  food  and  med-
ical  products  centers  and  is  reviewing  other  potential  routes  of  exposure.  Addition-
ally, the Task Force has been talking with representatives of product manufacturers 
to  better  understand  manufacturing  and  chemistry  issues.  Finally,  the  Task  Force 
is  considering  what  recommendations  for  further  laboratory  studies  or  other  re-
search may be appropriate. 

Question  2.  How  long  do  you  anticipate  for  a  final  conclusion  or  ruling  from  the 

FDA regarding possible health risks caused by BPA exposure? 

Answer.  In  late  summer  or  early  fall,  the  BPA  Task  Force  is  expected  to  issue 
its draft report. At FDA’s request, the FDA Science Board, which is an independent 
advisory body to FDA on scientific issues, is forming a subcommittee on BPA to un-
dertake  scientific  peer  review  of  the  Task  Force  report.  Part  of  that  peer  review 
process will be to hold a public meeting to accept input and comments from the pub-
lic.  The  full  Science  Board  will  receive  the  findings  of  the  subcommittee  during  its 
fall meeting. 

Question  3.  The  ‘‘low-dose  hypothesis’’  claims  that  exposure  to  extremely  low  lev-
els  of  certain  substances  could  cause  adverse  health  effects  in  humans.  Some  have 
criticized  existing  studies  and  reviews  for  looking  at  only  high  dosage  exposure. 
Have  any  of  the  governmental  reviews  done  by  FDA  taken  into  account  studies 
showing adverse health effects from low-dose exposure to BPA? 

Answer.  FDA’s  formal  re-evaluation  of  BPA  conducted  over  the  past  14  months 
has  considered  many  studies  designed  to  investigate  so-called  ‘‘low’’  dose  effects. 
Two  of  these  studies,  which  were  designed  based  on  international  regulatory  study 
guidelines,  and  included  a  wide  range  of  doses,  including  low  doses,  and  expanded 
protocols,  did  not  demonstrate  adverse  health  effects  in  rodents  from  low  dose  ad-
ministration  of  BPA.  The  two  pivotal  studies  were  published  by  Tyl  et  al.,  in  2002 
(rat study) and 2008 (mouse study). 

Our  current  review  effort  is  ongoing  regarding  the  concerns  which  the  most  re-
cently  completed  assessments  (NTP’s  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human 
Reproduction  (CERHR)  Expert  Panel  Report,  the  NTP  Draft  Brief  and  the  Health 
Canada Draft Screening Assessment) have highlighted. The BPA Task Force review 
is considering numerous additional ‘‘low’’ dose studies and will address the more re-
cent concerns raised for low-dose effects. 

Question  4.  The  results  of  studies  into  the  potential  health  effects  of  BPA  and 
phthalates  conducted  by  the  government,  industry,  and  some  in  academia  seem  to 
vary quite widely in their results. How would you explain these differences? 

Answer.  There  are  various  factors  that  may  account  for  differences  in  study  out-
comes independent of the source of information, the performers of the study, or the 
sponsors  of  the  study.  Studies  conducted  in  laboratories  in  academia  are  more  hy-
pothesis-driven  as  opposed  to  safety  evaluation  studies  and  as  such,  FDA  has  en-
countered  limitations  in  the  methodologies,  reporting,  or  relevance  of  the  endpoints 
of  analysis  with  regard  to  their  utility  in  safety  assessments.  FDA  has  published 
guidance on the conduct of studies for submission to the Agency to support the safe 
use  of  food  additives  (Toxicological  Principles  for  the  Safety  Assessment  of  Food  In-
gredients: Redbook 2000). This guidance is intended to help ensure the use in safety 
assessments of studies that are conducted using good laboratory practices (GLP) and 
quality assurance (QA), sufficient and relevant dosing protocols, adequate replicates 
of animals for meaningful statistical analysis, interim analysis when applicable, and 
analysis  of  endpoints  (organ  weights,  clinical  chemistry,  histopathology,  etc.)  which 
have  been  validated  by  FDA  or  other  international  regulatory  organizations.  In  ad-
dition  to  FDA,  other  international  agencies  involved  in  regulatory  toxicology  also 
provide guidance that is useful for conducting safety assessments. 

A typical GLP study submitted to FDA contains all the raw data collected during 
the course of the study, thereby allowing the Agency to review and audit the study 
and  reach  an  independent  conclusion  on  the  findings  reported  by  the  study  au-
thor(s).  As  journal  publications  typically  are  limited  in  the  thoroughness  in  which 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

81 

they  are  reported,  FDA  is  ordinarily  unable  to  validate  the  performance  quality  or 
data  integrity  of  these  studies.  By  contrast,  FDA’s  standard  review  procedures  for 
reported GLP/QA studies allow FDA to independently reach the authors’ conclusions 
or  arrive  at  alternative  interpretations  of  the  data  and  findings  presented.  In  addi-
tion to reporting limitations, many of the studies in the literature fail to control for 
numerous  issues  that  validated  regulatory  protocols  eliminate  by  design.  These 
shortcomings  cannot  be  ignored  in  an  overall  weight  of  evidence  analysis  of  a  food 
additive’s safe use. 

Question  5.  Does  the  FDA  take  into  account  the  safety  of  these  chemicals  when 

rendering its opinions? 

Answer. Yes, FDA is required by statute to judge the information relevant to the 
safety  of  chemicals  used  in  food  contact  material  according  to  the  safety  standard 
for  food  additives.  That  standard  is  a  ‘‘reasonable  certainty  of  no  harm’’  (see  Title 
21,  Code  of  Federal  Regulations  § 170.3(i)).  To  accomplish  this,  FDA  requires  that 
industry  sponsors  provide  all  relevant  safety  data  (including  data  indicating  poten-
tial  harm)  and  to  produce  any  additional  data  necessary  to  establish  the  safety  of 
the intended use. 

Question 6. Please explain the significance of low-dose exposures to BPA and how 

it relates to the traditionally held belief of ‘‘the dose makes the poison’’? 

Answer.  The  expression  ‘‘the  dose  makes  the  poison’’  refers  to  the  fact  that  all 
substances can produce toxicity given a high enough dose. A common extreme exam-
ple  is  hypnoatremia—a  toxic  effect  observed  in  individuals  who  consume  dan-
gerously  large  quantities  of  water  resulting  in  a  reduction  of  essential  minerals  in 
the  blood.  For  chemicals  that  enter  the  food  supply,  FDA  typically  estimates  a  safe 
or  acceptable  level  by  determining  the  no  observed  adverse  effect  level  in  animal 
testing  and  extrapolating  to  a  safe  level  of  human  consumption  that  is  ordinarily 
100  to  2,000  times  (or  more)  smaller.  In  this  regard,  FDA’s  approach  is  based  on 
the  entire  body  of  toxicological  safety  testing  research;  that  research  generally  sup-
ports  the  fact  that  increasing  exposure  to  a  chemical  increases  the  toxic  effect  and 
that  potential  toxicity  can  be  mitigated  by  limiting  exposure  to  levels  many  times 
lower than those that show only limited toxicity in experiments. 
Exposure  to  residual  BPA  through  uses  in  food  additives  is  relatively  low,  at  ≤ 
11  micrograms  per  person  per  day  (μg/person/day).  Traditionally,  FDA’s  evaluation 
of  chemical  migrants  to  food  from  the  use  of  food  contact  materials  at  exposures  of 
≤  150  μg/person/day  focuses  primarily  on  carcinogenicity  and  genetic  toxicity  as  an 
indicator  of  carcinogenicity,  unless  data  are  available  (biological  or  predictive)  that 
indicate  a  concern  for  another  endpoint  of  toxicity  at  this  level.  However,  BPA  has 
been  studied  for  many  years  with  regard  to  its  potential  ability  to  bind  to  estrogen 
receptors  and  either  mimic  estrogen  or  disrupt  normal  endocrine  activity.  Since  es-
trogens and other hormonally active compounds with high affinities to steroid recep-
tors can show effects at low doses, research has focused on BPA’s ability to disrupt 
normal  hormonal  activity  or  act  as  a  reproductive  or  developmental  toxicant.  How-
ever, BPA is only weakly estrogenic (several orders of magnitude less than estrogen) 
and  BPA  is  metabolized  extremely  quickly  into  BPA-glucuronide  (BPAG),  which  is 
estrogenically  inactive.  Although  FDA’s  review  of  the  most  recently  raised  concerns 
for  BPA  is  not  complete,  previous  reviews  have  determined  the  margin  between  no 
effect  levels  in  animal  tests  and  human  exposures  to  be  acceptable  based  on  FDA’s 
routinely used margins of safety. 

Question  7.  How  is  the  average  person  exposed  to  phthalates?  What  is  the  best 

way to reduce exposure to phthalates? 

Answer.  In  terms  of  food  contact  applications,  phthalates  are  primarily  used  as 
plasticizers  in  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC)  and  polyvinylidene  chloride  (PVDC)  poly-
mers to increase their flexibility. Di-(2-ethylhexyl) phthalate (DEHP) is perhaps the 
most  thoroughly  studied  among  the  phthalates.  DEHP  has  long  been  used  to 
produce highly flexible versions of PVC and PVDC polymers for a variety of applica-
tions, such as in flexible packaging film. 

FDA-authorized  uses  of  phthalates  include  uses  in  flexible  food  packaging.  Over 
the past decade, however, such food contact uses have been greatly reduced or elimi-
nated  through  the  replacement  of  PVC  and  PVDC  polymers  with  other  polymers 
that do not require plasticizers and by the use of alternative plasticizers in PVC and 
PVDC. FDA’s Center for Food Safety and Applied Nutrition (CFSAN) is tracking the 
reductions in use of phthalates in food contact materials as well as the development 
of  new  toxicological  data.  CFSAN  has  established  a  Phthalate  Task  Group  (PTG), 
whose primary focus will be to determine the most realistic exposure estimation and 
better  characterize  any  potential  risk  associated  with  phthalate  use  in  food  pack-
aging. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

82 

levels 

last  survey 

indicated 

There are also significant uses of phthalates in certain medical products, such as 
intravenous solution bags and medical tubing. FDA’s Center for Devices and Radio-
logical Health (CDRH) has looked into the use of polyvinyl chloride using DEHP as 
a  plasticizer  in  medical  devices.  DEHP  is  a  chemical  ingredient  that  affords  PVC 
many  of  the  physical  properties  that  make  it  optimally  suited  for  use  in  many  of 
today’s  medical  devices.  While  toxic  and  carcinogenic  effects  of  DEHP  have  been 
demonstrated  in  laboratory  animals,  there  are  no  studies  in  humans  that  are  ade-
quate to serve as the basis for regulatory decision-making. Further, health care pro-
fessionals  should  not  avoid  performing  certain  medical  procedures  simply  because 
of the possibility of health risks associated with DEHP exposure. In these cases, the 
risk  of  not  doing  a  needed  procedure  is  far  greater  than  the  risk  associated  with 
exposure to DEHP. 

in  marketed  cosmetics.  The 

Phthalates  are  also  widely  used  in  cosmetics,  serving  as  solvents  for  fragrances, 
antifoaming  and  suspension  agents,  skin  emollients,  and  plasticizers  in  nail  prod-
ucts.  CFSAN’s  Office  of  Cosmetics  and  Colors  has  conducted  laboratory  surveys  of 
phthalate 
that 
diethylphthalate  (DEP)  was  the  most  frequently  used  phthalate  in  cosmetics  and 
that  nail  enamels  contained 
levels  of  phthalates,  primarily 
dibutylphthalate  (DBP).  Based  on  the  results  of  that  survey  and  the  toxicity  data 
currently available, FDA does not believe that phthalates in cosmetics pose a health 
risk. Since the survey was conducted, we have observed that some cosmetic products 
are  being  reformulated  to  remove  phthalates.  CFSAN  is  planning  a  more  extensive 
survey  of  a  larger  number  of  cosmetic  products  to  better  determine  to  what  extent 
cosmetic  products  contribute  to  total  human  exposure  to  phthalates.  We  will  con-
tinue  to  monitor  and  evaluate  all  available  data  to  ensure  that  phthalate  levels  in 
cosmetic products are not a health concern. 

FDA,  primarily  through  NCTR,  is  conducting  further  research  to  address  uncer-
tainties  in  our  understanding  of  the  potential  health  risk  posed  by  exposure  to 
phthalates.  Much  of  the  concern  on  medical  exposures  to  phthalates  is  focused  on 
potential reproductive tract effects in male infants in neonatal intensive care units, 
a  population  exposed  to  high  levels  of  DEHP  at  a  sensitive  period  of  development. 
NCTR studies are evaluating the metabolism and toxicity of DEHP following intra-
venous  exposure  in  infant  male  nonhuman  primates,  a  model  that  more  closely  re-
sembles the human exposure of highest concern. 

the  highest 

Question 8. Please explain the significance of phthalate mixtures. 
Answer. Regarding the toxicological significance of phthalate mixtures, there have 
been reports in the literature that individual phthalates with a similar mode of ac-
tion can induce dose-additive effects when administered as a mixture. 

Question 9. What are endocrine disruptors and how do they affect us? 
Answer.  Endocrine  disruptors  are  exogenous  substances  (natural  or  synthetic) 
that  act  like  hormones  and,  by  doing  so,  have  the  potential  to  either  mimic  or  dis-
rupt  the  activities  of  endogenous  hormones.  Studies  have  linked  endocrine 
disruptors  to  adverse  biological  effects  in  animals,  giving  rise  to  concerns  that  low 
doses of these chemicals may cause similar effects in human beings. 

Question 10. Is there an established list of known endocrine disruptors? 
Answer.  At  this  time,  FDA  does  not  have  an  established  list  of  endocrine 
disruptors.  However,  FDA  uses  all  available  resources  in  evaluating  chemicals  and 
their  relevant  (to  dose)  modes  of  actions.  This  is  achieved  using  literature  searches 
of  FDA  files  and  public  information  as  well  as  computer-simulated  toxicology  pro-
grams which can predict the reproductive or teratogenic potential of a chemical. For 
instance, one resource FDA is aware of is EPA’s draft list of 73 chemicals to undergo 
‘‘Tier I’’ screening in the Endocrine Disruptor Screening Program (EDSP). The EPA 
list  should  not  be  construed,  however,  as  a  list  of  known  or  likely  endocrine 
disruptors. 

Question 11. Are there already alternatives to BPA and phthalates? Are these al-
ternatives  safer  than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists 
into these alternatives? 

Answer.  With  respect  to  food  contact  materials,  there  are  non-phthalate  plasti-
cizers,  including  several  citrate  esters  and  a  terephthalate  ester,  that  are  commer-
cially  available  and  approved  by  FDA  for  food  contact  use.  Our  data  indicate  that 
the  alternate  plasticizers  and  alternate  cling  wrap  materials  have  already  reduced 
significantly  the  consumer  exposure  to  phthalates.  Similarly,  the  use  of  BPA  in 
polycarbonate  drinking  bottles  and  cups  seems  to  have  been  largely  replaced  by  a 
polyester plastic recently authorized for use by FDA. 

The situation with BPA-containing epoxy resin can coatings is somewhat different 
in  that  there  are  no  coating  materials  as  suitable  as  the  epoxy  resins.  Alternate 
coating  materials  approved  by  FDA  are  available,  but  none  have  the  combination 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

83 

of  properties  (adherence,  flexibility,  chemical  resistance)  that  make  epoxy  coatings 
so  useful  and  beneficial  for  preserving  canned  food  from  microbiological  contamina-
tion. 

Any alternative to BPA or phthalates would need to meet the same safety stand-
ard  for  use  that  the  food  contact  materials  containing  BPA  and  phthalates  must 
meet.  FDA  judges  the  safety  of  all  food  additives  against  the  same  safety  standard 
of ‘‘reasonable certainty of no harm’’ and does not make judgments regarding wheth-
er  one  chemical  that  meets  this  standard  is  ‘‘safer’’  than  another.  The  amount  of 
data  necessary  to  support  the  safe  use  of  any  alternatives  will  vary  based  on  the 
properties and uses of those particular chemicals. 

With  respect  to  the  use  of  BPA  in  medical  devices,  eliminating  this  chemical 
would  require  finding  one  or  more  chemicals  that  have  the  same  beneficial  charac-
teristics  as  BPA  but  do  not  raise  new  biocompatibility  or  manufacturability  issues. 
In fact, it is possible that there may not be an equivalent to BPA. 

With respect to phthalates, there have been a number of other ‘‘esters’’ developed 
to  replace  DEHP  as  a  vinyl  plasticizer.  Examples  include  long  chain  esters  of  citric 
acid  (CitroflexTM)  and  epoxidized  soybean  oil  or  other  vegetable  oils  (VikoflexTM). 
However,  the  amount  of  research  that  has  been  conducted  in  animal  and  human 
studies  of  these  vinyl  plasticizers  is  quite  small.  Because  the  potential  toxic  effects 
of alternatives to phthalates require further study, we cannot conclude at this time 
that these alternatives are safer for use in medical devices. 

Question  12.  Do  infants  and  children  have  the  same  immune  and  endocrine  sys-

tem as adults? Do studies take into account these differences? 

Answer.  Infants  and  children  do  not  have  the  same  immune  or  endocrine  system 
as  adults,  especially  in  terms  of  functions.  These  systems  in  infants  and  children 
are  considered  immature;  this  simply  means  that  their  immune  and  endocrine  sys-
tems do not function in an equivalent manner to that of adults. Some studies, such 
as  multigenerational  or  chronic  studies  with  an  in  utero  exposure  period,  are  de-
signed  to  take  into  account  these  differences.  Toxicologists  recognize,  however,  that 
many uncertainties remain with regard to the relevance of laboratory animal devel-
opment  as  compared  to  human  development,  the  appropriate  methods  for  testing, 
and  the  extrapolation  of  findings  in  rodents  to  humans.  For  many  of  the  endpoints 
which  have  recently  begun  to  be  highlighted,  such  as  neural  and  neurobehavioral 
developmental  endpoints,  many  questions  exist  with  regard  to  implications  for 
human safety assessment. 

Question  13.  Have  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  these  chemicals?  Is  it  even 

possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer. There are only a few studies involving human exposure available. These 
studies are retrospective epidemiology studies and limited to certain parameters, for 
instance,  studies  have  been  conducted  on  miscarriage  and  BPA  levels.  However,  as 
commented  on  in  the  CERHR  expert  panel  review,  none  of  the  currently  available 
studies  is  sufficient  to  make  conclusions  regarding  BPA’s  toxicity  in  humans.  The 
Center  for  Disease  Control  and  Prevention’s  National  Health  and  Nutrition  Exam-
ination  Survey  has  and  will  continue  to  test  for  levels  of  BPA  in  human  biological 
fluids.  FDA  sees  this  effort  as  extremely  helpful  in  determining  the  actual  internal 
dose  to  BPA,  which  is  useful  in  verifying  assumptions  with  regard  to  exposure  and 
safety assessment. 

Question  14.  Usually  chemicals  are  tested  one  at  a  time.  However,  we  come  into 
contact  with  numerous  chemicals  every  day.  Do  these  studies  simulate  real  world 
exposures and what is the best way to test chemicals? 

Answer.  The  issue  with  regard  to  mixtures  and  safety  assessment  is  one  that  is 
extremely difficult to address, but occurs in the real human experience. Toxicologists 
know  that  chemicals  involved  in  the  same  pathways  may  act  additively,  syner-
gistically,  or  may  inhibit  one  another.  However,  for  risk  assessment  purposes, 
chemicals  are  normally  tested  individually  to  avoid  data  interpretation  difficulties 
that  may  result  from  metabolic  and  toxicological  interactions  with  other  chemicals. 
This  is  usually  done  at  much  higher  doses  than  human  exposures  for  the  compari-
son  of  effects  observed  in  animal  testing  to  the  human  estimated  exposure  (margin 
of safety). Testing chemicals at dose levels simulating ‘‘real world’’ exposures would 
require  an  extremely  large  number  of  animals  to  determine  an  effect  that  was  not 
considered  a  random  or  chance  event.  Basing  any  conclusions  on  random  or  chance 
events relating to potential toxicity may give a false sense of safety. Considering all 
possible  exposures  to  chemicals  with  known  modes  of  actions  is  an  insurmountable 
challenge  based  on  current  science.  In  addition,  as  is  the  case  with  BPA,  environ-
mental  or  dietary  compounds  such  as  phytoestrogens,  which  are  naturally  present 
in soy-based food products, may also be potential confounders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

84 

Question  15.  What  about  workers  who  are  in  the  plants  that  manufacture 
phthalates and BPA. Are protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unneces-
sarily exposed? 

Answer.  While  toxicological  data  and  analyses  that  have  been  developed  by  FDA 
may be useful in assessing the effects of exposure in the workplace (and vice versa), 
issues  related  to  workplace  safety  are  under  the  regulatory  purview  of  the  Occupa-
tional  Safety  and  Health  Administration.  That  agency,  rather  than  FDA,  would  be 
better positioned to answer this question. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

NORRIS E. ALDERSON, PH.D. 

Question  1.  In  light  of  the  results  of  the  2007  assessment  by  the  Center  for  the 
Evaluation  of  Risks  to  Human  Reproduction  and  last  month’s  draft  brief  from  the 
National  Toxicology  Program,  what  actions  is  FDA  taking  to  ensure  the  safety  of 
products  that  contain  BPA?  Why  is  FDA  allowing  consumer  products—particularly 
children’s products—that contain BPA to stay on the market? 

Answer.  Commissioner  of  Food  and  Drugs  Andrew  C.  von  Eschenbach,  M.D.  has 
formed an Agency-wide BPA Task Force to conduct a review, encompassing all FDA- 
regulated product lines, of the concerns raised about BPA. The Task Force is under-
taking  a  broad  review  of  current  research  and  information  on  BPA,  and  is  actively 
reviewing NTP’s Draft Brief. 

Members of the Task Force have met with NTP staff to discuss their findings and 
better understand the underlying data. Also, staff of FDA’s NCTR is discussing with 
NTP additional research needs relating to BPA. 

In  addition  to  looking  at  the  food  and  beverage  containers  that  have  been  the 
focus  of  recent  concerns,  as  well  as  our  regulatory  efforts,  over  the  years,  the  BPA 
Task  Force  is  conducting  an  inventory  of  all  products  regulated  by  FDA’s  food  and 
medical  products  centers  and  is  reviewing  other  potential  routes  of  exposure.  Addi-
tionally,  the  Task  Force  has  met  with  representatives  of  product  manufacturers  to 
better  understand  manufacturing  and  chemistry  issues.  Finally,  the  Task  Force  is 
considering  what  recommendations  for  further  laboratory  studies  or  other  research 
may be appropriate. 

The NTP has stated that its Draft Brief on BPA is not a quantitative risk assess-
ment, nor does it supersede risk assessments conducted by regulatory agencies. The 
report stated that more research is needed to better understand the health implica-
tions  of  BPA  exposure.  Although  FDA’s  review  is  ongoing,  at  this  time  we  have  no 
reason  to  recommend  that  consumers  stop  using  products  containing  BPA.  A  large 
body  of  evidence  indicates  that  currently-marketed  products  containing  BPA,  such 
as baby bottles and food containers, are safe, and that exposure levels to BPA from 
these products are well below those that may cause health effects. 

Question  2.  In  your  written  testimony,  you  note  that  FDA  continues  to  monitor 
the  safety  of  phthalates  and  BPA.  How  much  information  is  required  before  FDA 
will  make  a  decision  that  exposure  to  these  chemicals  is  not  safe?  Are  there  estab-
lished decision points for reevaluation? 

Answer.  FDA’s  re-evaluation  of  any  food  additive  involves  a  determination  of 
whether the permitted use of that compound continues to meet the safety standard. 
That  is  the  primary  decision  point  for  FDA  to  take  action.  There  is  no  minimum 
amount  of  data  necessary  to  reach  that  decision  point  but  the  data  underpinning 
such  a  decision  must  be  relevant  to  the  safety  assessment  of  the  chemical.  FDA’s 
current consideration of the data on BPA follows. 

Information exists indicating the possibility of concern for humans exposed during 
development.  That  possible  concern  includes  developmental  toxicity  effects  (neural 
and  behavioral  effects,  prostate  gland,  and  early  onset  of  puberty  in  females)  and 
a possible predisposition for cancer (mammary and prostate glands) later in life. The 
data generating these concerns are rodent data and contain many uncertainties and 
limitations.  For  example,  regarding  the  conclusion  of  a  predisposition  of  cancer,  for 
both endpoints, the NTP stated that ‘‘The evidence is not sufficient to conclude that 
bisphenol  A  is  a  rodent  [mammary/prostate]  gland  carcinogen  or  that  bisphenol  A 
presents a [breast cancer/prostate] hazard to humans.’’ 

FDA  takes  the  NTP  and  its  expert  panels’  conclusions  seriously  and  our  Task 
Force  is  currently  reviewing  these  data  as  they  relate  to  the  safety  assessments  of 
BPA-containing products that are regulated by FDA. The Agency’s established deci-
sion  points  in  this  re-evaluation  are  to  consider  the  information  that  has  indicated 
a concern and report those findings with recommendations to the Commissioner for 
appropriate action. FDA’s activities with regard to BPA will be conducted using pub-
lic  peer  review  and  the  FDA  Science  Board.  At  FDA’s  request,  the  FDA  Science 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

85 

Board, which is an independent advisory body to FDA on scientific issues, is forming 
a subcommittee on BPA to undertake scientific peer review of the Task Force report. 
Part  of  that  peer  review  process  will  be  to  hold  a  public  meeting  to  accept  input 
and  comments  from  the  public.  The  full  Science  Board  will  receive  the  findings  of 
the Subcommittee during its fall meeting. 

With  regard  to  phthalates,  CFSAN’s  Phthalate  Task  Group  is  evaluating  current 
use  levels  and,  based  on  the  information  gathered,  will  consider  what  action  may 
be  necessary  to  establish  a  more  realistic  exposure  estimate.  Any  actions  necessary 
to modify the existing regulations to reflect current known practices will be pursued, 
as  appropriate.  Should  FDA’s  updated  assessment  indicate  a  safety  concern,  appro-
priate regulatory actions will be taken to protect consumers. 

Question  3.  News  reports  have  indicated  that  the  FDA  relied  exclusively  on  a 
handful of industry-funded studies of the low-dose effects of BPA, in the face of con-
trary evidence from dozens of scientific studies. Is this accurate? 

Answer. FDA’s position on BPA is based on the consideration of hundreds of stud-
ies  and  is  not  derived  solely  from  the  review  of  the  two  industry-funded  studies. 
However, FDA has concluded that these two studies are pivotal to the safety assess-
ment  of  BPA,  due  to  the  design  of  the  studies  and  the  quality  of  the  data.  While 
we  have  used  these  studies  in  determining  the  current  ‘‘no  observed  effect  level’’ 
(NOEL) for BPA, this is not the same as stating that our position is entirely depend-
ent on consideration of only these two studies. 

The two rodent studies that were considered pivotal were sponsored by the Amer-
ican  Plastics  Council  and  the  Society  of  the  Plastics  Industry  and  were  conducted 
by  RTI  International,  Research  Triangle  Park,  North  Carolina.  The  studies  were 
conducted  to  address  questions  concerning  possible  low-dose  effects  of  BPA  on 
endpoints that were of concern at that time. The industry briefed FDA and our Eu-
ropean  counterparts  on  the  two  studies  during  the  planning  and  execution  phases. 
These studies were considered pivotal in our review of the existing data for a num-
ber  of  reasons,  including  the  following:  (1)  they  were  conducted  in  a  manner  that 
CFSAN’s Office of Food Additive Safety would recommend to a stakeholder seeking 
an  approval  for  a  new  use  (i.e.,  they  follow  Agency  guidelines)  and  included  addi-
tional  protocol  considerations  allowing  for  the  examining  of  issues  that  were  con-
troversial  to  BPA  at  the  time  planned;  (2)  they  were  submitted  to  the  Agency  with 
supporting  information  (raw  data)  allowing  for  our  independent  evaluation  of  the 
findings;  and  (3)  they  both  included  a  large  range  of  exposures,  including  a  range 
of  high  and  low  doses  which  allowed  for  the  examination  of  dose  response  curves. 
These  studies  have  been  given  more  weight  in  FDA’s  evaluation  of  BPA,  compared 
to  publications  in  the  public  literature  that  examine  the  same  endpoints,  because 
these  publications  often  lack  details  and  supporting  data  that  would  allow  Agency 
scientists  to  make  an  independent  evaluation  of  the  underlying  data.  In  addition, 
many  of  the  published  studies  on  BPA  have  numerous  protocol  limitations,  includ-
ing the animal model utilized, the method of BPA measurement, the statistical anal-
ysis  of  the  data,  the  failure  to  use  multiple  or  correctly  spaced  doses  in  the  experi-
mental protocol, and the route of administration. 

Question  4.  Do  your  agencies  require  labeling  of  consumer  products  that  contain 
BPA or phthalates? Is there any control over current voluntary labeling of products 
as ‘‘BPA-free’’ or ‘‘phthalate-free’’? 

Answer. FDA does not require such labeling. Because FDA has not made a deter-
mination  that  BPA  or  phthalates,  under  current  conditions  of  use,  are  unsafe,  we 
do  not  believe  that  labeling  for  the  presence  of  these  chemicals  would  provide  con-
sumers with meaningful information on the safety of the products. Pursuant to our 
authority under the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, if FDA determined that 
a  water  bottle  or  other  product  containing  BPA  was  in  fact  not  safe,  we  would  not 
address it through labeling; rather, we would take action to restrict or possibly dis-
allow its use. 

Manufacturers  are  permitted  to  voluntarily  label  products  as  ‘‘BPA  free’’  or 
‘‘Phthalate free’’ so long as the labeling statements are truthful and not misleading. 
Question  5.  Can  you  please  explain  the  different  roles  for  FDA,  CPSC  and  EPA 
in  the  study  and  regulation  of  phthalates,  BPA  and  other  endocrine  disrupting 
chemical compounds? Do the agencies share data and information? 

Answer.  FDA  is  the  agency  responsible  for  the  safety  of  food  and  medical  prod-
ucts, and this jurisdiction includes food containers and packaging (food contact ma-
terials).  Although  BPA  itself  is  not  considered  a  food  additive,  it  is  present  as  an 
impurity  in  polycarbonate  plastics  and  epoxy-based  resins  and  was  considered  as 
part  of  FDA’s  overall  review  of  BPA-containing  food  contact  materials.  Similarly, 
phthalates  are  considered  as  part  of  FDA’s  review  of  food  contact  materials  when 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

86 

they  are  added  to  food  contact  polymers  to  help  soften  them  and  make  them  more 
pliable (i.e., they act as plasticizers). 

The Consumer Product Safety Commission (CPSC) is responsible for the safety of 
consumer  articles  that  would  not  fall  under  the  jurisdiction  of  the  FDA.  For  exam-
ple, although baby bottles and nipples would fall under the jurisdiction of FDA, the 
safety  of  baby  pacifiers  or  toys  would  fall  under  CPSC.  EPA  is  responsible  for  the 
effect  of  chemicals  on  the  environment  as  a  result  of  their  manufacture,  use,  and 
disposal. 

FDA,  CPSC,  and  EPA  work  closely  in  areas  where  our  jurisdiction  converges.  A 
recent  example  of  such  cooperation  is  the  response  in  2006  to  elevated  lead  levels 
in  soft-sided  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC)  lunchboxes,  where  FDA  and  CPSC  shared 
data  and  information.  FDA  was  concerned  about  the  potential  for  lead  migrating 
into  food  held  in  the  PVC  lunchboxes  while  CPSC  was  concerned  about  potential 
exposure of children to the lead by touching the PVC or by putting parts of the PVC 
lunchbox in their mouths. 

Memoranda of understanding have been developed over the years to help facilitate 

cooperation between FDA and both CPSC and EPA. 

Question  6.  Do  we  know  what  levels  of  BPA  and  phthalates  are  safe  for  human 

(particularly child) consumption? 

Answer.  Ordinarily,  FDA  uses  the  term  ‘‘acceptable  daily  intake’’  (ADI  to  define 
the  estimated  maximum  amount  of  a  food  additive  to  which  individuals  in  a  popu-
lation may be exposed daily over their lifetimes without an appreciable health risk. 
These  levels  are  determined  by  examining  endpoints  from  which  the  NOEL  or  no 
observed  adverse  effect  level  (NOAEL),  if  appropriate,  is  calculated  in  animal  stud-
ies. However, since BPA is an impurity and not a food additive, FDA considers mar-
gin  of  safety  (MOS)  more  appropriate  in  evaluating  the  safety  of  BPA.  The  MOS 
is  compared  to  the  typical  uncertainty  factors  used  for  the  appropriate  endpoint  in 
deeming if the substance is safe for the expected exposure. 

CFSAN’s  typical  uncertainty  factors  are  10  for  intraspecies  variability  and  10  for 
interspecies  variability  for  reproductive  or  developmental  effects  that  are  reversible 
(which  is  the  observation  at  the  NOEL  for  BPA).  For  systemic  toxicity,  exposure  in 
the  applicable  studies  is  less  than  chronic;  therefore,  an  additional  factor  of  10  is 
used  to  extrapolate  from  subchronic  to  chronic  exposure.  Using  this  approach,  the 
Agency has determined adequate safety margins for both infant and adult exposure 
to  BPA,  based  on  the  NOELs  identified  in  Tyl.  et  al.  (2002,  2008)  rodent  studies. 
The  lowest  NOEL  in  both  studies  was  5  mg/kg  bw/day,  based  on  the  endpoint  of 
systemic  toxicity.  FDA’s  task  force  is  currently  examining  the  additional  endpoints 
identified in the recently released draft documents as they relate to the current ex-
posure  and  the  previously  examined  and  referenced  toxicity  studies.  Should  FDA’s 
updated assessment indicate a safety concern, appropriate regulatory actions will be 
initiated to protect consumers. 

FDA’s approach to phthalates is similar to BPA. As noted in the response to your 
earlier question, CFSAN’s Phthalate Task Group is currently evaluating current use 
levels of phthalates in food contact materials and based on the information obtained, 
FDA will reassess the safety of food contact materials containing phthalates. Should 
FDA’s updated assessment indicate a safety concern, appropriate regulatory actions 
will be initiated to protect consumers. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

DR. MARILYN L. WIND 

Question  1.  According  to  my  information,  CPSC  has  never  done  a  comprehensive 
study  on  the  effects  of  all  phthalates.  Why  has  CPSC  not  undertaken  a  thorough 
study?  In  light  of  recent  reports,  does  CPSC  intend  to  do  a  full  review  of  possible 
effects of phthalate exposure? 

Answer. CPSC’s primary interest in phthalates has been exposure levels resulting 
from  the  mouthing  of  children’s  products,  especially  pacifiers,  teethers  and  rattles. 
In  this  regard,  the  CPSC  conducted  comprehensive  studies  of  the  two  phthalates 
(DINP  and  DEHP)  that  were  used  in  children’s  products  intended  to  be  mouthed. 
In  regulating  a  product  under  the  Federal  Hazardous  Substances  Act  (FHSA),  the 
CPSC  must  consider  the  toxicity  of  a  product  and  the  consumer’s  exposure  to  that 
product  under  reasonably  foreseeable  handling  and  use.  Accordingly,  the  CPSC 
prioritizes  its  research  work  related  to  phthalates  by  concentrating  on  those  con-
sumer products under the agency’s jurisdiction where there is a concern about such 
toxicity and exposure. 

Foods  and  cosmetics  would  be  the  primary  source  of  human  exposure  from 
phthalates other than DINP and DEHP, and those products fall under the jurisdic-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

87 

tion  of  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA).  Since  manufacturers  have  re-
moved  DINP  and  DEHP  from  children’s  products  that  are  intended  to  be  mouthed, 
the CPSC has now initiated a study of substitutes that may be used to replace these 
phthalates. Additionally, CPSC staff continues to monitor the scientific literature on 
phthalates, including new data expected from the comprehensive National Research 
Council study on all phthalates. 

Question  2.  The  ‘‘low-dose  hypothesis’’  claims  that  exposure  to  extremely  low  lev-
els  of  certain  substances  could  cause  adverse  health  effects  in  humans.  Some  have 
criticized  existing  studies  and  reviews  for  looking  at  only  high  dosage  exposure. 
Have  any  of  the  governmental  reviews  done  by  CPSC  taken  into  account  studies 
showing adverse health effects from low-dose exposure to BPA? 

Answer.  The  greatest  potential  for  human  exposure  to  BPA  is  from  food  contact 
items.  The  recent  in-depth  peer  review  conducted  by  the  National  Toxicology  Pro-
gram  (NTP)  stated  that  diet  accounts  for  99  percent  of  human  exposure.  Accord-
ingly,  primary  jurisdiction  for  BPA  falls  under  the  FDA.  The  CPSC  has  not  con-
ducted  studies  on  adverse  health  effects  from  low-dose  exposure  to  BPA  and  would 
defer to the authority and expertise of the FDA in this case. It should be noted that 
the NTP has released a comprehensive peer-reviewed report on this subject. 

Question  3.  The  results  of  studies  into  the  potential  health  effects  of  BPA  and 
phthalates  conducted  by  the  government,  industry,  and  some  in  academia  seem  to 
vary  quite  widely  in  their  results.  How  would  you  explain  these  differences?  Does 
the  CPSC  take  into  account  the  safety  of  these  chemicals  when  rendering  its  opin-
ions? 

Answer.  With  regard  to  Bisphenol  A  (BPA),  there  are  a  large  number  of  studies 
giving  very  varied  results.  Since  the  NTP  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of  Risk  to 
Human  Reproduction  conducted  a  comprehensive  Peer  Review  Panel  of  all  the  lit-
erature,  and  since  BPA  exposure  results  primarily  from  products  under  FDA  juris-
diction, the CPSC has deferred to the NTP and FDA in the evaluation of BPA. 

With  regard  to  phthalates,  the  European  Union  (EU)  and  the  CPSC  reached  dif-
ferent  conclusions  in  their  risk  assessments  on  DINP.  While  the  European  Union 
evaluated  other  phthalates  as  well,  the  CPSC  did  not  since  the  primary  exposure 
to  children  was  from  DINP.  EU  scientists  and  CPSC  scientists  discussed  the  dif-
ferences  in  their  respective  risk  assessments  of  DINP.  When  the  CPSC  was  exam-
ining  the  health  effects  of  DINP,  it  convened  a  Chronic  Hazard  Advisory  Panel 
(CHAP),  which  is  a  panel  of  seven  independent  scientists  recommended  by  the  Na-
tional Academy of Sciences, to review the studies and advise the Commission on its 
findings. The report from the CHAP, as well as the subsequent staff hazard and risk 
assessment,  was  based  on  a  review  of  all  available  scientific  studies.  At  the  time 
of  the  CHAP,  the  results  from  the  Commission  behavioral  observation  study  were 
not  available.  However,  the  CHAP  concluded  that  there  was  no  concern  for  infants 
who  mouthed  toys  containing  DINP  for  less  than  75  minutes  per  day.  The  CPSC’s 
behavioral  observation  study  indicated  that  children’s  daily  mouthing  time  of  such 
toys  is  significantly  less  than  that.  Staff,  therefore,  concluded  that  there  was  not  a 
risk  of  injury  to  children  from  such  exposure.  The  EU  risk  assessment  was  exactly 
the same as the CPSC risk assessment, but the EU assumed an exposure that was 
larger  than  75  minutes  per  day,  without  doing  any  behavioral  studies  to  substan-
tiate  such  an  assumption.  CPSC’s  study  showed  that  such  an  assumption  was  not 
justified. 

Thus,  the  CPSC  staff’s  risk  assessment  was  based  upon  exposure  data  developed 
in  a  well  conducted  behavioral  observation  study  whereas  the  EU  risk  assessment 
was based upon an assumed exposure that was many fold higher than that observed 
in  the  CPSC  study.  As  indicated  previously,  the  FHSA  requires  that  the  Commis-
sion make a determination of risk based upon both hazard and exposure and in that 
way assess the safety of products when making its decisions. 

Question 4. Please explain the significance of low-dose exposures to BPA and how 

it relates to the traditionally held belief of ‘‘the dose makes the poison’’? 

Answer.  As  noted  above,  BPA  falls  under  the  primary  jurisdiction  of  the  FDA 
since diet accounts for 99 percent of human exposure. Accordingly, the CPSC defers 
to the expertise and authority of the FDA with regard to low-dose exposures to BPA. 
Question  5.  How  is  the  average  person  exposed  to  phthalates?  What  is  the  best 
way  to  reduce  exposure  to  phthalates?  Please  explain  the  significance  of  phthalate 
mixtures. 

Answer.  For  products  under  CPSC’s  jurisdiction,  the  agency  has  been  primarily 
concerned about phthalate exposure from the mouthing of children’s products, espe-
cially  pacifiers,  teethers  and  rattles.  In  this  regard,  the  CPSC  has  conducted  com-
prehensive studies of the two phthalates, DINP and DEHP, where exposure to chil-
dren from their use was a matter of concern. The staff’s risk assessment also consid-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

88 

ered ‘‘background’’ exposures from phthalates in addition to DINP; however, because 
most of the products studied by CPSC staff contained that single phthalate, the risk 
assessment focused on DINP. Most exposures from other phthalates were from food 
and other sources not regulated by the CPSC. As noted above, manufacturers subse-
quently removed DINP and DEHP from children’s products that are intended to be 
mouthed,  and  the  agency’s  current  focus  is  on  studying  exposure  to  possible  sub-
stitutes that may be used to replace these phthalates. 

Question 6. What are endocrine disruptors and how do they affect us? 
Answer.  The  term  endocrine  disruptors  does  not  have  a  precise  definition.  It  has 
been used to define endocrine active substances in animals as well as chemicals that 
bind to an estrogen or androgen receptor or are positive in other in vitro or in vivo 
tests.  The  relevance  to  human  risk  of  positive  results  in  these  assays  has  not  been 
determined and is still under considerable discussion by the scientific community at 
large. 

Question 7. Is there an established list of known endocrine disruptors? 
Answer.  CPSC  staff  does  not  know  of  any  such  list  nor  is  the  term  well  defined. 
Question  8.  Are  there  already  alternatives  to  BPA  and  phthalates?  Are  these  al-
ternatives  safer  than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists 
into these alternatives? 

Answer.  The  scientific  community  does  not  know  all  the  alternatives  that  are 
being used for phthalates. When switching from phthalates, manufacturers can con-
tinue to use polyvinyl chloride (PVC) containing a plasticizer other than a phthalate 
or they can use a completely different plastic than PVC. As noted above, the CPSC 
has  recently  initiated  a  study  of  phthalate  substitutes.  This  study  will  determine 
what  is  known  about  the  toxicity  of  some  of  these  alternatives.  In  order  to  use  a 
chemical  in  a  consumer  product,  manufacturers  are  not  required  to  do  any  par-
ticular  toxicity  testing.  However,  the  FHSA  requires  that  a  manufacturer  provide 
cautionary  warning  on  products  that  meet  the  definition  of  a  hazardous  substance. 
The implementing regulation provides test methodologies for a manufacturer to test 
their  products  to  determine  if  they  meet  the  definition  and  requires  warnings  for 
the  safe  use  and  storage  of  the  product.  While  manufacturers  may  do  such  testing 
for  household  chemical  products,  often  the  chemicals  used  in  other  types  of  con-
sumer  products  have  no  toxicity  information;  the  chemical  may  be  more,  less  or 
equally toxic to the chemical it is replacing. Lack of toxicity data does not mean that 
the  chemical  is  non-toxic;  it  just  means  the  toxicity  profile  of  the  chemical  is  un-
known.  The  CPSC  does  not  have  pre-market  clearance  authority  for  a  product  con-
taining a new chemical or for a new use of an existing chemical. The Environmental 
Protection  Agency  (EPA)  has  been  given  those  authorities  under  the  Toxic  Sub-
stances Control Act. 

Question 9. Do infants and children have the same immune and endocrine system 

as adults? Do studies take into account these differences? 

Answer.  Depending  upon  the  age  of  the  infant/child  and  the  particular  system 
under  consideration,  there  may  be  differences  which  would  make  the  infant/child 
more  or  less  sensitive  than  an  adult.  In  some  cases  studies  take  these  differences 
into account by using immature animals. 

Question  10.  Have  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  these  chemicals?  Is  it  even 

possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer.  Intentional  testing  of  chemicals  for  toxicity  in  humans  is  generally  not 
done,  precisely  for  the  reason  stated;  it  is  not  ethical.  Epidemiological  studies  are 
sometimes conducted in which exposures are measured or estimated and the occur-
rence of adverse effects are recorded. Epidemiology is sometimes a powerful tool for 
assessing  the  toxicology  of  chemicals,  but  studies  in  humans  are  generally  difficult, 
time-consuming  and  expensive.  For  example,  many  of  the  potential  effects  are  ones 
that might occur after long-term exposure, may not be apparent for many years, and 
may have effects that are the same as those from other chemicals to which a person 
is exposed. There are a limited number of studies in which metabolites of phthalates 
have been looked for in the urine of humans. There are few epidemiological studies 
that exist and the effects in humans have not been clearly demonstrated. 

Question  11.  Usually  chemicals  are  tested  one  at  a  time.  However,  we  come  into 
contact  with  numerous  chemicals  every  day.  Do  these  studies  simulate  real  world 
exposures and what is the best way to test chemicals? 

Answer. The toxicological effects of chemicals, in general, are tested one at a time 
because  testing  more  than  one  chemical  at  a  time  would  confound  the  results  and 
it  would  be  impossible  to  determine  which  of  a  group  of  chemicals  tested  together 
was  responsible  for  the  toxicologic  endpoint.  Because  of  the  nearly  limitless  com-
binations  of  potential  chemical  exposures  in  the  world,  it  is  simply  not  possible  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

89 

test  mixtures  in  most  cases.  In  certain  cases,  such  as  household  chemical  products, 
where one particular product contains a mixture of chemicals, the product generally 
is tested as a whole in the United States to determine appropriate classification and 
labeling.  Further,  if  appropriate  data  are  available  for  a  given  exposure  scenario, 
a  risk  assessment  could  consider  information  about  more  than  one  chemical  to  de-
termine  the  overall  risk.  The  ‘‘science’’  of  conducting  risk  assessments  for  mixtures 
is very new. 

Question  12.  What  about  workers  who  are  in  the  plants  that  manufacture 
phthalates and BPA. Are protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unneces-
sarily exposed? 

Answer.  CPSC’s  jurisdiction  does  not  cover  chemical  exposures  in  the  workplace. 
The  Occupational  Safety  and  Health  Administration  (OSHA)  has  jurisdiction  over 
worker exposure to chemicals. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

DR. MARILYN L. WIND 

Question  1.  In  your  written  testimony,  you  explain  the  CPSC’s  2003  decision  to 
deny  the  request  to  ban  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC),  which  contains  phthalates.  Has 
any  new  evidence  surfaced  since  2003  that  would  lead  you  to  reconsider  that  deci-
sion? 

Answer. No new scientific evidence has surfaced since 2003 that would lead CPSC 
staff to recommend to the Commission that it reconsider its decision to deny the re-
quest to ban polyvinyl chloride which contains phthalates. 

Question  2.  Do  your  agencies  require  labeling  of  consumer  products  that  contain 
BPA or phthalates? Is there any control over current voluntary labeling of products 
as ‘‘BPA-free’’ or ‘‘phthalate-free’’? 

Answer. At present, the CPSC does not require labeling of products containing ei-
ther phthalates or BPA. Under CPSC’s governing statutes, the Commission has the 
authority to require labeling only if a product is determined to be a ‘‘hazardous sub-
stance.’’  CPSC’s  statutes  are  risk-based,  not  ‘‘hazard-based.’’  That  is  to  say,  the 
product  in  question  must  actually  pose  a  risk  of  substantial  illness  or  injury,  not 
simply  contain  a  potential  toxicant.  The  FTC  has  jurisdiction  over  the  labeling  of 
products that make claims such as ‘‘BPA-free’’ or ‘‘phthalate-free.’’ 

Question  3.  Can  you  please  explain  the  different  roles  for  FDA,  CPSC  and  EPA 
in  the  study  and  regulation  of  phthalates,  BPA  and  other  endocrine  disrupting 
chemical compounds? Do the agencies share data and information? 

Answer. Each regulatory agency has specific jurisdiction which is defined in their 
laws  and  regulations.  FDA  generally  has  responsibility  over  food,  drugs,  and  cos-
metics. EPA has broad authority over the manufacture of chemicals and the imple-
mentation of new uses for existing chemicals. The CPSC has responsibility generally 
over  consumer  products  and  their  potential  for  substantial  injury  or  illness  in  rea-
sonably  foreseeable  use  scenarios.  In  addition  to  defining  their  authority,  these 
agencies’  laws  and  regulations  restrict  certain  types  of  information  that  can  be 
shared outside each agency. For information that is not restricted, agency scientists 
often  share  scientific  information,  develop  needed  data  together,  and  participate  on 
interagency groups such as the National Toxicology Program and its committees and 
then  process  the  information  within  their  own  statutory  or  regulatory  framework. 
Question  4.  Do  we  know  what  levels  of  BPA  and  phthalates  are  safe  for  human 

(particularly child) consumption? 

Answer.  CPSC  staff  developed  an  Acceptable  Daily  Intake  (ADI)  for  the  amount 
of  the  phthalate  DINP  that  could  be  ingested  on  a  chronic  basis  and  not  result  in 
an  adverse  health  effect.  CPSC  staff  has  not  developed  ADI’s  for  BPA  or  other 
phthalates  since  there  were  no  exposures  to  these  chemicals  from  consumer  prod-
ucts  under  the  agency’s  jurisdiction  which  would  indicate  that  a  determination  of 
an ADI was warranted. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

JOHN PETERSON MYERS, PH.D. 

Question  1.  What  research  is  being  done  to  determine  the  effects  these  chemicals 

have on wildlife? 

Answer.  Wildlife  research  has  received  much  less  attention  than  potential  effects 
of bisphenol A and phthalates on laboratory animals and on humans. There is very 
little funding available to pursue this line of inquiry. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

90 

There is no published literature on phthalates and wildlife nor am I aware of any 
active  research  program  currently  studying  this  issue.  I  am  aware  of  one  unpub-
lished study, carried out by Dr. Louis Guillette and his students (University of Flor-
ida, Gainesville), in collaboration with the U.S. Centers for Disease Control, finding 
unexpectedly and extremely high levels of phthalates in alligators living in the wild 
in  Florida.  Alligators  sampled  in  the  Everglades  contained  average  levels  of  the 
phthalate  MEHP  in  their  urine  of  almost  100  parts  per  million.  Because  the  CDC 
did the chemical analysis, and re-did their assay once these exceptional values were 
discovered, the data are credible. That is an extraordinarily high level to encounter 
in  any  non-experimental  organism.  Phthalate  levels  from  alligators  in  central  Flor-
ida  are  not  quite  as  high,  but  still  a  cause  for  significant  concern.  The  researchers 
believe  that  the  source  of  exposure  is  the  use  of  phthalates  as  stabilizers  in  herbi-
cides being used to control aquatic vegetation. If that is the case, these levels might 
be  quite  widespread.  Research  examining  the  extent  of  phthalate  contamination  in 
wild animals and ascertaining the consequences should be a high priority. 

Two  extensive  reviews  summarizing  research  on  bisphenol  A  and  wildlife  have 

been published within the past 12 months: 

Crain,  D.,  et  al.,  2007.  An  ecological  assessment  of  bisphenol-A:  Evidence  from 

comparative biology. Reproductive Toxicology 23:225–239. 

Canadian  Ministry  of  the  Environment.  2008.  Draft  Screening  Assessment  for 
Phenol,  4,4’-(1-methylethylidene)bis-  (80-05-7).  Available  for  download  at:  http:// 
www.ec.gc.ca/substances/ese/eng/challenge/batch2/batch2l80-05-7.cfm. 

Because  of  the  paucity  of  funding,  there  is  no  comprehensive  effort  in  the  U.S. 
to gather information about the effect of BPA on wildlife. Research dollars from the 
Federal Government into these issues have declined dramatically over the past dec-
ade. Almost all of the work underway is on aquatic organisms. 

In  the  U.S.,  the  United  States  Geological  Survey  laboratory  in  Columbia,  Mis-
souri, is studying BPA and its effects on fish. Dr. Don Tillett and Dr. Kathy Richter 
are the principal scientists. 

In Japan, Dr. Koji Arizono at the University of Kumamoto is conducting research 

wildlife? 

on BPA and fish. 

In  Germany,  Dr.  Jo¨rg  Oehlmann  at  Johann  Wolfgang  Goethe  University,  Frank-

furt, is the lead researcher on effects of BPA on marine snails. 

Question  2.  What  are  the  known  effects  of  these  harmful  plastic  chemicals  on 

Answer. To my knowledge, there are no published papers in the modern literature 
on  phthalates  and  wildlife.  This  is  extraordinary  given  the  widespread  use  of 
phthalates as inert ingredients in pesticides. Given what is known about the repro-
ductive  harm  caused  by  phthalates  in  laboratory  animals,  if  the  unpublished  data 
from Guillette’s lab (above) are representative, then widespread damage is likely to 
be occurring. 

Documented  effects  of  BPA  on  wildlife  are  varied  but  much  more  needs  to  be 
learned.  As  summarized  in  the  Canadian  review  (reference  above),  BPA  at  high 
doses  is  acutely  toxic  to  aquatic  organisms  and  considered  highly  hazardous.  Low 
concentrations of BPA are sufficient to a range of adverse effects, especially at sen-
sitive stages of development. These effects include feminization of male fish, delayed 
development  of  aquatic  invertebrates,  ‘super-feminization’  of  marine  snails  (leading 
to death of females), delayed emergence and mouthpart deformities in insects. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

JOHN PETERSON MYERS, PH.D. 

Question 1. Some have pointed out the preponderance of studies showing the safe-
ty of these and other chemicals used in consumer products. It would seem that there 
are  significantly  less  studies  purporting  the  harm  or  risk  of  these  chemicals.  How 
do you respond to these criticisms? 

Answer.  The  reverse  is  true.  Many  more  studies  have  been  published  that  find 
adverse  effects  resulting  from  low  levels  of  exposure.  This  pattern  itself  has  been 
published in the peer-reviewed literature: vom Saal, F. and C. Hughes, 2005. An Ex-
tensive  New  Literature  Concerning  Low-Dose  Effects  of  Bisphenol  A  Shows  the 
Need  for  a  New  Risk  Assessment.  Environmental  Health  Perspectives  113:926–933. 
In an extensive review of the literature, they showed that over 90 percent of govern-
ment-funded  studies  of  low-dose  effects  found  adverse  effects.  An  update  of  their 
tally  through  July  2007  shows  that  166  out  of  195  (85  percent)  studies  published 
on  the  effects  of  BPA  at  low  doses  find  adverse  consequences.  Out  of  14  industry- 
funded  studies  to  date,  none  have  found  adverse  effects.  Out  of  181  government- 
funded studies, 166 (92 percent) have found adverse effects. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

91 

There  is  a  vital  difference  between  industry-funded  studies  and  those  funded  by 
government (mostly by NIH). The NIH-funded studies must meet the highest stand-
ards of scientific rigor simply to get funded. They use highly sophisticated and sen-
sitive assays that incorporate the latest knowledge from medicine, endocrinology, re-
productive  development,  neurobiology,  etc.  The  scientists,  to  be  competitive  in  this 
day  and  age  of  shrinking  research  budgets,  must  be  among  the  best  in  the  world. 
Their  work  focuses  not  only  on  the  structural  changes  that  are  caused,  but  also  on 
the genetic mechanisms underlying those changes. That is key, because BPA’s prin-
cipal mode of action is through altering the expression of genes. 

In  contrast,  industry-funded  studies  are  using  techniques  dating  to  the  middle  of 
the last century, literally. They measure gross changes in anatomy and weight. And 
they  do  so  poorly,  because  they  usually  involve  multiple  technicians  with  limited 
training to carry out the measurements. This use of multiple technicians introduces 
variability that makes it more difficult for them to find significant results. 

Plastic industry representatives are critical of the sample sizes of NIH-funded re-
search, and use that criterion to exclude many excellent studies. This is a false criti-
cism.  NIH  requires  scientists  to  use  as  few  animals  as  necessary.  NIH-funded  sci-
entists respond to this requirement in two scientifically-tested ways. First, they per-
form  a  statistical  power  analysis  which  allows  them  to  calculate,  based  on  prelimi-
nary results, how large a sample will be required to achieve a given level of signifi-
cance,  if  the  preliminary  results  are  valid.  Second,  they  either  use  only  one  techni-
cian for crucial measurements, reducing variability, or they carefully examine inter- 
observer  variability,  and  factor  that  into  their  analysis.  These  are  standard  NIH 
procedures. 

Importantly,  the  estimate  of  statistical  significance  factors  in  its  calculation  the 
sample  size  of  the  study.  A  small  sample  size  requires  a  bigger  difference  between 
controls  or  experimentals,  or  less  variance,  or  both,  to  achieve  a  given  level  of  sig-
nificance. Insisting upon an arbitrary sample size is not scientific and ignores basics 
statistics. 

Industry  often  points  to  the  fact  that  its  experiments  follow  ‘‘Good  Laboratory 
Practices’’ or GLP. This says nothing about the quality of the science, only that they 
followed  certain  standards  of  record-keeping  that  were  established  after  massive 
fraud was found in the results of contract laboratories. 

The most recently published study from an industry laboratory purporting to find 
no  effect  of  BPA  on  the  developing  mouse  prostate  is  a  good  example  of  how  GLP 
does not translate into good science: 

Tyl,  R.,  et  al.,  2008.  Toxicological  Sciences,  in  press.  This  study’s  major  failure  is 
its  inappropriate  use  of  a  positive  control.  Scientists  use  positive  controls  to  dem-
onstrate  their  competence  at  performing  the  experiment.  A  positive  control  is  per-
formed by exposing a group of animals to an agent known to cause an effect. In this 
case,  Tyl  et  al.’s  published  data  show  that  the  strain  of  mice  they  used  required  a 
high  dose  of  their  positive  control,  estradiol.  It  would  not  respond  to  a  low  dose.  If 
the  strain  wouldn’t  respond  to  a  low  dose  of  the  positive  control,  it  couldn’t  be  ex-
pected  to  respond  to  a  low  dose  of  bisphenol  A,  which  typically,  for  this  type  of  ef-
fect,  is  100  to  10,000  times  less  powerful  than  estradiol.  Another  weakness  in  this 
study  was  the  choice  of  which  positive  control  to  use.  Estradiol  was  a  highly  un-
usual choice, which means there is no scientific literature against which to compare 
the results of the experiment and help understand why it required such high doses. 
Question  2.  How  precautionary  should  we  be  when  the  weight  of  evidence  seems 

to show these chemicals are safe? 

Answer. The weight of the evidence shows that bisphenol A is not safe. We should 
immediately begin phasing out uses that lead to human exposure. The strongest evi-
dence  is  for  developing  organisms.  Therefore  the  highest  priority  should  be  placed 
on  measures  that  will  reduce  exposures  for  pregnant  women,  infants  and  children. 
Some  evidence  also  indicates  risk  for  men  with  prostate  cancer  (it  interferes  with 
the  standard  medical  treatment  for  prostate  cancer).  We  should  also  invigorate  in-
vestments in ‘green chemistry’ to identify safe replacements. 

Question 3. Please explain the significance of low-dose exposures to BPA and how 

it relates to the traditionally held belief of ‘‘the dose makes the poison’’? 

Answer. Bisphenol A is a synthetic sex hormone. Endocrinologists have known for 
years  that  all  hormones  can  have  different  effects  at  different  doses.  This  is  called 
a ‘biphasic response’ or a ‘non-monotonic dose response curve.’ It is well established 
in  the  literature  of  medical  endocrinology.  This  means  that  the  effects  seen  at  one 
dose, for example a high dose, may be completely unrelated to other effects seen at 
low doses. With bisphenol A, at very high levels it is toxic. For example, the experi-
ments  used  to  establish  the  current  FDA  and  EPA  standards  showed  that  at  rel-
atively  high  doses  (50  mg/kg/day)  it  causes  weight  loss  in  mice.  At  low  doses,  how-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

92 

ever, BPA turns on genes that are responsive to estrogen. These responses and their 
effects  are  very  different  from  the  ones  seen  at  the  levels  at  which  BPA  is  toxic. 
This means that tests of the effects of BPA at high doses can’t be used to predict 
what  will  happen  following  a  low-dose  exposure.  It  directly  contradicts  a  funda-
mental  assumption  of  toxicology  that  ‘‘biological  effects  increase  as  the  dose  in-
creases.’’  At  one  dose  level  BPA  will  alter  the  expression  of  one  set  of  genes  while 
at  another  it  will  affect  a  different  set.  And  at  high  levels  it  is  overtly  toxic,  so  the 
mechanism of impact is not through alteration of gene expression. 

Question  4.  How  is  the  average  person  exposed  to  phthalates?  What  is  the  best 

way to reduce exposure to phthalates? 

Answer.  Exposures  to  phthalates  come  from  many,  indeed  ubiquitous  sources,  al-
though the type of phthalate varies significantly depending upon the type of product 
or  use.  Common  sources  of  exposure  include  leaching  from  PVC  plastic,  dermal  ab-
sorption  of  phthalates  used  in  cosmetics  and  personal  care  products,  exposure  to 
phthalates  in  dust  generated  by  abrasion  of  phthalate  containing  products,  includ-
ing carpeting and building materials. 

Phthalate  exposure  can  be  reduced  by  avoiding  products  that  contain  them.  Un-
fortunately,  products  are  not  required  to  identify  their  phthalate  content  in  labels. 
Some  do.  Two  general  rules  of  thumb:  do  not  heat  (including  microwave)  food  or 
drinks in plastics; avoid unnecessary personal care products. 

Question 5. Please explain the significance of phthalate mixtures. 
Answer. Research that has been published over the past 5 years has drawn atten-
tion  to  the  fact  that  mixtures  of  contaminants  can  have  effects  even  when  each  of 
the components of the mixture is at a dose at which, by itself, it can cause no harm. 
Work  by  Dr.  Earl  Gray  (U.S.  EPA)  has  extended  these  basic  findings  into  research 
on  phthalates.  He  has  shown  that  a  mixture  of  different  phthalates,  each  one  at  a 
level insufficient to cause harm, can cause dramatic harm in exposed animals. 

This  is  important  because  current  regulatory  assessments  of  phthalates  are  all 
evaluate phthalates one-by-one. No accounting is made for the fact that virtually all 
people are exposed to multiple phthalates continuously. 

Question 6. What are endocrine disruptors and how do they affect us? 
Answer. Endocrine disruptors are chemical contaminants that interfere with hor-
mone  action.  There  are  multiple  mechanisms.  The  best  studied  involve  altering  the 
expression  of  genes  under  the  control  of  hormones,  either  directly  or  indirectly. 
Some  endocrine  disruptors,  for  example  BPA,  mimic  the  action  of  hormones.  BPA 
is an estrogen mimic. It causes effects that resemble the effects of adding estrogen. 
Other  endocrine  disruptors  interfere  with  the  action  of  hormones.  For  example, 
phthalates  interfere  with  testosterone  and  other  androgens.  They  are  deemed  ‘anti- 
androgens.’ 

Interfering  with  hormone  action  can  cause  adverse  effects  by  altering  the  timing 
and pattern of gene expression. During fetal development, for example, it is impera-
tive that gene expression follow a normal pattern; otherwise development can be ad-
versely affected. 

Initially  scientists  believed  that  compounds  like  bisphenol  A  were  ‘weak’  estro-
gens.  That  was  because  they  were  focused  on  only  one  mechanism  of  action.  In  the 
last  5  years  research  has  revealed  that  BPA  and  similar  compounds  can  be  just  as 
powerful as estrogen. 

Question 7. Is there an established list of known endocrine disruptors? 
Answer.  There  have  been  several  efforts  to  compile  lists  of  endocrine  disruptors, 

but none incorporate the most recent research. 

Here are several existing lists: 
IEH. 2005 Mar. Chemicals purported to be endocrine disrupters. A compilation of 
published lists. Leicester, UK: MRC Institute for Environment and Health. (Web Re-
port W20). Available at: http://www.silsoe.cranfield.ac.uk/ieh/pdf/w20.pdf. 

Abstract: [A total of 966 compounds or elements were identified as having been 
suggested  to  be  established  or  potential  endocrine  disrupters  (EDs).  The  list  is 
based  on  the  BKH  (2000)  report;  Environmental  Defense—Scorecard  sources; 
the  German  Federal  Environment  Agency;  the  UK  Institute  for  Environment 
and  Health;  the  California  EPA;  the  Japan  Chemical  Industry  Ecology-Toxi-
cology & Information Center and other publications. Online databases Medline, 
Biosis, Embase, NTIS, ToxNet, SciSearch, Pascal and CA Search were searched 
during the period Jan 2000-Jan 2002. Chemicals are grossly classified into Gen-
eral  Anthropogenic  (alcohols  &  glycols;  aromatic  hydrocarbons;  anilines  &  de-
rivatives; benzene & derivatives; benzophenones and derivatives; biphenyls and 
metabolites;  dioxins  and  metabolites;  diphenyl  derivatives;  diphenyl  ethers; 
furans  and  metabolites;  naphthols  &  naphthalenes;  phenols  and  derivatives; 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

93 

(carbamates; 

phthalate  esters  and  derivatives;  siloxanes;  styrene  and  derivatives;  miscella-
organochlorines; 
neous),  Biocides 
fungicides;  herbicides; 
organophosphates;  pyrethroids;  miscellaneous),  Biogenic 
(anthraquinones; 
flavanones; isoflavonoids; lignans; phenolic acids; plant-derived substances; vita-
mins;  miscellaneous),  Pharmaceuticals,  Inorganic  &  Organometals  and  Con-
sumer Products. There are 6 tables corresponding to these categories, giving the 
chemical  name,  CAS  number,  chemical  group  and/or  use,  references  (mostly 
from  previous  compilations),  and  Notes  (type  of  endocrine  disruption  activity, 
and/or level of concern or (un)certainty). Five pages of references follow.] 

European  Commission.  Endocrine  Disrupters  website.  http://ec.europa.eu/envi-
ronment/endocrine/strategy/substanceslen.htm.  This  website  links  to  the  docu-
ments listed below: 

DHI.  2007  May.  Study  on  enhancing  the  Endocrine  Disruptor  priority  list  with 
a  focus  on  low  production  volume  chemicals.  Revised  report  to  European  Commis-
sion DG ENV. ENV.D.4/ETU/2005/0028r. 252 pp. http://ec.europa.eu/environment/ 
endocrine/documents/finallreportl2007.pdf. 

Wrc–NSF.  2002  Nov.  Study  on  the  scientific  evaluation  of  12  substances  in  the 
context  of  endocrine  disrupter  priority  list  of  actions.  613  pp.  http://ec.europa.eu/ 
environment/endocrine/documents/wrclreport.pdf. 

BKH–RPS. 2002 Nov. Study on gathering information on 435 substances with in-
sufficient  data.  279  pp.  http://ec.europa.eu/environment/endocrine/documents/ 
bkhlreport.pdf#page=1. 

BKH Consulting Engineers, TNO Nutrition and Food Research. 2000 Nov 10. To-
ward the establishment of a priority list of substances for further evaluation of their 
role  in  endocrine  disruption.  Final  Report  (incorporating  corrigenda  to  final  report 
dated  21  June  2000).:  European  Commission  DG  ENV.  M0355008/1786Q/10/11/00. 
PDFs  (16  files)  available  at  http://ec.europa.eu/environment/endocrine/strategy/ 
substanceslen.htm,  and  also  available  at:  http://europa.eu.int/comm/environ-
ment/docum/01262len.htm (scroll down). 

Abstract:  [A  list  of  564  chemicals  (including  metals)  (see  Annexes  9  and  10) 
classified as ‘‘manmade’’ were compiled from other endocrine disruptor lists and 
classified  as  follows:  74  with  high-production  volume;  51  highly  persistent;  and 
29  metals.  The  146  chemicals  discussed  in  the  Annexes  6,  7,  12  and  13  refer 
to  these  three  groups  combined;  the  remainder  are  discussed  in  Annex  8.  For 
extensive  references  see  Annexes  9  and  11.  Chemicals  listed  in  table  3–6  are 
the same as those covered by Annex 14.] 

Question  8.  Are  there  already  alternatives  to  BPA  and  phthalates?  Are  these  al-
ternatives  safer  than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists 
into these alternatives? 

Answer.  There  are  alternatives  for  many  uses.  For  example,  manufacturers  have 
already  brought  to  market  plastic  baby  bottles  that  are  not  made  from 
polycarbonate,  the  plastic  based  on  BPA.  One  of  the  replacements  is  based  upon  a 
different  type  of  chemistry  that  by  definition  is  vastly  less  likely  to  leach  anything 
even under conditions of stress. That is because of the nature of the chemical bonds. 
The  bonds  that  bind  BPA  into  polycarbonate  are  weak  and  dissolve  readily.  The 
bonds that bind polyether sulphone are exceedingly resistant to degradation. By def-
inition they will be safer than BPA. Glass baby bottles are much safer too. 

One  of  the  most  problematic  of  replacements  is  for  the  use  of  BPA  as  an  epoxy 
resin to line food cans. There is no perfect substitute available for this lining. How-
ever, Japanese manufacturers have found a way to reduce BPA leaching by 95 per-
cent. And some manufactures of baby formula have decided that they don’t need to 
use  cans  at  all.  Instead  they  put  the  formula  in  cardboard  containers.  These  are 
available in the U.S. and Japan. 

Question 9. Do infants and children have the same immune and endocrine system 

as adults? Do studies take into account these differences? 

Answer.  The  fetus,  infants  and  children  are  developing  into  adults.  As  they  de-
velop,  all  their  physiological,  neurological  and  immune  systems  are  maturing.  That 
has two important implications for exposure to endocrine disruptors. First, their de-
veloping  systems  are  responding  constantly  to  hormonal  signaling  that  can  be  dis-
rupted  by  endocrine  disruptors.  And  the  consequences  of  that  disruption,  because 
it  alters  how  development  is  unfolding,  can  have  life  long  consequences.  Those  de-
velopmental  processes  are  already  completed  in  adults,  so  they  are  not  vulnerable 
in the same way. Second, fetuses and the young do not produce all the enzymes that 
adults  produce.  Some  of  these  enzymes  are  essential  for  detoxifying  toxicants  that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

94 

get into the blood stream. Without a mature set of enzymes, fetuses and the young 
are less able to defend themselves. 

This  is  particularly  relevant  to  BPA.  The  enzyme  that  detoxifies  BPA  in  mam-
mals,  including  people,  is  produced  at  much  lower  levels  in  the  young.  That  makes 
the young more vulnerable to the same exposure. It is also part of some ‘inside base-
ball’  arguments  over  toxicity  testing  in  BPA.  Industry  argues  that  because  most 
human  exposure  to  BPA  is  oral,  only  oral  tests  on  animals  are  relevant.  This  cri-
terion would eliminate some of the most striking low-dose results, which used injec-
tion or subcutaneous implants. However, these experiments were designed to mimic 
how  a  fetus  experiences  BPA.  From  the  perspective  of  the  fetus,  it  doesn’t  matter 
how  the  BPA  gets  into  its  mother’s  bloodstream.  The  National  Toxicology  Program 
in  its  review  of  the  ‘expert  panel’  assembled  by  the  Center  for  the  Evaluation  of 
Risks  to  Human  Reproduction  (CEHRH)  agreed  with  this  assessment,  based  on 
data. The experiments chose doses that fall well within the range of concentrations 
that  have  been  measured  in  mother’s  bloodstreams.  Hence  they  are  highly  appro-
priate for considering risk to humans. 

Question  10.  Have  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  these  chemicals?  Is  it  even 

possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer. There have been almost no published studies of the effects of BPA on hu-
mans.  There  is  a  small  number  of  epidemiological  studies  of  effects  of  phthalates 
on people. They consistently report adverse effects. Endpoints range from reproduc-
tive tract malformations to sperm abnormalities to immune system problems (asth-
ma). 

None  of  these  studies  involve  application  of  phthalates  or  BPA  to  humans.  That 
would  be  unethical.  They  are  all  epidemiological  studies,  which  examine  how  dif-
ferent levels of exposure alter the risk of specific endpoints. 

Question  11.  Usually  chemicals  are  tested  one  at  a  time.  However,  we  come  into 
contact  with  numerous  chemicals  every  day.  Do  these  studies  simulate  real  world 
exposures and what is the best way to test chemicals? 

Answer.  Studies  that  test  chemicals  only  one  at  a  time  are  insufficient  to  assess 
risks  in  the  real  world.  We  come  into  contact  with  hundreds,  if  not  thousands,  of 
chemicals  every  day.  Sophisticated  research  that  has  been  conducted  over  the  past 
years shows with scientific certainty that regulations based on tests done on chemi-
cals  one-at-a-time  can  dramatically  underestimate  risks.  What  this  research  shows 
repeatedly  is  that  when  you  have  a  mixture  of  chemicals,  each  one  at  a  level  that 
causes no effect, collectively they can cause severe damage. 

Sometimes the effects are what you would expect based on the mechanisms of tox-
icity  of  the  components  of  a  mixture.  But  some  results  indicate  that  mixtures  can 
cause  completely  unpredictable  effects,  for  example,  inducing  such  stress  that  the 
immune  system  is  compromised  and  the  animal  becomes  vulnerable  to  a  common 
bacteria  and  dies  from  bacterial  meningitis.  No  test  in  use  today  to  develop  toxi-
cological standards takes these possibilities into account. 

Testing  of  chemicals  must  start  with  an  explicit  requirement  to  test  over  a  wide 
dose  range.  Current  testing  is  usually  carried  out  over  a  narrow  and,  compared  to 
human exposure, relatively high level. The results of these high dose tests are then 
used  to  estimate  a  safe  level  of  exposure,  by  incorporating  safety  factors  that  take 
a  ‘no  observed  adverse  effect  level’  (NOAEL)  to  a  ‘reference’  or  acceptable  dose, 
which  might  be  100  to  1,000  times  lower  than  the  NOAEL.  That  reference  dose  is 
never  tested  directly.  It  is  assumed  to  be  safe  because  of  the  assumption  of  toxi-
cology  that  (above) 
‘‘biological  effects  increase  as  the  dose  increases.’’  But 
hormonally-active compounds like BPA and phthalates can have effects at low doses 
that are completely unpredictable from effects at high doses. 

Having a complete dose-response curve is the first step in working with mixtures. 
Scientists  have  learned  that  under  some  circumstances  they  can  combine  the  dose- 
response curves of components of a mixture to predict with reasonable accuracy how 
the  mixture  will  behave.  This  includes  examples  like  those  described  above  where 
the levels of any one of the components was too low to cause an effect, but the effect 
of the mixture was very significant. 

Another  vital  element  of  testing  is  to  remove  it  from  pressure  from  economic  in-
terests.  Experience  has  repeatedly  shown,  with  chemicals  like  tobacco,  pharma-
ceuticals,  lead,  vinyl  chloride,  chromium,  bisphenol  A,  tris,  etc.  that  data  from  lab-
oratories with economic ties to the manufacturers of the material produce data that 
cannot be trusted. 

Another  weak  part  of  the  system  that  leads  from  testing  to  regulatory  standards 
is  how  regulatory  agencies  assess  existing  data.  The  overwhelming  pattern  is  for 
agency  assessments  to  give  inordinate  weight  to  industry  data,  even  though  indus-
try  data  have  clear  biases.  They  often  reject  NIH-funded  data,  thus  ignoring  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

95 

most  sophisticated  research  available.  This  has  been  the  overwhelming  experience 
with  bisphenol  A.  A  parallel  example  with  another  chemical  was  just  revealed 
through investigative reporting by the Journal Sentinel (Milwaukee, WI), in an out-
standing  article  published  on  13  July  2008.  The  Journal  Sentinel  published  a  simi-
lar analysis of bisphenol A in 2007. Here are links to the two articles. 

Hazardous  flame  retardant  found  in  household  objects.  A  flame  retardant  that 
was  taken  out  of  children’s  pajamas  more  than  30  years  ago  after  it  was  found  to 
cause  cancer  is  being  used  with  increasing  regularity  in  furniture,  paint  and  even 
baby  carriers,  and  EPA’s  safety  assessment  is  biased  toward  industry,  again.  Mil-
waukee  Journal  Sentinel,  Wisconsin.  13  July  2008  http://www.jsonline.com/story/ 
index.aspx?id=771917. 

Warning:  Known  to  cause  severe  health  risks  to  laboratory  animals,  bisphenol  A 
is  in  you.  Investigative  reporting  finds  that  the  Federal  Government’s  assurances 
that  bisphenol  A  is  a  safe  chemical  are  based  on  outdated  and  incomplete  govern-
ment studies and science mostly funded by the chemical industry. Milwaukee Jour-
nal  Sentinel,  Wisconsin.  2  December  2007  http://www.jsonline.com/story/ 
index.aspx?id=692145 

Question  12.  What  about  workers  who  are  in  the  plants  that  manufacture 
phthalates and BPA. Are protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unneces-
sarily exposed? 

Answer.  This  is  a  matter  of  significant  concern  because  permissible  occupational 
exposures  are  based  upon  existing  standards.  They  will  not  have  factored  in  any  of 
the considerations that are driving concerns about endocrine disrupting compounds. 
Few  occupational  studies  are  available  on  risks  of  phthalates,  and  none  for 
bisphenol A. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

JOHN PETERSON MYERS, PH.D. 

Question  1.  Why  are  there  such  dramatically  different  results  on  the  low-dose  ef-
fects of BPA between the results of studies sponsored by the chemical industry and 
studies conducted by academics or government entities? 

Answer. Studies conducted by academics or government entities like the NIH use 
highly  sophisticated  methods  that  are  at  the  cutting  edge  of  medical  science  today. 
Industry  funded  studies,  in  contrast,  still  rely  upon  methods  developed  in  the  mid-
dle of the last century and use assays that are far weaker than those used by NIH- 
funded  scientists.  For  example,  the  ‘debate’  over  prostate  effects  of  BPA  contrasts 
studies  by  NIH-funded  scientists  that  began  with  simple  measurements  of  prostate 
weight  (in  1997)  but  now  involve  highly  sophisticated  computer-based  reconstruc-
tions  of  prostate  morphology  during  development  and  analyses  of  changes  in  the 
ways  that  genes  are  expressed  in  specific  key  tissues  of  the  prostate,  with  those  of 
industry-funded  scientists  who  in  2008  published  yet  another  failed  study  on  pros-
tate  size.  Industry  research  has  offered  no  conflict  with  the  more  sophisticated  re-
search because they haven’t conducted it. Yet the NIH-funded work not only shows 
the simple weight effect but also shows how it happens in exquisite microscopic de-
tail and reveals the molecular mechanisms that cause it to happen. 

Industry funded studies also continue to be based on the assumption that ‘‘biologi-
cal effects increase as the dose increases.’’ Decades of work in basic medical science 
with  hormones  shows  that  to  be  a  false  assumption  for  chemicals  that  behave  like 
hormones. BPA is a synthetic hormone. 

An  important  historical  point:  The  field  of  endocrine  disruption,  and  specifically 
research  on  bisphenol  A,  has  attracted  many  scientists  from  other  fields  who  have 
brought into this research area tools and knowledge that have been foreign to clas-
sic  toxicology.  Scientists  like  Dr.  Gail  Prins  (University  of  Illinois),  Dr.  Shuk  Mei 
Ho (University of Cincinnati), Dr. Patricia Hunt (Washington State University), Dr. 
Anna  Soto  (Tufts  University)  and  Dr.  Frederick  vom  Saal  (University  of  Wash-
ington) are all major players in their own fields of science, publishing in the leading 
scientific  journals  of  the  world  and  highly  competitive  for  NIH  grants.  They  ask 
questions  toxicologists  wouldn’t  have  asked  because  they  know  that  hormones  and 
hormone  like  substances  don’t  follow  classic  toxicological  patterns.  They  bring  in 
vastly more powerful techniques, newer and more sensitive assays, etc. They do re-
search that is not within the ability of traditional toxicologists. 

Question  2.  In  light  of  dozens  of  advanced  studies  over  the  past  several  years,  in 
conjunction  with  the  recent  assessment  from  the  National  Toxicology  Program,  do 
you  believe  that  the  Federal  Government  should  control  exposure  to  BPA  and 
phthalates? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00099 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

96 

Answer.  Current  science  justifies  regulatory  action  to  reduce  exposures  to 
phthalates and bisphenol A. It is impossible for individual consumers to have suffi-
cient  information  to  make  informed  choices—especially  when  most  of  the  time  the 
content  of  consumer  products  is  not  revealed.  But  it  should  not  fall  to  mothers  to 
become chemical engineers and toxicological experts to buy toys and bottles for their 
children. For both phthalates and BPA, enough data are in hand to justify reducing 
exposure  levels,  first  by  eliminating  their  use  in  materials  designed  to  hold  food  or 
water,  or  to  purposefully  come  in  contact  with  infants  or  babies  mouths.  Simulta-
neously, a rigorous investigation should be launched to identify other major sources 
of  human  exposure.  While  we  know  that  levels  in  people  today  are  higher  than 
those  sufficient  to  cause  harm  in  laboratory  animals,  we  do  not  have  a  comprehen-
sive picture of the sources of human exposure, nor can we explain why human levels 
are as high as they are. Scientists suspect there are significant unidentified sources 
yet to be found. 

Question 3. Can consumers trust products that are currently labeled as ‘‘BPA-free’’ 

or ‘‘phthalate-free’’? 

Answer.  That  is  an  empirical  question  that  remains  to  be  answered  for  most  in-
stances.  Glass  baby  bottles  and  stainless  steel  sports  bottles  do  not  contain  BPA. 
It  is  possible  to  make  the  products  that  have  been  labeled  ‘‘BPA-free’’  with  BPA, 
and ‘‘phthalate-free’’ without phthalates, but whether individual companies are mis-
representing their products can only be determined through analysis. 

Question  4.  What  has  been  the  experience  of  the  European  Union  in  phasing  out 
phthalates in toys and childcare products? Has this been a significant logistical and 
manufacturing challenge for regulators and industry? 

Answer. I don’t know the answer to that question. I do know that when I visited 
Japan  in  November  2008  during  the  Christmas  shopping  season,  shelves  were  full 
of plastic toys that did not contain phthalates. 

Question  5.  Why  are  low-dose  effects  of  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals  like  BPA 

and phthalates more dangerous than those of other compounds? 

Answer. This question strike to the heart of a huge blind spot in the current sys-

tem of establishing health standards for exposures to chemicals. 

For  many  chemicals  . . .  perhaps  even  most,  although  scientists  haven’t  asked 
. . . it is safe to assume that ‘‘biological effects increase as the dose increases.’’ This 
assumption is at the core of how risks of exposure are assessed. The problem is that 
endocrinologists  . . .  scientists  and  physicians  who  study  hormones  . . .  know  that 
the effects of a hormone at one dose can be completely different, and indeed unpre-
dictable,  from  the  effects  at  another  dose.  High  doses  can  be  overtly  toxic.  Inter-
mediate  doses  will  turn  on  one  set  of  genes  but  not  another.  Low  doses  will  turn 
on  yet  another  set  of  genes.  The  responses  to  those  doses  will  be  very  different.  If 
the genes turned on by low doses cause deleterious effects, as they definitely do with 
bisphenol  A,  then  traditional  toxicology  testing  will  be  completely  blind  to  the  risk. 
I  am  including  here  an  essay  I  wrote  about  this  phenomenon  with  Dr.  Frederick 
vom  Saal.  It  was  published  in  the  December  issue  of  San  Francisco  Medicine,  the 
journal of the San Francisco Medical Society. 

http://www.sfms.org/AM/Template.cfm?Section=Home&TEMPLATE=/CM/HTM 

LDisplay.cfm&CONTENTID=2506&SECTION=ArticlelArchives. 

BRINGING ENVIRONMENTAL REGULATIONS UP TO DATE:  SHOULD PUBLIC HEALTH 
STANDARDS FOR ENDOCRINE-DISRUPTING COMPOUNDS BE BASED UPON 16TH 
CENTURY DOGMA OR MODERN ENDOCRINOLOGY? 

J.P. Myers[1] and F.S. vom Saal[2] 

Health standards established in the United States for exposure to toxic chemicals 
rest  upon  a  core  assumption:  high-dose  testing  procedures  used  in  regulatory  toxi-
cology  adequately  predict  potential  low-dose  effects.  Scientific  discoveries  over  the 
past  decade  have  profoundly  challenged  that  assumption  as  information  has  grown 
about the commonness of contaminants that behave like hormones. 

Endocrinologists long ago discovered that hormones have effects at low serum con-
centrations  that  can  differ  dramatically,  and  unpredictably,  from  those  caused  at 
high 
Indeed,  sometimes  they  can  be  diametrically  opposed.  This 
endocrinological reality stands in direct conflict with any assumption that high dose 
studies  predict  low  dose  impacts.  If  contaminants  with  hormonal  characteristics, 
known  as  endocrine  disruptors,  behave  similarly,  then  the  regulatory  tests  used  to 
establish safety standards may be blind to important impacts. 

A  growing  body  of  research  now  confirms  that  endocrine  disruptors,  like  hor-
mones,  can  also  contradict  the  expectations  of  traditional  regulatory  testing.  This 

levels.1

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00100 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

97 

creates the strong likelihood that some health standards currently used to set expo-
sure limits for the American public are too weak. 

To the non-endocrinologist, it seems logical that higher doses would lead to larger 
effects.  This  assumption  has  been  at  the  core  of  toxicology  for  centuries,  beginning 
with  Paracelsus’s  16th  century  observation  that  ‘‘All  things  are  poison  and  nothing 
is  without  poison,  only  the  dose  permits  something  not  to  be  poisonous.’’  His  quote 
has  been  paraphrased  to  ‘‘the  dose  makes  the  poison’’  and  is  generally  interpreted 
to mean that the higher the exposure, the greater the impact. 

For  many  contaminants,  toxins,  poisons  and  pharmaceuticals,  this  assumption 
has  helped  protect  public  health.  But  substantial  evidence  is  now  in  hand  showing 
that people are exposed to hundreds of chemicals, if not more, that can behave like 
hormones. 

Some  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals  are  produced  in  very  high  volumes.  The 
compounds of greatest concern include plastic monomers and plasticizers used wide-
ly  in  common  consumer  goods,  leading  to  virtual  ubiquitous  exposure  in  the  U.S. 
and  other  developed  countries.  For  example,  the  plastic  monomer,  bisphenol  A 
(BPA) was discovered to be an estrogen in the 1930s, but now it is used as the basic 
chemical  building  block  for  polycarbonate  plastic  and  an  epoxy  resin  used  to  line 
most food cans sold in U.S. supermarkets today. 

The chemical characteristics of polycarbonate and the epoxy resin guarantee that 
normal use will contaminate food and water that comes into contact with BPA-based 
materials,  especially 
if  heated.  Most  plastic  baby  bottles  are  made  with 
polycarbonate  and  baby  formula  cans  are  lined  with  the  resin.  This  will  result  in 
substantial, unavoidable exposures for infants fed warmed formula. 

Many  studies  have  now  shown  that  BPA  is  capable  of  causing  a  wide  range  of 
adverse  effects  in  laboratory  studies  at  serum  concentrations  beneath  the  median 
level  found  in  people  throughout  the  developed  world.2 The  adverse  effects  caused 
by fetal exposure and infant exposure to BPA in animal experiments include breast 
cancer,  prostate  cancer,  impaired  fertility,  cystic  ovaries,  uterine  fibroids,  hyper-
activity and obesity. The current EPA and FDA health standards for BPA, however, 
are based upon traditional toxicological testing conducted in the 1980s. Modernizing 
the BPA standard based on current science would require lowering acceptable expo-
sures  by  a  factor  of  at  least  5,000-fold  and  would  require  elimination  of  BPA  from 
many common products. 

Driven  by  a  need  to  be  cost-effective,  regulatory  toxicology  has  applied  the  ‘dose 
makes the poison’ concept in practice by testing first at high doses and then testing 
at  successively  lower  doses  until  no  response,  or  little  response,  is  seen.  Often  only 
3  or  4  doses  are  used  and  for  the  vast  majority  of  chemicals  these  rarely  if  ever 
are  low  enough  to  be  comparable  to  levels  experienced  by  the  general  public.  The 
assumption  is  that  this  high  dose  testing  protocol  predicts  the  types  of  effects  that 
might  take  place  at  much  lower  levels.  And  because  ‘the  dose  makes  the  poison,’ 
the  expectation  is  that  by  working  down  the  dose-response  curve,  from  a  level  that 
clearly  causes  an  effect  to  one  that  doesn’t,  this  process  can  identify  exposures  be-
neath which there will be no harm. 

Endocrinology, however, is replete with cases in which hormone action at low lev-
els  differs  dramatically  from  hormone  action  at  high  levels.  For  example,  admin-
istering  newborn  mice  a  high  dose  (1000  μg/kg/day)  of  the  estrogenic  drug 
diethylstilbestrol (DES) cause weight loss in adult mice. In contrast, a dose of 1 μg/ 
kg/day causes grotesque obesity in adulthood.3 

Another example with clinical implications comes from the well-known ‘tamoxifen 
flare.’ Tamoxifen is useful clinically because at high doses (administered daily at 20 
to 40 mg daily) it is an anti-estrogen, suppressing proliferation of breast cancer cells 
and producing tumor regression.4 Early during treatment, however, when tissue lev-
els are still rising, tamoxifen administration can cause several estrogenic effects in-
cluding a slight increase in tumor size. Research by Wade Welshons at the Univer-
sity  of  Missouri  has  explored  the  molecular  mechanisms  of  the  tamoxifen  flare  and 
finds that at serum concentrations 10,000 times beneath the level used to suppress 
breast  cancer  cell  proliferation,  tamoxifen  acts  as  an  estrogen,  actually  promoting 
proliferation.5 Ironically, his calculations show that if one were to use standard risk 
assessment  procedures  with  the  tamoxifen  dose-response  curve—identifying  the 
highest exposure with no discernable effect and then applying a series of safety fac-
tors  that  take  into  account  various  sources  of  uncertainty—the  concentration  with 
maximum  proliferative  effect  would  be  identified  as  a  safe  level  of  exposure. 
(Welshons, pers. comm.). 

In  the  tamoxifen  flare,  the  dose-response  curve  showed  inhibition  at  high  levels 
and  proliferation  at  low,  i.e.,  completely  opposite  effects.  This  is  a  special  case  of 
what  are  called  non-monotonic  dose-response  curves:  dose-response  relationships  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00101 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

98 

which  the  slope  of  the  line  plotting  response  as  a  function  of  dose  changes  its  sign 
(positive to negative or the reverse) somewhere over the range of doses used. 

Clinicians  who  treat  women  and  men  for  hormone-stimulated  diseases  (uterine 
fibroids,  prostate  cancer)  advise  their  patients  who  take  a  hormone  (Lupron)  that 
some  adverse  effects  occur  during  the  initial  phase  of  treatment.  This  is  due  to  the 
fact  that  as  the  amount  of  the  drug  increases  after  injection,  the  low  doses  of 
Lupron result in the ovaries producing estrogen or testes to producing testosterone, 
and  only  after  reaching  a  high  dose  is  the  drug’s  desired  effect,  inhibition  of  estro-
gen  or  testosterone  production,  achieved—opposite  effects  occur  at  low  and  high 
doses. This is not just true for hormonally active drugs, but is true for all hormones 
and hormone-mimicking chemicals used in products. 

As  research  has  progressed  in  the  toxicology  of  endocrine-disrupting  compounds, 
non-monotonic  curves  have  been  reported  regularly.6 One  of  the  earliest  examples 
involved  the  response  of  the  mouse  prostate  to  exposure  to  several  different  estro-
genic compounds during fetal development.7 These experiments examined the adult 
prostate weight following fetal exposure, separately, to estradiol or diethylstilbestrol 
(DES), and analogous non-monotonic findings now exist for BPA in human prostate 
cancer  cells.8 Each  experimental  series,  conducted  over  an  extremely  wide  range  of 
doses,  showed  that  the  highest  exposures  did  not  differ  from  the  controls,  but  that 
intermediate doses led to significant increases in prostate weight and also to sensi-
tivity  to  androgen  stimulation.  The  dose-response  curve  took  the  shape  of  an  in-
verted  ‘U’  (a  descriptor  now  used  in  the  literature  to  describe  this  type  of  non- 
monotonic  dose-response  curve).  If  the  dose  range  had  been  extended  even  higher, 
the response would have fallen significantly beneath the controls as exposure moved 
into  a  concentration  at  which  the  compounds  were  overtly  toxic.  This  was  dem-
onstrated  at  the  level  of  individual  genes  involved  in  regulating  prostate  growth.9 
Other  endocrine-disrupting  compounds  demonstrating  non-monotonic  patterns  in-
clude  the  phthalate  DEHP,  the  pesticides  DDE,  dieldrin,  endosulfan  and 
hexachlorobenzene,  and  arochlor  1242,  a  PCB  (reviewed  in  Myers  and  Hessler 
2007).  Some  of  the  reported  effects  include  strong  exacerbation  of  allergic  reactions 
following exposures well beneath current safety standards. 

Extensive  evidence  is  now  available  on  the  molecular  and  physiological  mecha-
nisms that are responsible for these findings. At very low doses hormones can stim-
ulate  the  receptors  in  cells  that  allow  the  hormone  to  cause  effects  in  the  cells 
(called  ‘‘receptor  up  regulation’’),  while  at  higher  doses,  receptor  ‘‘down  regulation’’ 
occurs  and  the  number  of  receptors  available  to  mediate  the  action  of  the  hormone 
is reduced (Medlock et al., 1991). Also, there are myriad hormonal feedback mecha-
nisms  between  the  brain,  pituitary  gland  and  hormone  producing  organs  (thyroid 
gland,  adrenal  glands,  ovaries,  testes)  that  contribute  to  the  presence  of  non- 
monotonic dose-response curves. 

The  chemical  risk  assessment  establishment  has  been  unresponsive  to  the  fact 
that one of their core assumptions has been invalidated. Hence, no standard for any 
contaminant  has  incorporated  these  well-established  findings  from  endocrinology. 
Instead,  standards  continue  to  be  based  upon  testing  procedures  that  assume  high 
dose testing can adequately predict low dose results. 

The American public depends upon regulatory agencies to set public health stand-
ards  that  will  avoid  harmful  exposures.  It  is  time  that  the  FDA  and  EPA  move  be-
yond 16th Century dogma and begin using 21st Century scientific knowledge to ac-
curately  determine  the  safety  of  the  chemicals  being  used  in  plastic,  toys,  food  con-
tainers,  pesticides,  cosmetics,  building  materials,  clothes—in  other  words,  countless 
products  and  materials  we  incorrectly  assume  are  safe.  Given  the  wide  range  of 
health  effects  now  shown  to  be  caused  in  animals  by  exposure  to  these  contami-
nants, modernizing the standards may reap large benefits for public health. 

[1]  Dr.  Myers  is  Chief  Scientist  for  Environmental  Health  Sciences,  609  E  High 

St., Charlottesville, VA 22903. 

[2]  Dr.  vom  Saal  is  Curators  Professor  in  the  Division  of  Biological  Sciences,  105 

Lefevre Hall, University of Missouri, Columbia, MO 65211. 
References 

1 Medlock, K.L., C.R. Lyttle, N. Kelepouris, E.D. Newman and D.M. Sheehan. 1991. Estradiol 
down-regulation  of  the  rat  uterine  estrogen  receptor.  Proc.  Soc.  Exp.  Biol.  Med.  196:293–300. 
2 Vandenberg,  L.N.,  R.  Hauser,  M.  Marcus,  N.  Olea  and  W.V.  Welshons.  2007.  Human  expo-

sure to bisphenol A (BPA). Reproductive Toxicology 24:139–177. 

3 Newbold, R.R., E. Padilla-Banks, R.J. Snyder and W.N. Jefferson. 2005. Developmental expo-

sure to estrogenic compounds and obesity. Birth Defects Research (Part A) 73:478–480. 

4 Hortobagyi, G.N. 2001. Endocrine treatment of breast cancer. pp 2039–2046 in Becker, K.L. 
(ed), Principles and practices of endocrinology and metabolism. 3rd edition. Lippincott Williams 
and Wilkins, Philadelphia. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00102 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

99 

5 Welshons, W.V., K.A. Thayer, B.M. Judy, J.A. Taylor, E.M. Curran and F.S. vom Saal. 2003. 
Large  effects  from  small  exposures.  I.  Mechanisms  for  endocrine  disrupting  chemicals  with  es-
trogenic activity. Environmental Health Perspectives 111:994–1006. 

6 Myers,  J.P.  and  W  Hessler.  Does  ‘dose  make  the  poison.’  (downloaded  from  http:// 
www.environmentalhealthnews.org/sciencebackground/2007/2007-0415nmdrc.html  15  Decem-
ber 2007). 

7 vom Saal F.S., B.G. Timms, M.M. Montano, P. Palanza, K.A. Thayer, S.C. Nagel, et al., 1997. 
Prostate enlargement in mice due to fetal exposure to low doses of estradiol or diethylstilbestrol 
and opposite effects at high doses. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 94:2056–2061. 

8 Wetherill  Y.B.,  C.E.  Petra,  K.R.  Monk,  A.  Puga  and  K.E.  Knudsen.  2002.  The  xenoestrogen 
bisphenol A induces inappropriate androgen receptor activation and mitogenesis in prostate ade-
nocarcinoma cells. Molec. Cancer Therapeut. 7:515–24. 

9 Richter,  C.A.,  J.A.  Taylor,  R.L.  Ruhlen,  W.V.  Welshons  and  F.S.  vom  Saal.  2007.  Estradiol 
and  bisphenol  A  stimulate  androgen  receptor  and  estrogen  receptor  gene  expression  in  fetal 
mouse prostate mesenchyme cells. Environmental Health Perspectives 115: 902–908. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK 

Question.  Is  there  any  evidence  that  humans  can  be  exposed  to  these  chemicals 

through the food, specifically seafood, which we eat? 

Answer. In October and November 2007, Environmental Working Group surveyed 
the  5  leading  makers  of  baby  formula  sold  in  the  U.S.  to  determine  whether  they 
use BPA in their packaging. We found: 

• The  makers  of  Nestle´,  Similac,  Enfamil  and  PBM  (who  make  store-brand  for-
mulas  sold  at  Wal-Mart,  Target,  Kroger  and  dozens  of  other  retailers)  all  said 
that they use BPA in the linings of metal cans holding liquid formula. 
• BPA  is  widely  used  in  powdered  formula  containers  as  well.  Every  manufac-
turer  except  Nestle´ said  it  uses  a  BPA-based  lining  on  the  metal  portions  of 
their  powdered  formula  cans.  Nestle´ failed  to  provide  EWG  with  reliable  docu-
mentation  of  their  alternative  packaging,  and  thus  is  not  a  clear  improvement 
over other types. 
• Powdered formulas are a better choice. Our calculations indicate that babies fed 
reconstituted powdered formula likely receive 8 to 20 times less BPA than those 
fed liquid formula from a metal can. 

Liquid  formula  is  of  greatest  concern,  and  its  use  could  lead  to  high  BPA  expo-
sures  for  babies.  Recent  studies  documenting  that  BPA  leaches  out  of  plastic  baby 
bottles  prompted  a  run  on  glass  bottles  by  concerned  parents.  But  testing  by  EWG 
and  by  the  Food  and  Drug  Administration  (FDA)  indicates  that  under  normal  use, 
liquid formula itself could expose an infant to substantially more BPA than a plastic 
bottle.  An  August  2007  investigation  by  EWG  estimated  that  at  BPA  levels  found 
in  ready-to-eat  liquid  formula,  1  of  every  16  infants  fed  the  formula  would  be  ex-
posed to the chemical at doses exceeding those that caused harm in laboratory stud-
ies.1 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK 

Question  1.  In  1998,  the  U.S.  PIRG  along  with  other  consumer  groups  petitioned 
CPSC  to  ban  polyvinyl  chloride  (PVC).  In  2003,  following  a  review  by  a  Chronic 
Hazard  Advisory  Panel,  CPSC  commissioners  voted  to  deny  the  petition.  However, 
after  the  ruling  some  manufacturers  have  moved  toward  voluntarily  removing 
phthalates  from  children’s  products.  What  recommendations  does  U.S.  PIRG  have 
for parents that are concerned about phthalates? 

Answer.  A  few  small,  easy  changes  in  the  products  that  consumers  buy  and  use 

can help reduce our children’s exposure to toxic chemicals. 
At the Store 
Choose safer toys and teethers 

Look  for  ‘‘PVC-free’’  on  the  labels  of  soft  plastic  toys  and  teethers.  Another  class 
of  chemicals  shown  to  disrupt  the  hormone  system—phthalates—is  found  in  poly-
vinyl chloride (PVC) plastic. PVC plastic is used to make different types of children’s 
products,  including  some  teethers  and  soft  plastic  toys.  Some  manufacturers  have 
removed  PVC  from  their  children’s  products,  especially  products  intended  to  be  put 

1 Environmental Working Group, EWG’s Guide to Infant Formula and Baby Bottles, December 

2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00103 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

100 

into children’s mouths. Unfortunately, no law requires or regulates these labels, and 
few products are labeled as such. When parents have a question about the chemicals 
in a product, they should call the manufacturer. 
Choose wooden toys 

There are countless manufacturers of high quality wooden toys in the market. Ev-
erything  from  baby  rattles  to  kitchen  play-sets  are  now  made  out  of  wood.  Some 
commonly  available  brands  include  Plan  Toys,  Haba,  Turner  Toys,  Selecta,  and 
Holztiger. 
Choose Safer Food Packaging and Serving Containers 

• Avoid  polycarbonate  plastic  in  food  containers.  Check  the  bottom/underside  of 
the product. If you see ‘‘PC’’ (usually in or near the recycling triangle) signifying 
polycarbonate  plastic,  do  not  purchase  it.  Often  a  number  ‘‘7’’  on  the  bottom  in 
the  recycling  triangle,  by  itself,  also  means  the  material  is  polycarbonate,  but 
not  always.  To  be  safe,  avoid  #7  plastic.  Choose  plastics  labeled  #1,  #2,  or  #5 
in the recycling triangle, but do not heat beverages or food in plastic containers 
of any kind. 

• Avoid  PVC  plastic  in  food  containers.  Check  the  bottom/underside  of  the  prod-
uct.  If  you  find  the  number  ‘‘3’’  in  the  recycling  triangle,  it  is  made  from  PVC 
plastic and should be avoided. Choose plastics labeled #1, #2, or #5 in the recy-
cling  triangle,  but  do  not  heat  beverages  or  food  in  plastic  containers  of  any 
kind. 

• Avoid canned foods: Unfortunately, bisphenol A can leach from metal can lining 
into  the  foods  and  liquids  contained  within.  Buy  baby  food  in  glass  containers, 
and avoid feeding your child food from cans as much as possible. You can often 
find  popular  children’s  foods,  such  as  tomato  sauce,  applesauce,  and  black 
beans, in glass jars. 

• Choose  safer  containers  for  sippy  cups  and  water  bottles.  Look  for  plastics  la-
beled  #1,  #2,  or  #5  in  the  recycling  triangle.  As  an  alternative  to  hard  plastic 
water  bottles  (such  as  the  polycarbonate  Nalgene  bottles),  try  a  lightweight 
stainless steel bottle instead. 

• Choose  glass  or  safer-plastic  baby  bottles.  Almost  all  plastic  baby  bottles  are 
made from polycarbonate plastic containing bisphenol A, but they are rarely la-
beled  as  such.  With  as  few  as  50–100  washings—even  before  you  see  wear— 
significant amounts of bisphenol A can leach into your baby’s milk. For the best 
protection,  switch  to  using  glass  bottles  for  all  or  most  of  baby’s  use.  Contrary 
to  claims  by  the  plastics  industry,  glass  bottles  are  extremely  durable  and  safe 
(and  wash  well  in  the  dishwasher).  And  after  all,  they  were  good  enough  for 
you  when  you  were  a  baby!  Evenflo  is  one  of  the  only  glass  bottle  makers 
around  (some  Babies  ‘‘R’’  Us  stores  carry  them  and  they  are  available  on-line). 
A  couple  of  manufacturers  make  their  baby  bottles  from  a  safer  polypropylene- 
based  plastic  (a  softer,  opaque  plastic),  which  has  not  been  associated  with  the 
developmental problems linked to bisphenol A. 

• Choose metal feeding utensils and enamel or ceramic plates. While many manu-
facturers have removed phthalates from products intended to be put into young 
children’s  mouths,  without  a  law  prohibiting  their  use,  there  is  no  guarantee 
that  these  products,  such  as  soft,  plastic-coated  feeding  spoons,  are  made  with-
out phthalates. Look for PVC-free labels or buy stainless steel, enamel, ceramic, 
or glass. (Note that enamel cannot be put in the microwave, and you should not 
use old pottery that could have lead-based glazes). 

• Avoid  foods  wrapped  in  plastic.  Almost  all  commercial  grade  plastic  cling  wrap 
contains PVC plasticized with phthalates, and other plastic food packaging may 
be  made  of  PVC,  as  well.  Avoid  buying  foods  wrapped  in  plastic,  especially 
cheeses  and  meats.  Buy  deli-sliced  cheeses  and  meats  and  have  them  wrapped 
in  paper.  If  you  can’t  avoid  buying  plastic-wrapped  foods,  cutoff  a  thin  layer  of 
the cheese or meat when you get home and store the remainder in glass or less- 
toxic plastic. 

At Home 

• Use  glass  to  heat  food  or  liquid  in  the  microwave.  You  should  not  heat  food  in 
plastic containers or on plastic dishware, or heat liquids in plastic baby bottles. 
Heating food and liquids in plastic containers can cause chemicals and additives 
in the plastics to leach out more readily—right into baby’s food and milk. While 
some  plastic  containers  are  marketed  as  ‘‘microwave  safe,’’  it  is  safest  to  avoid 
them for heating. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00104 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

101 

• If you do use plastic bottles, containers, or dishware, avoid harsh detergents or 
hot  water  when  washing  them  to  reduce  exposure.  Do  not  put  plastic  bottles, 
containers,  or  dishware  in  the  dishwasher.  Also,  throw  out  any  plastic  bottles, 
containers,  and  dishware  that  start  to  look  scratched  or  hazy.  Do  not  let  milk 
sit for long periods of time in plastic. 
• Avoid  letting  your  child  put  plastic  toys  in  his/her  mouth.  Toys  designed  for 
older  children  are  more  likely  to  contain  phthalates  or  bisphenol  A.  It  is  as-
sumed  that  young  children  will  not  mouth  these  toys—such  as  action  figures 
and Barbie dolls. To be safe, keep all plastic toys out of children’s mouths. Call 
the  manufacturer  if  you  want  to  know  if  a  product  contains  phthalates  or 
bisphenol A. 

Question  2.  Since  some  manufacturers  have  taken  steps  to  remove  phthalates 
from  certain  children’s  products,  has  U.S.  PIRG  seen  significant  evidence  that 
‘‘phthalate-free’’ toys are better for children than those containing phthalates? 

Answer.  Some  manufacturers  have  removed  PVC  from  their  children’s  products, 
especially products intended to be put into children’s mouths. Unfortunately, no law 
requires or regulates these labels, and few products are labeled as such. When par-
ents  have  a  question  about  the  chemicals  in  a  product,  they  should  call  the  manu-
facturer. 

The U.S. Government, however, does not regulate the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ label or en-
sure that products labeled ‘‘phthalate-free’’ actually do not contain phthalates. Since 
the  U.S.  Government  has  not  established  any  guidelines  for  what  the  label  means, 
or  established  any  standards  for  the  phthalate  content  in  children’s  products,  con-
sumers can only assume that it means phthalates are not present in the item. 

In  2005,  to  test  the  reliability  of  the  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  label,  U.S.  PIRG  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  Chicago,  Illinois  to  test  eight  soft  plastic  toys 
labeled  as  not  containing  phthalates.  Of  the  eight  toys  tested,  six  contained  detect-
able levels of phthalates.2 Based on these results, we asked the Federal Trade Com-
mission  (FTC)  to  investigate  whether  manufacturers’  use  of  the  ‘‘phthalate-free’’ 
label  constitutes  unfair  or  deceptive  marketing  practices  when  the  product  actually 
contains phthalates.3 

With  the  results  of  the  FTC  investigation  still  pending,  we  once  again  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  the  fall  of  2006  to  test  10  soft  plastic  toys  la-
beled as not containing phthalates.4 Of the 10 toys tested, just two contained detect-
able  levels  of  phthalates.  Some  of  the  items  that  tested  positive  for  phthalates  in 
the  first  year  did  not  in  the  second.  While  this  may  be  good  news  for  consumers, 
nothing in U.S. law has changed to hold manufacturers accountable to their ‘‘phthal-
ate-free’’  label  or  require  them  to  stop  using  phthalates.  Consumers  still  have  no 
guarantee that the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ products they purchase truly are phthalate-free, 
as evidenced by our test results. 

Question 3. Please explain the significance of low-dose exposures to BPA and how 

it relates to the traditionally held belief of ‘‘the dose makes the poison’’? 

Answer.  Hundreds  of  studies  that  explore  the  effects  of  low-dose  exposure  to 
bisphenol A, pesticides and similar toxins have led to a shift in the way that many 
scientists  and  activists  view  toxicity.  The  older  paradigm  focused  on  acute  toxicity, 
or  ‘‘the  dose  makes  the  poison.’’  This  theory  assumes  that  higher  doses  of  a  toxin 
will have a greater effect on the subject. The newer paradigm recognizes that expo-
sure  to  even  very  low  doses  of  endocrine  disruptors  can  alter  development  and  ini-
tiate  signaling  pathways,  rendering  the  levels  of  toxicity  that  have  been  considered 
‘‘acceptable’’  inaccurate.  So,  while  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  in  one  given  instance 
might be low, there is reason to believe it can still be very dangerous, and that the 
near constant rate of low-dose exposure is cause for alarm. 

Some  animal  studies  show  adverse  health  affects  from  exposure  of  only  0.025 
micrograms per kilogram of body weight, yet a polycarbonate baby bottle with room 
temperature  water  can  leach  2  micrograms  of  BPA  per  liter.  A  3-month-old  baby 
drinking from a polycarbonate bottle may be exposed to as much as 11 micrograms 
per kilogram of body weight daily. The current U.S. Environmental Protection Agen-
cy  daily  upper  limit  for  BPA,  50  micrograms  per  kilogram  of  body  weight,  is  based 
on industry-sponsored experiments conducted in the 1980s. 

2 U.S. PIRG Education Fund, Trouble in Toyland: The 20th Annual Survey of Toy Safety, No-

3 Letter  to  The  Honorable  Deborah  Platt  Majoras,  Chairman,  FTC,  November  21,  2005.  On 

vember 2005. 

file with the author. Our petition was later denied. 

4 Eight  of  the  toys  were  labeled  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  packaging.  One  item  was  labeled 
‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  manufacturer’s  website.  For  the  last  item,  the  manufacturer’s  website 
claimed not to use phthalates in any of its children’s products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00105 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

102 

BPA raises particularly troubling health questions because it can affect the endo-
crine system, mimicking the effects of estrogen in the body. Experiments in animals 
and with human cells strongly suggest exposures typical in the U.S. population may 
increase  susceptibility  to  breast  and  prostate  cancer,  reproductive  system  abnor-
malities,  and,  for  exposure  in  the  womb  and  early  childhood,  a  host  of  develop-
mental  problems.  Concerns  about  early  life  exposures  also  extend  to  early  onset  of 
puberty in females, potential prostate problems in males, and obesity. 

Question 4. How is the average person exposed to phthalates? 
Answer.  Phthalates  are  used  to  build  cars,  homes  and  offices.  They  are  used  in 
cosmetics,  toys  and  medical  devices,  and  they  are  used  to  package  food.5 Because 
of  their  widespread  use,  Americans  are  constantly  exposed  to  these  chemicals. 
Phthalates  leach  out  of  the  plastics  that  contain  them  making  the  chemicals  avail-
able  for  inhalation,  ingestion  and  absorption.6 Because  of  this,  we  are  exposed  to 
phthalates  when  we  touch  the  products  that  contain  them.  We  are  also  exposed  to 
phthalates because they come out of their original sources and into the air that we 
breathe.7 

Question 5. What is the best way to reduce exposure to phthalates? 
Answer.  The  best  way  to  reduce  exposure  to  phthalates  is  to  phaseout  their  use. 
Both  Federal  and  state  governments  should  act  to  regulate  these  chemicals,  espe-
cially  in  children’s  products.  Congress  should  require  that  chemical  manufacturers 
demonstrate  the  safety  of  their  products  before  putting  them  on  the  market.  The 
Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  should  protect  consumers  from  these  haz-
ardous products. First, the Commission should take a precautionary approach to the 
chemicals  in  products.  Second,  the  Commission  should  require  products  to  be  la-
beled appropriately. 

Question 6. Please explain the significance of phthalate mixtures. 
Answer.  When  used  in  combination  with  other  phthalates,  there  is  an  additive 
dose-response relationship. A study by scientists at the EPA and the North Carolina 
State  University  showed  that  phthalates  with  similar  action  mechanisms  have  a 
dose  additive  effect  on  fetal  testosterone  when  administered  in  combination.8 An-
other study by scientists at the University of Surrey in the United Kingdom showed 
that a mixture of phthalates caused a seemingly additive effect of serum cholesterol 
in rats.9 

Question 7. What are endocrine disruptors and how do they affect us? 
Answer.  Endocrine  disruptors  are  chemicals  that  mimic  or  block  hormones  or 
interfere  with  hormone  production.10 Hormones  transfer  signals  between  cells  over 
long  distances  using  the  bloodstream.  Once  a  hormone  reaches  a  cell,  it  fits  into  a 
receptor  and  initiates  a  cell  response  using  the  signal  transduction  pathway.  If  a 
different  molecule  is  substituted  for  the  hormone  in  the  receptor,  then  the  cell  will 
receive  alternate  instructions.11 Hormone  blockers  prevent  hormones  from  deliv-
ering  signals  from  one  cell  to  another.  Hormone  replacers  replace  hormones  and 
send  either  excessive  or  insufficient  signals  to  cells.  The  change  in  the  signals  re-
ceived  by  cells  alters  the  cells  response  and  thus  how  the  body  functions.  Because 
of  these  actions,  endocrine  disruptors  impede  normal  functions  and  cause  damage 
to the body. Endocrine disruptors have been linked with abnormalities in the repro-

5 Phthalate  Esters  Panel  of  the  American  Chemistry  Council.  Essential2Know  About 

Phthalates downloaded on June 19, 2008 at www.phthalates.org. 

6 J.  H.  Kin  et  al.,  ‘‘DEHP  migration  behavior  from  excessively  plasticized  PVC  sheets,’’  Bul-

letin of the Korean Chemical Society, 2003 Volume 24(3) 345–349. 

7 Ruthann  A.  Rudel,  David  E.  Camann,  John  D.  Spengler,  Leo  R.  Korn  and  Julia  G.  Brody, 
Silent  Spring  Institute  and  Harvard  School  of  Public  Health,  ‘‘Phthalates,  Alkylphenols,  Pes-
ticides, Polybrominated Diphenyl Ethers and Other Endocrine Disrupting Compounds in Indoor 
Air and Dust,’’ Environmental Science and Technology 37:4543–4553, 15 October 2003 

8 Howdeshell,  Kembra  L.,  Vickie  S.  Wilson,  Johnathan  Furr,  Christy  R.  Lambright,  Cynthia 
V.  Rider,  Chad  R.  Blystone,  Andrew  K.  Hotchkiss  and  Leon  Earl  Gray,  Jr.  ‘‘A  mixture  of  five 
phthalate  esters  inhibits  fetal  testicular  testosterone  production  in  the  Sprague  Dawley  rat  in 
a  cumulative,  dose  additive  manner.’’  Toxicological  Sciences.  Accessed  June  19,  2008  at  http:// 
toxsci.oxfordjournals.org/cgi/content/abstract/kfn077. 

9 Howarth,  J.  A.,  Price  S.  C.,  Dobrota  M.,  Kentish  P.  A.,  Hinton  R.  H.  ‘‘Effects  on  male  rats 
of  di-(2-ethylhexyl)  phthalate  and  di-n-hexylphthalate  administered  alone  or  in  combination.’’ 
Toxicology Letters. 121:1:35–43 8 April 2001 

10 The  Natural  Institute  of  Environmental  Health  Sciences. 

‘‘Endocrine  disruptors’’ 
Downloaded  on  June  19,  2008  at  http://www.niehs.nih.gov/health/topics/agents/endocrine/ 
docs/endocrine-disruptors.pdf. 

11 Sadava, David, H. Craig Heller, Gordon H. Orians, William K. Purves, David M. Hillis Life: 

The Science of Biology 8th edition Sinauer Associates, Inc. 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00106 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

103 

ductive, immune, nervous and endocrine systems.12 Endocrine disruptors can cause 
decreased  sperm  count  and  testicular  cancer.  They  can  also  interfere  with  proper 
immune  function  causing  immunotoxicity.  They  can  effect  the  nervous  system  by 
limiting  thyroid  function  and  thus  brain  development.  They  can  also  cause  endo-
metriosis, which leads to infertility in women. 

Question 8. Is there an established list of known endocrine disruptors? 
Answer. In 2007 the Environmental Protection Agency (EPA) compiled a draft list 
of  endocrine  disruptors  that  was  selected  on  the  basis  of  exposure  potential.  The 
EPA is now investigating these chemicals and is planning to issue a final list.13 Al-
though there is no governmental list of known endocrine disruptors, scientists have 
identified  many  chemicals  as  such.  Paul  Geottlich  has  a  list  of  known  endocrine 
disruptors published in Fundamentals of Naturopathic Endocrinology.14 

Question  9.  Are  there  already  alternatives  to  BPA  and  phthalates?  Are  these  al-
ternatives  safer  than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists 
into these alternatives? 

Answer.  Several  products  that  are  made  with  phthalates  or  BPA  could  easily  be 
made with alternatives. Phthalates can be replaced with either polymeric or adipate 
plasticizers.15 A  study  at  Cochin  University  of  Science  and  Technology  showed  the 
use of polymeric plasticizers reduces the leaching of chemicals from PVC.16 A study 
performed  by  the  Institute  of  Food  Safety  and  Nutrition  in  conjunction  with  the 
Danish  Veterinary  and  Food  Administration  found  that  adipate  plasticizers  did  not 
induce  the  antiandrogenic  effects  that  phthalates  induce.17 Another  alternative  to 
using  phthalates  is  to  switch  from  PVC  to  other  plastics  such  as  thermoplastic 
elastomers,  ethylene  vinyl  acetate  and  polyolefins.18 The  alternatives  are  also  safer 
than PVC. The alternatives to PVC plastic are only 2 percent plasticizers, while the 
phthalate content in PVC is up to 50 percent. Furthermore the alternatives are less 
likely  to  leach  plasticizers  when  compared  to  PVC.19 Both  alternatives  pose  little 
safety  concern  and  offer  flexibility  in  the  production  process.  Products  made  with 
polycarbonate plastic containing BPA could instead be made with polyamide, a plas-
tic  that  does  not  require  BPA  for  production.20 The  alternatives  to  BPA  have  not 
been  as  heavily  tested  as  the  alternatives  to  phthalates.  Polyamide  plastic  is  not 
known  to  contain  harmful  plasticizers,  and  so  the  effects  of  polyamide  on  human 
health is believed to be negligible.21 

Question  10.  Do  infants  and  children  have  the  same  immune  and  endocrine  sys-

tem as adults? Do studies take into account these differences? 

Answer.  People  are  born  with  all  of  the  necessary  organs  in  the  immune  and  en-
docrine system; however these organs are not developed. They will grow and develop 
during infancy and childhood. Because infants and children have immune and endo-
crine systems that are developing, they are more susceptible to interaction with and 
damage from dangerous chemicals. Several studies are designed to account for this, 
as  well  as  for  the  developmental  effects  of  phthalates  and  BPA  on  the  human  sys-
tems. A study conducted at the Mitsubishi Chemical Safety Institute exposed female 
rats  to  phthalates  during  gestation.22 The  study  found  that  exposure  to  phthalates 
during  development  caused  inhibition  in  weight  gain  of  offspring  as  well  as  abnor-

12 World  Health  Organization.  ‘‘Global  Assessment  of  the  state-of-the-science  of  endocrine 

disruptors’’ WH/PCS/EDC/02.2 (2002) 

16 Sunny, M.C., P. Ramesh and K.E. George. ‘‘Use of polymeric Plasticizers in Polyvinyl Chlo-
ride  to  Reduce  Conventional  Plasticizer  Migration  for  Critical  Applications’’  Journal  of 
Elastomers and Plastics 36:1:19–31 (2004). 

17 Dalgaard M. et al. ‘‘Di(2-ethylhexyl) adipate (DEHA) induced developmental toxicity but not 
antiandrogenic  effects  in  pre-  and  post-natally  exposed  Wistar  rats’’  Reproductive  Toxicology. 
March–April 2003 17(2):163–170. 

18 Tickner,  Joel.  ‘‘Review  of  the  Availability  of  Plastic  Substitutes  for  Soft  PVC  in  Toys’’  De-

partment of Work Environment. University of Massachusetts at Lowell, USA. 

19 Tickner, Joel. ‘‘Review of the Availability of Plastic Substitutes for Soft PVC. 
20 McNichols,  Jeremiah  ‘‘Sippy  Cup  Showdown:  Safer  BPA-Free  Drinkware  for  Toddlers’’ 
accessed  July  19,  2008  at  http://zrecs.blogspot.com/2007/05/sippy-cup-showdown-safer-bpa- 
free-sippy.html. 

21 Labour  Environmental  Alliance  Society  ‘‘Frequently  Asked  Questions’’  accessed  Jun.  23, 

2008 at www.leas.ca/Frequently-Asked-Questions.htm. 

22 Hoshino  N.  et  al.,  ‘‘A  two-generation  reproductive  toxicity  study  of  dicyclohexyl  phthalate 

in rats.’’ Journal of Toxicological Science. Dec. 2005 30 Spec No. 79–96. 

13 www.epa.gov/endo. 
14 Michael,  Dr.  Friedman.  (ed.)  Fundamentals  of  Naturopathic  Endocrinology.  CCNM  Press 

15 Svoboda, Ronald D. ‘‘Polymeric Plasticizers for Higher Performance Flexible PVC’’ The C.P. 

(2005) 

Hall Company. Chicago, IL. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00107 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

mal  reproductive  development  among  male  and  female  rats  in  the  first  and  second 
generations. 

104 

Question  11.  Have  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  these  chemicals?  Is  it  even 

possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer.  Epidemiologic  studies  are  often  conducted  in  place  of  clinical  trials,  be-
cause  they  do  not  present  the  same  ethical  issues.  Several  epidemiologic  studies 
have been conducted regarding phthalates, BPA and their effects on humans. Three 
studies,  one  at  Fudan  University’s  School  of  Public  Health  in  Shanghai  and  two  at 
the  Harvard  School  of  Public  Health,  showed  an  association  between  phthalate  ex-
posure and reduced semen quality in adult males.23 

Question  12.  Usually  chemicals  are  tested  one  at  a  time.  However,  we  come  into 
contact  with  numerous  chemicals  every  day.  Do  these  studies  simulate  real  world 
exposures and what is the best way to test chemicals? 

Answer.  Chemicals  are  tested  individually  or  in  carefully  controlled  groups  be-
cause  it  eliminates  possible  sources  of  error  and  confounding  in  the  study.  When 
only  a  single  chemical  is  administered,  the  effect  on  the  subject  can  be  linked 
strongly  to  the  chemical.  Furthermore  if  two  chemicals  are  administered  together, 
then the possibility of interaction between these chemicals must be considered, mul-
tiplying the possibilities of what causes the result. 

Studies that test chemicals individually simulate individual pathways of exposure 
focusing on the elements of exposure that are most easily reduced. The studies have 
focused  on  the  presence  of  phthalates  and  BPA  in  children’s  products  for  several 
reasons.  First,  phthalates  and  BPA  pose  special  hazards  to  infants  and  children. 
Second, the elimination of phthalates and BPA in toys is more easily achieved, since 
toys  and  childcare  products  do  not  exist  as  long  in  the  market  as  cars  and  carpets. 
Third, the exposure of children to phthalates and BPA in childcare products can be 
more easily controlled in an experimental setting. 

Question  13.  What  about  workers  who  are  in  the  plants  that  manufacture 
phthalates and BPA. Are protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unneces-
sarily exposed? 

Answer.  In  addition  to  basic  safety  measures  taken  when  chemicals  are  used  in 
production, the Occupational Safety and Health Administration has established lim-
its  on  the  amount  of  certain  phthalates  and  BPA  to  which  workers  may  be  ex-
posed.24 In  air,  concentrations  can  not  exceed  0.5  mg/m3 for  DEHP,  5  mg/m3 for 
DEP. Bisphenol-A should not exceed 860 mg/m3 in air concentration. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

ELIZABETH HITCHCOCK 

Question  1.  Why  are  there  such  dramatically  different  results  on  the  low-dose  ef-
fects of BPA between the results of studies sponsored by the chemical industry and 
studies conducted by academics or government entities? 

Answer.  A  recently-published  review  of  scientific  studies  shows  that,  in  the  last 
7  years  (through  November  2005),  151  studies  on  the  low-dose  effects  of  BPA  have 
been  published.25 None  of  the  12  studies  funded  by  the  chemical  industry  reported 
adverse  effects  at  low  levels,  whereas  128  of  139  government-funded  studies  found 
effects. These many studies were conducted in academic laboratories in the U.S. and 
abroad. 

Even the 12 industry-funded studies have flaws, however. Of the industry studies, 
two had its positive control fail—an indication that the entire experiment had failed, 
not  that  BPA  had  not  caused  an  effect.  Another  industry  study  concluded  BPA 
caused no effect, but an independent analysis of the experiment’s data by scientists 
convened  by  the  National  Toxicology  Program  of  the  U.S.  Department  of  Health  & 
Human  Services  concluded  that  in  fact  there  was  an  effect.  Industry  scientists  had 
misreported their own results. 

23 Zhang  Y.H.  et  al.,  ‘‘Phthalates  exposure  and  semen  quality  in  Shanghai:  a  cross-sectional 
study’’ Biomedical Environmental Science June 2006 19(3):205–209; Duty S.M. et al., ‘‘Phthalate 
Exposure  and  human  semen  parameters’’  Epidemiology.  May  2003  14(3):269–277;  Hauser  R.  et 
al.,  ‘‘Altered  semen  quality  in  relation  to  urinary  concentration  of  phthalate  monoester  and 
oxidative metabolites’’ Epidemiology Nov. 2006 17(6):682–691. 

24 The Occupational Safety and Hazard Administration Regulations (Standards—29C FR) Air 

Contaminants 1915.1000. 

25 vom  Saal,  F.  and  C.  Hughes,  An  Extensive  New  Literature  Concerning  Low-Dose  Effects 
of Bisphenol A Shows the Need for a New Risk Assessment. Environmental Health Perspectives 
113:926–933 (2005). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00108 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

105 

The  chemical  industry  relies  on  an  incomplete  review  of  scientific  studies  by  an 
effort funded by the American Plastics Council at the Harvard Center for Risk Anal-
ysis. The panel funded by the American Plastics Council only considered 19 studies 
in  concluding  in  2004  that  the  weight  of  the  evidence  for  low-dose  effects  of  BPA 
was  weak.26 As  of  November  2005,  there  were  151  published  studies  on  the  low- 
dose effects of BPA. 

Question  2.  In  light  of  dozens  of  advanced  studies  over  the  past  several  years,  in 
conjunction  with  the  recent  assessment  from  the  National  Toxicology  Program,  do 
you  believe  that  the  Federal  Government  should  control  exposure  to  BPA  and 
phthalates? 

Answer.  The  Federal  Government  has  an  obligation  to  protect  consumers  from 
dangerous  products.  The  CPSC  should  first  label  products  containing  Bisphenol  A 
and  phthalates  with  the  names  of  the  chemicals  they  contain  to  allow  parents  to 
choose  less  toxic  products.  Second,  the  CPSC  should  take  the  precautionary  ap-
proach  and  require  manufacturers  to  remove  chemicals  that  may  pose  a  particular 
threat  to  fetuses,  infants  and  children,  particularly  when  the  chemical  is  not  nec-
essary  for  the  product  to  function  according  to  design.  In  addition,  CPSC  and  the 
Federal  Trade  Commission  should  look  into  manufacturers’  use  of  the  ‘‘phthalate- 
free’’  label  and  take  action  against  manufacturers  that  may  be  misleading  con-
sumers. 

Congress has the opportunity to take action on these two chemicals now. The final 
version  of  CPSC  reform  legislation  now  in  conference  should  include  the  Feinstein 
amendment  banning  phthalates  in  children’s  products  (incorporated  as  Section  40 
of H.R. 4040 as passed by the Senate). The amendment will: 

• Prohibit  the  use  of  phthalates  (any  combination  of  certain  listed  chemicals  in 
concentrations exceeding 0.1 percent) in any children’s product or child care ar-
ticle. 

• Require manufacturers to use the least toxic alternative to phthalates. 
• Prohibit the use of certain harmful alternatives—including substances known to 
be,  likely  to  be,  or  suggestive  of  being  carcinogens;  and  reproductive  toxicants 
identified  as  causing  either  birth  defects,  reproductive  harm,  or  developmental 
harm. 

• The amendment also includes an important ‘‘savings clause’’ that would prevent 
Federal preemption of stronger state laws regulating phthalates in toys or other 
product categories. 

In  addition,  U.S.  PIRG  supports  legislation  introduced  by  Senator  Schumer  (NY) 
and Rep. Markey (MA) that would ban bisphenol A in children’s products or in food 
containers. 

Question 3. Can consumers trust products that are currently labeled as ‘‘BPA-free’’ 

or ‘‘phthalate-free’’? 

Answer.  Some  manufacturers  label  their  baby  products  and  toys  as  ‘‘phthalate- 
free,’’  which  should  provide  parents  the  information  they  need  to  make  educated 
purchasing decisions. The U.S. Government, however, does not regulate the ‘‘phthal-
ate-free’’  label  or  ensure  that  products  labeled  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  actually  do  not  con-
tain  phthalates.  Since  the  U.S.  Government  has  not  established  any  guidelines  for 
what  the  label  means,  or  established  any  standards  for  the  phthalate  content  in 
children’s  products,  consumers  can  only  assume  that  it  means  phthalates  are  not 
present in the item. 

In  2005,  to  test  the  reliability  of  the  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  label,  U.S.  PIRG  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  Chicago,  Illinois  to  test  eight  soft  plastic  toys 
labeled  as  not  containing  phthalates.  Of  the  eight  toys  tested,  six  contained  detect-

26 vom  Saal,  F.  and  C.  Hughes,  An  Extensive  New  Literature  Concerning  Low-Dose  Effects 
of Bisphenol A Shows the Need for a New Risk Assessment. Environmental Health Perspectives 
113:926–933 (2005) (‘‘The charge to the HCRA panel, which was to perform a weight-of-the evi-
dence evaluation of available data on the developmental and reproductive effects of exposure to 
BPA  in  laboratory  animals,  led  to  an  analysis  of  only  19  of  47  available  published  studies  on 
low-dose  effects  of  BPA.  The  deliberations  of  the  HCRA  were  in  2001–2002,  and  accordingly,  a 
cut-off  date  of  April  2002  was  selected  for  consideration  of  the  published  literature.  It  is  regret-
table that the relevance of the analysis was further undermined by a delay of 2.5 years in publi-
cation  of  the  report.  During  the  intervening  time,  between  April  2002  and  the  end  of  2004,  a 
large  number  of  additional  articles  reporting  low-dose  effects  of  BPA  in  experimental  animals 
have been published. The result is that by the end of 2004, a PubMed (National Library of Medi-
cine,  Bethesda,  MD)  search  identified  115  published  studies  concerning  effects  of  low  doses  of 
BPA in experimental animals.’’). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00109 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

106 

able  levels  of  phthalates.27 Based  on  these  results,  we  asked  the  Federal  Trade 
Commission (FTC) to investigate whether manufacturers’ use of the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ 
label  constitutes  unfair  or  deceptive  marketing  practices  when  the  product  actually 
contains phthalates.28 

With  the  results  of  the  FTC  investigation  still  pending,  we  once  again  commis-
sioned  STAT  Analysis  Corporation  in  the  fall  of  2006  to  test  10  soft  plastic  toys  la-
beled  as  not  containing  phthalates.29 Of  the  10  toys  tested,  just  two  contained  de-
tectable  levels  of  phthalates.  Some  of  the  items  that  tested  positive  for  phthalates 
in the first year did not in the second. While this may be good news for consumers, 
nothing in U.S. law has changed to hold manufacturers accountable to their ‘‘phthal-
ate-free’’  label  or  require  them  to  stop  using  phthalates.  Consumers  still  have  no 
guarantee that the ‘‘phthalate-free’’ products they purchase truly are phthalate-free, 
as evidenced by our test results. 

Question  4.  Why  are  low-dose  effects  of  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals  like  BPA 

and phthalates more dangerous than those of other compounds? 
Answer. See answer above to Senator Pryor’s similar question. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARK PRYOR TO 

STEVEN G. HENTGES, PH.D. 

Question  1.  The  ‘‘low-dose  hypothesis’’  claims  that  exposure  to  extremely  low  lev-
els  of  certain  substances  could  cause  adverse  health  effects  in  humans.  Some  have 
criticized existing studies and reviews for looking at only high dosage exposure. How 
would  you  respond  to  those  that  claim  either  lack  of  evidence  supporting  the  use 
of these chemicals or that low dose evidence demonstrates a concerned risk? 

Answer. Many hundreds of studies on bisphenol A have been conducted in the last 
10  years  and  a  substantial  percentage  of  these  studies  were  aimed  at  addressing 
the  question  whether  bisphenol  A  could  cause  adverse  health  effects  at  very  low 
doses. These studies are not all equivalent, and in general, they vary vastly in size, 
scope,  quality  and  relevance  to  human  health.  The  most  comprehensive  studies 
cover multiple generations of laboratory animals, are large in scale and statistically 
powerful,  include  a  wide  range  of  doses  from  very  low  to  very  high,  and  dose  ani-
mals  by  the  most  relevant  oral  route  of  exposure.  Other  studies  are  small  in  size 
and  scope,  may  be  poorly  conducted  or  reported,  and  dose  animals  by  routes  that 
are of little or no relevance to humans (e.g., subcutaneous injection, direct injection 
into the brain). A further complication is that the results of these many studies are 
not consistent and often are conflicting. 

When  faced  with  a  large  and  diverse  body  of  data,  as  is  the  case  for  bisphenol 
A, scientists systematically evaluate the weight of scientific evidence to draw conclu-
sions  based  on  all  of  the  available  evidence.  In  recent  years,  numerous  weight  of 
evidence  evaluations  of  bisphenol  A  have  been  conducted  by  independent  scientific 
and  government  bodies  worldwide.  These  evaluations  consistently  support  the  con-
clusion  that  bisphenol  A  is  not  a  significant  risk  to  human  health,  in  particular  at 
the very low levels to which people could be exposed through use of consumer prod-
ucts. 

In addition to evaluating each available study on its own merits, a weight of evi-
dence evaluation also assesses whether the findings of studies have been replicated 
or corroborated in independent laboratories, whether they are consistent within and 
across  studies,  and  whether  they  are  coherent  when  considered  together.  Repeat-
ability  is  a  fundamental  principle  of  the  scientific  process;  findings  that  cannot  be 
replicated in robust studies cannot be accepted as valid. 

Since  much  of  the  recent  research  on  bisphenol  A  is  aimed  specifically  at  assess-
ing  the  potential  for  bisphenol  A  to  cause  health  effects  at  low  doses,  the  many  re-
cent  weight  of  evidence  evaluations  are  focused  almost  entirely  on  this  question. 
None  of  these  evaluations  are  focused  only  at  high  dose  exposures.  The  conclusions 
of these evaluations are based on the full weight of scientific evidence, including all 
relevant  studies  that  report  effects  at  low  doses  and  studies  that  do  not  report  low 
dose effects. 

27 U.S. PIRG Education Fund, Trouble in Toyland: The 20th Annual Survey of Toy Safety, No-

28 Letter  to  The  Honorable  Deborah  Platt  Majoras,  Chairman,  FTC,  November  21,  2005.  On 

vember 2005. 

file with the author. Our petition was later denied. 

29 Eight  of  the  toys  were  labeled  ‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  packaging.  One  item  was  labeled 
‘‘phthalate-free’’  on  the  manufacturer’s  website.  For  the  last  item,  the  manufacturer’s  website 
claimed not to use phthalates in any of its children’s products. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00110 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

107 

Question 2. There seems to be a marked difference between studies funded by the 
chemical  industry,  those  funded  by  governments,  and  those  conducted  by  academic 
institutions. How have these studies differed to produce such opposite results? 

Answer.  We  understand  this  question  to  be  directed  to  the  body  of  scientific  lit-
erature on bisphenol A and not generally with respect to the entire chemical indus-
try, so we answer it here. 

Scientific studies can only answer questions they are designed to answer. Studies 
sponsored by industry are typically, but not always, aimed at answering the critical 
question  of  whether  a  product  is  safe  for  use.  These  studies  are  generally  designed 
to meet the requirements of internationally accepted test guidelines that were devel-
oped for this purpose. The studies are typically large in scale to be sure the studies 
have  adequate  statistical  power  and  examine  appropriate  endpoints  to  address  the 
question  that  the  study  is  intended  to  answer.  The  studies  are  also  typically  con-
ducted in highly qualified test laboratories under Good Laboratory Practices, which 
provides further assurance of the integrity of the study results. 

Other studies, which can also include industry sponsored studies, are often aimed 
at  other  scientific  questions  that  may  or  may  not  be  directly  relevant  to  assessing 
human  health  concerns.  These  studies  may  be  limited  in  scope  and  examine 
endpoints  that  are  difficult  to  interpret  with  respect  to  the  safety  of  the  substance 
being tested. Some studies, although scientifically well conducted, may have limited 
or no relevance for assessing human health concerns. 

For  bisphenol  A,  a  very  wide  diversity  of  studies  have  been  conducted  and  it  is 
a  gross  oversimplification  to  say  that  studies  sponsored  by  the  chemical  industry 
have  opposite  results  to  studies  conducted  by  academic  institutions.  Very  often, 
studies cannot be directly compared because they are so different. 

As  described  in  the  answer  to  the  question  above,  all  relevant  studies  on 
bisphenol A have been systematically assessed in numerous weight of evidence eval-
uations.  When  all  of  the  relevant  data  from  these  many  studies  are  compared,  in 
particular to determine whether the findings are repeatable or corroborated in inde-
pendent  laboratories,  the  most  consistent  result  is  that  no  effects  from  exposure  to 
low doses of bisphenol A are reliably found. This conclusion is true even if the anal-
ysis is limited to non-industry studies. In that regard, studies sponsored by industry 
are  consistent  with  the  broader  database  and  validate  the  overall  conclusion  that 
low  doses  of  bisphenol  A  have  not  been  reliably  shown  to  cause  adverse  health  ef-
fects. 

Question  3.  Please  explain  the  significance  of  low-dose  exposures  to  bisphenol  A 
and  how  it  relates  to  the  traditionally  held  belief  of  ‘‘the  dose  makes  the  poison’’? 
Answer.  The  so-called  ‘‘low-dose  hypothesis’’  asserts  that  very  low  doses  of  endo-
crine-active  substances  may  cause  adverse  health  effects  at  very  low  doses.  In  par-
ticular,  such  low-dose  health  effects  are  postulated  to  occur  with  a  non-monotonic 
dose-response, which means that health effects observed at very low doses would not 
be  observed  at  higher  doses.  This  hypothesis  has  not  been  scientifically  proven  and 
there is at best limited evidence that it could be valid. 

A  fundamental  principle  of  toxicology  is  commonly  expressed  as  ‘‘the  dose  makes 
the poison,’’ which means that health effects observed at a particular dose will uni-
formly  increase  in  intensity  or  severity  as  the  dose  is  increased.  Conversely,  as  the 
dose  is  decreased,  a  dose  causing  no  effect  can  be  found  (a  no-effect  level)  and  any 
lower dose will also cause no effect. This is referred to as a monotonic dose-response 
(sometimes called a linear dose-response). 

Toxicology  studies  are  often  designed  to  identify  a  dose  at  which  no  adverse  ef-
fects  occur,  which  is  referred  to  as  a  No-Observed-Adverse-Effect-Level  (NOAEL). 
Doses  below  the  NOAEL  may  not  be  tested  experimentally  since  no  adverse  effects 
are  expected.  If  the  low-dose  hypothesis  is  valid,  health  effects  below  the  NOAEL 
might occur but not be found. 

In  response  to  the  low-dose  hypothesis,  there  are  now  a  large  number  of  studies 
on  bisphenol  A  that  examined  low  doses  well  below  the  accepted  NOAEL.  Most  of 
these  studies  did  not  examine  a  sufficient  number  or  range  of  doses  to  determine 
whether any dose-response is monotonic or non-monotonic and are thus not capable 
of validating the low-dose hypothesis. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  the  accepted  NOAEL  for  bisphenol  A  is  based  on  the 
most comprehensive studies, which were conducted over multiple generations of lab-
oratory  animals  and  included  a  wide  range  of  doses  from  very  low  doses  up  to  a 
very  high  dose  above  the  NOAEL  that  induces  toxicity.  These  studies  do  not  vali-
date  claims  that  bisphenol  A  causes  adverse  effects  at  low  doses,  regardless  of  the 
dose-response, and only monotonic dose-responses were observed. These studies pro-
vide the most powerful evidence that the low-dose hypothesis, at least for bisphenol 
A, is not valid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00111 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

108 

Beyond  bisphenol  A,  the  biological  plausibility  of  the  low-dose  hypothesis  is  not 
supported  by  research  on  other  endocrine-active  substances.  For  example,  two  very 
robust  and  comprehensive  studies  have  recently  been  published  on  estradiol  and 
ethinylestradiol,  the  first  being  the  prototypical  naturally  occurring  estrogen  and 
the second being the estrogenic substance commonly used in birth control pills. Both 
studies  covered  a  wide  dose  range  and  neither  study  found  non-monotonic  dose-re-
sponse  for  any  observed  effect.  In  comparison  to  these  two  substances,  bisphenol  A 
is  a  very  weak  estrogen  that  is  10,000–100,000  times  less  potent.  No  plausible  ex-
planation  has  been  advanced  to  explain  why  bisphenol  A  would  cause  adverse  ef-
fects  at  low  doses  with  non-monotonic  dose-response  while  more  potent  estrogens 
would not do so. 

There  is  at  best  very  limited  evidence  to  support  the  validity  of  the  low-dose  hy-
pothesis and very strong evidence that indicates the hypothesis is not valid. Lacking 
reliable  evidence  and  biological  plausibility,  the  low-dose  hypothesis  is  just  that— 
a hypothesis that has not been proven. 

Question  4.  Have  or  haven’t  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  bisphenol  A?  Is  it 

even possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer. In our general answers, we note that there are different types of studies 
that could involve humans, some of which are considered ethical and some of which 
are not. Here we address the question with specific reference to bisphenol A. 

Several  human  studies  have  been  conducted  to  understand  how  bisphenol  A  is 
processed in the body. In these studies, human volunteers are treated with a small 
dose of bisphenol A that is well below a dose that could cause toxicity as determined 
from  reliable  studies  on  laboratory  animals.  The  objective  of  these  studies  is  to  de-
termine whether bisphenol A is absorbed, where it is distributed in the body, wheth-
er  it  is  metabolized  and  to  what  metabolites,  and  how  quickly  and  where  it  is  ex-
creted. 

These  studies  confirm  that  people  efficiently  convert  bisphenol  A,  as  it  is  ab-
sorbed,  to  a  metabolite  that  has  no  known  biological  activity,  and  then  quickly  ex-
crete  that  metabolite  with  a  half-life  of  about  5  hours.  This  means  that  bisphenol 
A  is  eliminated  from  the  body  into  urine  within  the  day  of  exposure  and  does  not 
accumulate  in  the  body.  Of  equal  importance  is  that  these  studies  also  identified 
a  critical  difference  between  how  rodents  and  humans  process  bisphenol  A.  The 
amount  of  time  that  bisphenol  A  remains  in  the  body  is  substantially  shorter  for 
humans  compared  to  rodents,  which  indicates  that  people  are  likely  to  be  less  sen-
sitive  to  any  potential  health  effects  from  exposure  to  bisphenol  A.  This  is  signifi-
cant  since  most  laboratory  animal  studies  on  bisphenol  A  have  been  conducted  on 
rodents (e.g., mice, rats), which could overestimate human health concerns. 

A  second  type  of  study  on  humans  that  has  been  performed  with  respect  to 
bisphenol  A  is  biomonitoring  to  measure  the  presence  of  trace  levels  of  chemicals 
in the body. Biomonitoring data provides a direct measure of exposure, which is nec-
essary  to  assess  whether  bisphenol  A  poses  a  risk  to  humans.  Since  bisphenol  A  is 
entirely  and  quickly  excreted  into  urine  in  the  form  of  a  metabolite,  most  biomoni-
toring studies measure the amount of that metabolite in urine samples. The largest 
set of biomonitoring data on bisphenol A is from the CDC National Health and Nu-
trition  Examination  Survey  (NHANES),  which  is  an  ongoing  population-scale  pro-
gram. That data was recently published and is generally consistent with the results 
of many smaller scale studies conducted around the world. Collectively these studies 
demonstrate  that  human  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  is  extremely  low,  which  confirms 
what  is  expected  in  light  of  the  use  patterns  of  bisphenol  A.  Almost  all  bisphenol 
A  is  chemically  reacted  to  form  plastics  and  resins,  meaning  that  there  are  no  con-
sumer products that contain any more than trace residual levels of bisphenol A. The 
typical  level  of  bisphenol  A  found  in  human  urine  corresponds  to  an  exposure  level 
that  is  approximately  500–1,000  times  below  the  science-based  safety  standard  re-
cently established in Europe based on an up-to-date review of the science. 

A  small  number  of  small-scale  epidemiology  studies,  which  attempt  to  associate 
human  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  with  specific  health  effects,  have  also  been  con-
ducted.  Biomonitoring  measurements  have  been  used  in  all  of  the  available  studies 
to  quantify  human  exposure.  The  earliest  such  studies  used  an  analytical  method 
that was subsequently found to be invalid and are thus fatally flawed. More recent 
studies  have  used  analytical  methods  that  are  likely  to  be  valid,  including  several 
studies  in  which  the  measurements  were  conducted  by  CDC  researchers.  Although 
these  studies  have  found  no  associations  between  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  and  the 
examined health effects (e.g., birth weight and related parameters, earlier age of pu-
berty  in  girls,  endometriosis  in  adult  women),  the  studies  are  limited  and  do  not 
provide definitive results, which would require longer term and larger scale studies. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00112 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

109 

Question  5.  Are  there  already  alternatives  to  BPA?  Are  these  alternatives  safer 
than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists  into  these  alter-
natives? 

Answer.  Bisphenol  A  is  primarily  used  to  make  polycarbonate  plastic  and  epoxy 
resins.  Since  neither  of  these  materials  would  exist  without  bisphenol  A,  alter-
natives to bisphenol A effectively means alternatives to these materials. 

Both of these materials are used in a wide array of consumer and industrial prod-
ucts.  As  a  general  matter,  they  are  used  in  these  products  because  their  key  prop-
erties provide a necessary function and they are often the material of choice to pro-
vide that function. In short, they are used because they work. 

Polycarbonate plastic is a lightweight, clear and highly shatter-resistant material 
that  makes  it  useful  in  products  such  as  sports  safety  equipment  (e.g.,  bicycle  and 
football  helmets),  CDs  and  DVDs,  housings  on  electrical  and  electronic  equipment 
(e.g., computers, cell phones, appliances), eyeglass lenses and components of medical 
devices, and automotive components, as well as baby bottles, water bottles and food 
storage containers. 

Epoxy resins are durable and chemically resistant materials that function well as 
protective  coatings  on  metal  products  and  as  laminates  in  electronic  circuit  boards. 
Along  with  coatings  on  structural  steel  and  pipes  and  fittings,  epoxy  resins  are 
widely  used  as  the  protective  coating  on  most  food  and  beverage  cans  where  they 
protect  the  safety  and  integrity  of  the  contents.  Without  a  coating,  foods  and  bev-
erages  can  corrode  the  metal  can,  resulting  in  contamination  of  food  with  metals 
and potentially with harmful bacteria if the integrity of the can is breached. 

To our knowledge, there are no alternatives that could easily substitute for all ap-
plications  of  these  materials.  In  each  case,  a  variety  of  factors  must  be  considered 
to  identify  suitable  alternatives,  and  the  critical  requirements  for  each  application 
vary considerably. For any alternative, two immediate hurdles are functionality (i.e., 
the  alternative  must  provide  the  function  needed  for  that  application)  and  safety 
(i.e., the alternative must be safe for the application). 

Compared to bisphenol A, no alternative has been so well tested or vetted so thor-
oughly by government agencies. Consequently, it is not likely that scientific data ex-
ists to support a claim that any alternative is safer than bisphenol A. 

Question 6. What about workers who are in the plants that manufacture BPA. Are 

protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unnecessarily exposed? 

Answer.  Bisphenol  A  is  manufactured  in  a  closed  process  that  offers  little  oppor-
tunity for human exposure. Since bisphenol A is a high melting solid with very low 
volatility,  the  primary  opportunity  for  occupational  exposure  in  plants  that  manu-
facture  bisphenol  A  involves  contact  with  dust,  in  particular  skin  contact.  Studies 
have  shown  that  transfer  of  bisphenol  A  through  skin  into  the  body  is  limited  and 
the primary health concern is for skin irritation or sensitization. Personal protection 
equipment  is  used  to  limit  worker  exposure  to  bisphenol  A  in  circumstances  where 
there is the potential for contact with bisphenol A. 

Question  7.  How  is  the  average  person  exposed  to  phthalates?  What  is  the  best 

way to reduce exposure to phthalates? 

Answer. Exposure to phthalates comes from many sources. These are a very valu-
able class of chemicals; different phthalates are used in personal care products, inks, 
caulks,  sealants  and  vinyl  products.  A  review  of  the  scientific  literature  suggests 
that the greatest exposure to phthalates is through ingestion of food. Data from the 
U.S.  Center  for  Disease  Control  indicates  that  total  exposures  to  the  general  U.S. 
population  from  phthalate  esters  from  all  sources  are  well  within  EPA  reference 
doses. 

Question 8. Please explain the significance of phthalate mixtures. 
Answer. There are about 13 phthalates commonly used today, so there can be ex-
posure  to  multiple  phthalates.  Data  from  recent  U.S.  Centers  for  Disease  Control 
(CDC)  biomonitoring  data  indicates  that  humans  are  exposed  to  extremely  low  lev-
els  of  several  phthalates  simultaneously.  The  CDC  data  indicates  that  the  general 
population’s exposure for each phthalate measured is below its EPA reference dose. 
A reference dose is an exposure level defined by the Environmental Protection Agen-
cy  as  ‘‘a  numerical  estimate  of  a  daily  oral  exposure  to  the  human  population,  in-
cluding sensitive subgroups such as children, that is not likely to cause harmful ef-
fects during a lifetime.’’ 

Some  have  suggested  that  while  exposures  to  one  phthalate  ester  are  below  the 
reference  dose,  scientists  should  also  study  whether  more  than  one  phthalate  could 
interact. The evidence indicates that for the few chemicals that we know do interact, 
most  do  so  by  a  process  called  ‘‘additivity,’’  in  which  the  effects  of  these  chemicals 
are  added  together.  But  in  order  to  be  ‘‘additive,’’  chemicals  must  produce  their  ef-
fects  not  only  on  the  same  organ  systems,  but  in  the  same  way.  In  a  toxicologist’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00113 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

110 

terms,  their  ‘‘mechanism  of  action’’  in  the  body  has  to  be  the  same  for  the  effects 
to  be  additive.  Another  important  point  relates  to  the  exposure  levels.  To  produce 
meaningful interactions, exposures must be at levels at which the respective chemi-
cals  produce  effects.  If  the  exposures  are  below  a  critical  threshold,  an  ‘‘additive’’ 
effect would not generally be expected. This is an emerging field of study. 

Importantly,  it  is  seen  from  the  CDC  data  that  maximum  exposure  in  the  most 
sensitive  human  subpopulations  are  still  orders  of  magnitude  less  than  doses  with 
which  additivity  has  been  demonstrated  in  rodents.1 Since  the  current  reference 
dose for DBP (EPA IRIS) is 0.3 mg/kg/day, the estimated theoretical toxicity thresh-
old  for  combined  exposure  to  the  phthalates  DEHP,  DBP,  DIBP,  and  BBP  would 
also  be  orders  of  magnitude  higher  than  the  EPA  reference  dose  for  DBP  based  on 
the simple dose addition model. 

Question  9.  Have  or  haven’t  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  phthalates?  Is  it 

even possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer. In our general answers, we note that there different types of studies that 
could  involve  humans,  some  of  which  are  considered  ethical  and  some  of  which  are 
not. 

Several  human  studies  have  been  conducted  to  understand  how  phthalate  esters 
are  processed  in  the  body.  In  these  studies,  human  volunteers  are  treated  with  a 
small  dose  of  phthalate  esters  that  are  well  below  a  dose  that  could  cause  toxicity 
as  determined  from  reliable  studies  on  laboratory  animals.  The  objective  of  these 
studies  is  to  determine  whether  phthalate  esters  are  absorbed,  where  they  are  dis-
tributed  in  the  body,  whether  they  are  metabolized  and  to  what  metabolites,  and 
how quickly and where they are excreted. 

These  studies  confirm  that  people  efficiently  convert  phthalate  esters  to  metabo-
lites,  which  are  then  quickly  excreted  through  urine  in  about  twenty-four  hours  of 
exposure and not accumulated in the body. 

A  second  type  of  study  on  humans  that  has  been  performed  with  respect  to 
phthalate  esters  is  biomonitoring  to  measure  the  presence  of  trace  levels  of  chemi-
cals in the body. Biomonitoring data provides a direct measure of exposure, and un-
derstanding exposure is necessary to assess whether phthalate esters pose a risk to 
humans.  Since  phthalate  esters  are  excreted  into  urine  in  the  form  of  metabolites, 
most  biomonitoring  studies  measure  the  amount  of  the  metabolites  in  urine  sam-
ples. The largest set of biomonitoring data on phthalate esters is from the CDC Na-
tional  Health  and  Nutrition  Examination  Survey  (NHANES),  which  is  an  ongoing 
population-scale  program.  The  CDC  data  demonstrate  that  human  exposure  to 
phthalate  esters  is  extremely  low,  and  below  EPA  reference  doses  for  those  com-
pounds. 

A  small  number  of  small-scale  epidemiology  studies,  which  attempt  to  associate 
human exposure to phthalate esters with specific health effects, have also been con-
ducted.  Biomonitoring  measurements  have  been  used  in  all  of  the  available  studies 
to quantify human exposure. To date, the studies are limited and do not provide de-
finitive results, which would require longer term and larger scale studies. EPA has 
declined to rely on data from these early studies due to their limitations. 

Question  10.  Are  there  already  alternatives  to  phthalates?  Are  these  alternatives 
safer  than  what  is  currently  being  used?  What  science  or  studies  exists  into  these 
alternatives? 

Answer. Phthalates have been used to make vinyl soft and flexible for many years 
since  their  chemical  properties  make  them  the  most  suitable  softeners  for  a  wide 
range  of  consumer  and  industrial  products.  Several  non-phthalate  plasticizers  are 
commercially available; however, each one’s suitability for use as a phthalate alter-
native depends on the technical requirements for the particular application (i.e., will 
the  finished  product  perform  satisfactorily).  By  way  of  example,  many  important 
medical applications depend on the performance of flexible vinyl tubing. Soft tubing 
adds patient comfort when patients are intubated; in addition, plasticized tubing re-
sists kinking and holds its shape, helping in the administration of the correct dosage 
of drugs and treatments. One can easily see that in evaluating whether there might 
be an alternative to phthalates in such an application, doctors could insist that any 
alternative perform equally as well or better in the delivery of key medical services. 
And  one  can  also  easily  see  how  a  hospital  administrator,  charged  with  keeping 
costs  down,  might  likewise  insist  on  cost  equivalence  before  moving  to  an  alter-
native plasticizer. 

The  recently  published  report  on  alternatives  to  DEHP  in  medical  devices  by  the 
European  Scientific  Committee  on  Emerging  and  New-Identified  Health  Risks 

1 Maximum  estimated  human  daily  exposure  to  one  of  the  most  commonly  used  phthalates, 

DEHP, was calculated from measurements in children aged 3–14 (0.0031 mg/kg/d.). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00114 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

111 

(SCENIHR)  provides  the  most  up  to  date  summary  of  data  available  on  the  most 
common alternative plasticizers. The report shows that some products have been as 
broadly  studied  as  phthalates  but  that  several  have  not.  A  few  of  the  alternatives 
also have been reviewed in recent safety assessments.2 

The  most  commonly  used  phthalates  perform  well,  are  economical,  and  have  a 
rich  toxicological  database;  more  important,  government  safety  assessments  have 
consistently  concluded  that  they  may  continue  to  be  used  safely  in  many  applica-
tions,  despite  some  concerns  for  a  few  applications  where  high  exposures  may  be 
possible. 

Question  11.  What  about  workers  who  are  in  the  plants  that  manufacture 
phthalates. Are protections in place to make sure that they aren’t unnecessarily ex-
posed? 

Answer.  Typically  phthalates  are  manufactured  in  closed  systems  and  the  oper-
ator  controls  the  reaction  remotely  on  a  computer  terminal  so  worker  exposure  in 
manufacturing facilities is very low. 

Question 12. What are endocrine disruptors and how do they affect us? 
Answer.  The  term  ‘‘endocrine  disruptor’’  (ED)  was  invented  in  1991  at  a  World 
Wildlife  fund-sponsored  conference  held  at  the  Wingspread  retreat  in  Racine,  Wis-
consin  (Colborn  and  Clement  1992).  The  participants  cited  environmental  and  ex-
perimental  findings  in  fish  and  wildlife,  in  vitro  study  results,  and  clinical  findings 
in  humans  exposed  to  high  levels  of  the  clinically  prescribed  pharmaceutical 
diethylstilbestrol  (DES)  as  the  basis  for  the  ED  hypothesis.  Under  the  ED  hypoth-
esis, the most relevant question is not whether highly potent pharmaceutical agents 
can cause effects, but rather are the exposures to trace ambient environmental lev-
els  of  substances  of  sufficient  magnitude  and  duration  to  exert  adverse  effects  on 
the general population? 

Various organizations have held numerous conferences on the ED issue, and sev-
eral have wrestled with the term ED. The term ED remains somewhat controversial 
because  of  the  imprecise  and  inconsistent  manner  in  which  it  is  applied.  Many  use 
the  term  very  broadly,  such  that  many  substances  have  been  implied  by  some  to 
be EDs, despite no evidence of harm. One of the clearer and most useful definitions 
of ED (and potential ED) was published by the ‘‘European Workshop on the Impact 
of  Endocrine  Disrupters  on  Human  Health  and  Wildlife’’  held  in  Weybridge,  UK 
(1996): 

• ‘‘An  endocrine  disrupter  is  an  exogenous  substance  that  causes  adverse  health 
effects in an intact organism, or its progeny, secondary to changes in endocrine 
function.’’ 

• ‘‘A  potential  endocrine  disrupter  is  a  substance  that  possesses  properties  that 

might be expected to lead to endocrine disruption in an intact organism.’’ 

Scientists  have  agreed  that  the  definition  requires  that  an  ED  have  a  link  be-
tween  the  endocrine  activity  and  some  adverse  health  effect;  otherwise  the  endo-
crine  effect  is  not  toxicologically  significant.  While  some  groups  have  lobbied  for  a 
broader  and  less  rigorous  definition,  scientists  have,  across  a  variety  of  conferences 
and  venues,  consistently  agreed  with  a  definition  identical  to  or  very  similar  to  the 
Weybridge definition. 

A number of excellent and comprehensive reviews of endocrine disruption studies 
have  been  published.  Collectively,  these  reviews  represent  a  significant  body  of  sci-
entific work compiled and or reviewed by more than 500 scientists across the world, 
resulting in extensive volumes covering human and wildlife toxicology, mechanisms 
of  action,  risk  assessment,  testing,  test  method  development  and  validation,  and 
other  science  policy  concerns  (NRC  1999;  U.S.  EPA  1998;  EU  1999;  SETAC  1998, 
1999;  IUPAC  2003;  IPCS  2002;  Environment  Canada,  1999).  The  consensus  of  the 
research  is  clear,  that  there  is  no  evidence  that  humans  have  been  adversely  af-
fected  by  ambient,  environmental  exposures  to  endocrine  active  substances  and 
there  is  not  convincing  evidence  of  a  growing  human  health  issue.  (Breithaupt 
2004).  In  addition,  the  evidence  in  wildlife  studies  shows  that  some  specific  popu-
lations  have  been  affected  in  areas  of  high  contamination  and  exposure.  As  stated 
in  the  review  of  the  International  Union  of  Pure  and  Applied  Chemistry  (IUPAC), 
‘‘. . .  it  is  somewhat  reassuring  that  after  substantial  research  in  the  past  decade, 
there have been no conclusive findings of low level environmental exposures to EAS 

2 Scientific  Committee  on  Emerging  and  Newly  Identified  Health  Risks  (SCENIHR).  2008. 
‘‘Opinion  on  the  Safety  of  Medical  Devices  Containing  DEHP-Plasticized  PVC  or  Other  Plasti-
cizers  on  Neonates  and  Other  Groups  Possibly  at  Risk.’’  This  report  is  available  online  at 
http://ec.europa.eu/health/phlrisk/committees/04lscenihr/docs/scenihrlol008.pdf. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00115 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

112 

causing  human  disease’’  (http://www.icsu-scope.org/projects/complete/endocrine 
execsum.htm). 

Question 13. Is there an established list of known endocrine disruptors? 
Answer.  No.  In  the  U.S.,  under  the  Food  Quality  Protection  Act  (FQPA)  of  1996, 
Congress required EPA to develop and implement a screening program—using vali-
dated  test  methods—to  determine  whether  certain  chemicals  have  estrogenic  or 
other  endocrine  effects.  Since  then,  EPA  solicited  advice  from  an  advisory  panel  on 
what  screens  and  what  tests  should  be  validated  to  determine  whether  chemicals 
have  endocrine  effects  and  then  EPA  began  validating  these  tests.  The  issue  which 
Congress put before EPA relative to testing for endocrine effects is much more com-
plex than Congress appreciated in 1996, so the validation exercise has taken longer 
than anticipated. The mandate of the FQPA was on pesticide chemicals, so EPA has 
published  a  candidate  list  of  pesticide  chemicals  for  screening  and  testing  in  its 
Phase  1  of  the  Endocrine  Disruptor  Screening  Program—but  these  are  simply  can-
didates  for  testing,  not  endocrine  disruptors.  EPA  plans  to  begin  ordering  pesticide 
registrants and manufacturers to begin testing these chemicals for endocrine effects 
starting  in  August  of  2008.  Since  these  validated  tests  have  not  been  applied  yet, 
however, there is no established list of known endocrine disruptors in the U.S. 

Question  14.  Do  infants  and  children  have  the  same  immune  and  endocrine  sys-

tem as adults? Do studies take into account these differences? 

Answer,  Do  infants  and  children  have  the  same  immune  and  endocrine  system 
as  adults:  Although  the  endocrine  and  immune  systems  of  infants  and  children  are 
composed  of  the  same  components  as  adults,  these  systems  function  in  a  manner 
that  is  somewhat  different  from  adults.  In  all  mammals,  including  humans,  all 
organ  systems  develop,  differentiate,  grow  and  mature  during  development  in  the 
womb,  during  postnatal  growth  and  throughout  all  life  stages.  Thus,  the  endocrine 
and  immune  systems  differentiate  during  fetal  development  and  grow  and  mature 
throughout  childhood  and  adolescence.  During  puberty,  the  functions  of  the  endo-
crine  system  change,  becoming  those  of  an  adult.  Similarly,  the  immune  system 
grows and matures during childhood. 

Studies of the potential toxicity of chemical substances specifically examine effects 
on  the  endocrine  and  immune  systems  to  address  questions  of  potential  vulner-
ability  during  growth  and  development  in  utero  and  growth  and  development 
postnatally up to and including attainment of sexual maturation (and these include 
evaluation  of  reproductive  function  after  puberty.  Typical  developmental  toxicity 
tests evaluate the effects of exposures during organogenesis and histogenesis, those 
periods  during  which  organ  systems  are  differentiating,  forming  and  growing  in 
utero.  In  developmental  tests,  pregnant  animals  are  treated  with  the  test  agent 
(thus exposing the offspring in utero) and then fetuses are evaluated just before par-
turition  for  effects  on  the  skeletal  and  organ  systems.  The  period  that  is  covered 
by the developmental toxicity study is sensitive to induction of structural malforma-
tions  (birth  defects).  Reproductive  tests  can  include  one,  two  or  more  generations. 
The  purpose  of  these  studies  is  to  examine  successive  generations  to  identify  pos-
sible  increased  sensitivity  to  a  chemical,  effects  on  the  fertility  of  male  and  female 
animals, prenatal, perinatal, and postnatal effects on the ovum, fetus and offspring, 
including teratogenic effects, as well as perinatal and postnatal effects on the moth-
er.  In  such  tests,  the  males  and  females  of  the  parental  generation  are  exposed  to 
the test substance prior to mating. Exposure of the parental generation (males and 
females) continues throughout the gestation and weaning periods (offspring continue 
to be exposed via their mother through lactation for test agents that are transferred 
into milk). After weaning, the offspring are placed on a direct exposure regimen. Ex-
posure  is  continued  through  the  stages  of  adolescent  growth  and  development,  and 
at  the  stage  of  sexual  maturation,  in  multigeneration  studies,  the  exposed  animals 
are mated and the effects on reproduction are evaluated. 

Scientists  have  long  recognized  that  the  endocrine  systems  and  immune  systems 
differ in younger mammals compared to adults. Such differences or ‘‘windows of vul-
nerability  during  fetal  development  and  sexual  maturation’’  are  not  a  new  concept, 
as  these  have  been  incorporated  into  research,  testing  and  safety  assessments  for 
more  than  40  years.3 Reproductive  toxicity  testing  is  generally  focused  on  deter-

1965. 

3 Wilson  J.G.  Teratology  Principles  and  Techniques.  Chicago,  University  of  Chicago  Press; 

4 USEPA (U.S. Environmental Protection Agency). OPPTS Harmonized Test Guidelines Series 
870  Health  Effects  Test  Guidelines—Final  Guidelines.  2007.  Available  from:  http://www. 
USEPA.gov/docs/OPPTSlHarmonized/870lHealthlEffectslTestlGuidelines/Series/. 
5 USFDA (U.S. Food and Drug Administration). Toxicological Principles for the Safety Assess-
ment  of  Food  Ingredients,  Redbook.  2000.  Available  from:  http://www.cfsan.fda.gov/∼redbook/ 
red-toca.html) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00116 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

113 

mination of the potential of a chemical to affect the ability of an organism to repro-
duce,  while  developmental  toxicity  testing  focuses  on  the  potential  of  a  chemical  to 
affect the viability or normal development of offspring of an organism during gesta-
tion. There are a number of standardized test methods that can be used to evaluate 
the effects of substances on development and reproduction.4 5 Reproductive tests can 
include  one,  two  or  more  generations.  The  purpose  of  these  studies  is  to  examine 
successive generations to identify possible increased sensitivity to a chemical, effects 
on  the  fertility  of  male  and  female  animals,  prenatal,  perinatal,  and  postnatal  ef-
fects  on  the  ovum,  fetus  and  offspring,  including  teratogenic  effects,  as  well  as 
perinatal  and  postnatal  effects  on  the  mother.  These  studies  require  evaluations  of 
all  organ  systems  for  abnormalities,  including  the  endocrine  and  immune  systems 
(specifically thymus and spleen). 

With respect to endocrine disruption, within EPA’s Endocrine Disruptor Screening 
Program  (EDSP),  the  2-generation  mammalian  reproduction  toxicity  test  is  the  sci-
entifically  valid,  definitive  laboratory  toxicity  test  for  use  in  human  health  risk  as-
sessment of such substances. EPA accepts this test method as ‘‘valid for the identi-
fication  and  characterization  of  reproductive  and  developmental  effects,  including 
those due to endocrine disruption (ED) . . .’’ Therefore, for evaluating endocrine dis-
ruption, the chemicals that have completed such 2-generation mammalian reproduc-
tion  toxicity  test  tests  are  viewed  as  having  fully  satisfied  the  needs  for  human 
health risk assessment purposes. In the EDSP, the 2-generation mammalian repro-
duction  toxicity  is  often  referred  to  as  the  definitive  Tier  2  test  for  use  in  human 
health  risk  assessment.  In  EPA’s  EDSP,  the  Agency  has  clearly  described  the  pur-
pose and policy of such a Tier 2 Test: 

Federal  Register/Vol.  63,  No.  248/December  28,  1998/71554–71555  (emphasis 
added). 
The purpose of Tier 2 testing is to characterize the likelihood, nature, and dose- 
response  relationship  of  the  endocrine  disruption  of  EAT  in  humans,  fish,  and 
wildlife. To fulfill this purpose, the tests are longer-term studies designed to en-
compass critical life stages and processes, a broad range of doses, and adminis-
tration  of  the  chemical  substance  by  a  relevant  route  of  exposure,  to  identify 
a  more  comprehensive  profile  of  biological  consequences  of  chemical  exposure 
and relate such results to the dose or exposure which caused them. 
The  outcome  of  Tier  2  is  designed  to  be  conclusive  in  relation  to  the  outcome  of 
Tier 1 and any other prior information. Thus, a negative outcome in Tier 2 will 
supersede a positive outcome in Tier 1. Furthermore, each full test in Tier 2 has 
been  designed  to  include  those  endpoints  that  will  allow  a  definitive  conclusion 
as to whether or not the tested chemical substance or mixture is or is not an en-
docrine disruptor for EAT [estrogen, androgen and thyroid] in that species/taxa. 
Toxicological studies designed to explore potential reproductive and developmental 
effects are often designed to be multi-generational, which means they explore effects 
on an exposed rodent and one or more generations of its offspring. 

Question  15.  Have  or  haven’t  we  seen  many  human  studies  on  these  chemicals? 

Is it even possible or ethical to conduct human studies? 

Answer.  With  respect  to  human  studies  generally,  all  human  subjects  research 
that is considered by EPA—whether conducted or sponsored by the Federal Govern-
ment  or  other  entities—must  follow  the  high  standards  embodied  in  consensus 
standards such as the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects, referred 
to  as  the  Common  Rule;  the  Guideline  for  Good  Clinical  Practice;  the  Declaration 
of Helsinki; and the Nuremburg Code. For obvious ethical reasons, humans are not 
typically  dosed  with  compounds  to  determine  effects.  Most  data  regarding  chemical 
effects is drawn from traditional toxicological testing (the proverbial ‘‘lab rat’’). This 
data  is  sometimes  augmented  with  human  studies  in  the  form  of  epidemiological 
data.  Epidemiology  is  the  study  of  the  incidence  and  prevalence  of  disease  in  large 
populations and detection of the source and cause of epidemics of infectious disease. 
Question  16.  Usually  chemicals  are  tested  one  at  a  time.  However,  we  come  into 
contact  with  numerous  chemicals  every  day.  Do  these  studies  simulate  real  world 
exposures and what is the best way to test chemicals? 

Answer.  The  question  of  exposures  to  mixtures  of  substances  requires  an  under-
standing that humans encounter an ever-changing combination of natural and man- 
made  chemicals  at  low  levels,  in  normal,  every  day  activities.  We  are  exposed  to  a 
number of natural and man-made chemicals simultaneously and continuously every 
day.  It  is  no  surprise  that  they  can  be  detected,  and  this  should  not  lead  to  undue 
concern. Whether we are breathing air, which is composed of chemicals, or ingesting 
food,  which  is  a  complex  mixture  of  chemicals,  our  bodies  are  absorbing  a  variety 
of chemicals every day. Scientists, physicians and others in related professions have 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00117 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

114 

long  understood  that  the  actions  of  life  are  chemical  by  their  very  nature.  As  we 
interact  with  our  environment,  we  are  exposed  to  many  thousands  of  chemicals, 
both  natural  and  synthetic.  The  specific  chemicals  vary  from  day  to  day  depending 
on  our  environment  and  activity.  Generally,  if  a  chemical  is  taken  in  by  the  body, 
it  is  either  used  or  changed  into  a  new  chemical  that  can  be  used  (nutrient)  or  it 
is  altered  by  systems  in  the  body  and  sequestered  or  excreted  as  waste.  The  in-
creased sensitivity of analytical methods allows us to measure simultaneously more 
chemicals  at  lower  concentrations  in  human  tissues.  This  has  led  some  to  assert 
that  the  mere  presence  of  chemicals  in  the  body,  or  detection  of  mixtures  of  chemi-
cals  in  the  body,  is  harmful  without  regard  for  the  amount  of  chemicals  being  re-
ferred to or the frequency or duration of presence in the body. 

The presence of a substance that has adverse effects at some level does not imply 
that the presence of that chemical will lead to adverse effects at all levels. Potential 
toxicity must be considered in the context of the amount, route, duration and timing 
of  exposure.  For  human  health  risks  for  chemical  induced  toxicity,  evidence-based 
medicine and toxicology principles—the true scientific consensus—tell us that effects 
at high doses will not be realized at lower doses if the concentration falls below the 
target  site  threshold  level.  This  principle  applies  just  as  much  to  ‘‘windows  of  sus-
ceptibility’’ during development as it does more broadly to all life stages. And it ap-
plies to mixtures as well as to a single chemical. 

Our  scientific  understanding  of  how  the  body  functions  when  exposed  to  environ-
mental chemicals, and our knowledge based on current scientific methods for assess-
ing harm posed by chemicals, indicates a large difference between low levels of expo-
sure to chemicals and harm or disease resulting from exposure. Potential harm must 
be considered in the context of exposure and inherent toxicity of the chemical(s)—the 
amount,  route,  duration  and  timing  of  exposure  and  toxicity.  Both  naturally  occur-
ring and environmental chemicals—can be toxic at some dose. Indeed, many ‘‘natu-
rally  occurring’’  chemicals  are  potent  toxins.  The  quantity  of  exposure—the  dose— 
is of utmost importance in determining potential risk. 

For example, one aspirin can be an effective therapeutic agent for a headache. In-
gesting  a  full  bottle  of  aspirin  tablets  will  lead  to  toxicity.  And  taking  an  aspirin 
tablet  and  dividing  into  a  hundred  or  a  thousand  equal  parts,  and  then  ingesting 
one  of  these  small  doses  will  not  produce  any  effect  whatsoever.  This  is  a  funda-
mental principle of biology and medicine and it applies to low level exposures to en-
vironmental  chemicals,  just  as  it  applies  to  therapeutic  agents  and  natural  sub-
stances.  The  dose-response  relationship  for  a  specific  chemical  substance  describes 
the association between exposure and the observed response (health effect). In other 
words, it estimates how different levels of exposure change the likelihood and mag-
nitude  of  health  effects.  For  many  chemicals,  there  is  a  threshold  below  which  an 
internal  dose  will  not  elicit  a  response.  As  the  internal  dose  increases  and  exceeds 
the threshold, biochemical changes occur that may lead to adverse effects. There are 
clearly  thresholds  of  exposures—doses  that  are  so  low  as  to  cause  no  harm.  Such 
doses below the threshold would not create any untoward risk whatsoever. For mix-
tures, this principle applies as well. 

The human body is well equipped to manage low levels of chemicals. At low levels 
of  many  environmental  chemicals,  cells  can  act  to  break  down  and  excrete  these 
substances  as  wastes.  However,  when  any  chemical  is  present  or  accumulates  to  a 
toxic  level,  harm  can  occur.  The  same  would  apply  for  mixtures  of  chemicals.  The 
question  is  not  simply  one  of  whether  chemicals,  natural  or  man-made  are  present 
in  the  body  (a  question  of  exposure),  or  whether  the  chemical  can  cause  harm  (a 
question of the chemical’s inherent toxicity). Rather, it is the amount of those chemi-
cals  in  the  body  relative  to  the  amount  that  actually  causes  harm.  In  other  words, 
the  question  is  one  of  both  exposure  and  toxicity.  Therefore,  it  is  the  level  and  not 
the  mere  presence  of  any  of  the  hundreds  or  thousands  of  chemicals  in  the  body— 
regardless  of  their  origin—that  is  important.  This  potential  for  harm  relates  to  the 
concentrations of the chemicals in the body and their specific toxicity. 

The standard battery of toxicity tests employed by the chemical industry includes 
specific  tests  on  animals  designed  to  address  endpoints  of  concern  to  the  health  of 
humans, including children. This toxicity testing battery for industrial chemicals in-
cludes  tests  that  have  been  specifically  designed  to  evaluate  endpoints  that  cover 
acute toxicity, hazards to development in the womb and to growth and reproduction, 
damage  to  cell  components  that  could  possibly  trigger  transformation  into  cancer 
later in life, and the potential of substances to produce adverse effects on all major 
organ  systems,  including  the  nervous  system.  This  test  battery  specifically  includes 
study  designs  to  evaluate  potential  toxicity  during  the  critical  phases  of  develop-
ment in utero and thus addresses concerns for any differential sensitivity of the de-
veloping organism during windows of development (these types of studies have been 
conducted routinely since the 1960s). 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00118 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

115 

Animal  model  systems  employed  in  standard  toxicity  testing  routinely  employ 
dose  levels  that  are,  100-,  1,000-  or  even  10,000-fold  higher  than  humans  would  be 
expected to experience. In fact, in order to provide assurance that potential toxicity 
will not be missed, the standard toxicity testing protocols for reproductive and devel-
opmental toxicity testing all require that the highest dose tested be chosen with the 
aim to induce some developmental and/or maternal toxicity but not death or severe 
suffering 
(http://www.epa.gov/opptsfrs/publications/OPPTSlHarmonized/870l 
HealthlEffectslTestlGuidelines/Series/870-3800.pdf). While this approach is pre-
cautionary  toxicology,  because  it  ensures  that  there  is  little  chance  of  ‘‘missing’’  a 
potential  adverse  effect,  it  also  has  the  consequence  of  complicating  communication 
efforts  and  precludes  use  of  simple  descriptors.  Adverse  reproductive  or  develop-
mental  effects  observed  at  dose  levels  that  produce  parental  toxicity  may  be  sec-
ondary  effects.  If  studies  are  conducted  under  conditions  of  overt  toxicity,  such  ef-
fects may not be indicative of unique or selective developmental or reproductive tox-
icity.  As  a  result,  the  only  way  to  adequately  communicate  potential  hazards  of  ex-
posures  is  in  a  risk  context.  This  means  that  the  evaluative  process  must  compare 
the  dose-response  data  generated  in  the  toxicity  studies  to  estimated  levels  of 
human  exposure  to  derive  a  margin  of  exposure  (MOE).  The  MOE  expresses  the 
magnitude of the difference between a level of anticipated human exposure and the 
highest level at which there is no significant increase in the frequency of an adverse 
effect.  This  is  critical  information  not  only  for  assessing  risk  and  considering  risk 
management options when warranted, but also for communicating potential risks to 
the public. 

Risk assessment methods have been developed, and continue to be researched and 
refined,  to  account  for  aggregate  exposure  (exposure  to  the  same  agent  from  mul-
tiple  sources/routes)  and  cumulative  risk  (risk  estimated  for  concurrent  exposures 
to substances which act via the same mechanism). 

Some  specific  risk  assessment  methods  used  and  relied  upon  by  U.S.  EPA  have 

been specifically designed for evaluating mixtures include: 

Risk assessment methods for U.S. drinking water regulatory actions routinely ac-
count for exposures to a specific agent that may occur not only from drinking water, 
but  also  from  other  pathways  outside  of  drinking  water,  thus  affording  adequate 
protection 
exposures.  http://www.epa.gov/waterscience/ 
humanhealth/method/chapter4.pdf. 

potential 

for 

all 

‘‘The  drinking  water  program  usually  takes  a  conservative  approach  to  public 
health by applying an [relative source contribution] RSC factor of 20 percent to 
the  RfD  when  adequate  exposure  data  do  not  exist,  assuming  that  the  major 
portion  (80  percent)  of  the  total  exposure  comes  from  other  sources,  such  as 
diet.’’ 
http://www.epa.gov/fedrgstr/EPA-WATER/2000/November/Day-03/w 
27924.htm. 

For over 15 years, risk assessment methods for hazardous waste site cleanup eval-
uations have routinely, included aggregate and cumulative quantitative calculations 
to account for both exposures to a single chemical from multiple pathways and con-
current exposures to multiple substances from the same or multiple routes. 

‘‘To  assess  the  overall  potential  for  cancer  and  noncancer  effects  posed  by  mul-
tiple  chemicals,  EPA  has  developed  Guidelines  for  the  Health  Risk  Assessment 
of Chemical Mixtures that can also be applied to the case of simultaneous expo-
sures to several chemicals from a variety of sources by more than one exposure 
pathway.  Although  the  calculation  procedures  differ  for  carcinogenic  and  non-
carcinogenic  effects,  both  sets  of  procedures  assume  dose  additivity  in  the  ab-
sence of information on specific mixtures.’’ 
Chapter 8, Risk Assessment Guidance for Superfund (RAGS), Volume 1, Human 
Health  Evaluation  Manual,  Part  A  (1989)  http://www.epa.gov/superfund/pro-
grams/risk/ragsa/index.htm’’ 

With respect to experimental studies of chemical mixtures, many published inter-
action  studies  in  toxicology  are  not  interpretable  for  human  health  because  they 
used  faulty  experimental  designs,  inadequate  statistical  methods  or  inappropriate 
biological  model  systems.  Numerous  interaction  studies  are  not  reliable  for  risk  as-
sessment  due  to  a  number  of  common  problems:  failure  to  characterize  the  indi-
vidual  dose-response  characteristics  of  chemicals  in  a  mixture;  failure  to  test  a  no- 
interaction  hypothesis;  and  failure  to  apply  an  appropriate  statistical  test  to  the 
data.  For  example,  most  individual  chemical  dose  response  curves  are  not  linear. 
When  testing  a  mixture  of  chemicals,  an  additive  response  can  easily  be  mistaken 
for  a  synergistic  response  due  to  this  non-linearity.  The  response  predicted  under 
the  assumption  of  additivity  must  first  be  determined,  followed  by  statistical  com-
parison of observed vs. actual responses. (Borgert C.J. et al., ‘‘Evaluating interaction 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00119 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

116 

studies  for  mixture  risk  assessment.’’  Human  and  Ecological  Risk  Assessment,  vol. 
7, pages 259–306, 2001.) 

A Society of Toxicology panel has concluded that if toxicological data on chemical 
mixtures  are  to  be  relevant  and  useful  for  assessing  risks  to  humans,  it  should  be 
conducted  at  doses  relevant  to  environmental  exposures,  including  doses  below  the 
toxic threshold for individual chemicals. The scientific community has an obligation 
to  demonstrate  the  clinical  relevance  of  toxicological  interactions  of  chemical  mix-
tures  to  avoid  the  accumulation  of  ‘‘interactions’’  of  doubtful  relevance.  (Teuschler 
L.  et  al.  ‘‘Support  of  science-based  decisions  concerning  the  evaluation  of  the  toxi-
cology of mixtures: A new beginning.’’ Regulatory Toxicology and Pharmacology, vol. 
36, No. 1, pages 34–39, 2002.) 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO 

STEVEN G. HENTGES, PH.D. 

Question  1.  Why  are  there  such  dramatically  different  results  on  the  low-dose  ef-
fects of BPA between the results of studies sponsored by the chemical industry and 
studies conducted by academics or government entities? 

Answer. Scientific studies can only answer questions they are designed to answer. 
Studies sponsored by industry are typically, but not always, aimed at answering the 
critical  question  of  whether  a  product  is  safe  for  use.  These  studies  are  generally 
designed  to  meet  the  requirements  of  internationally  accepted  test  guidelines  that 
were  developed  for  this  purpose.  The  studies  are  typically  large  in  scale  to  be  sure 
the  studies  have  adequate  statistical  power  and  examine  appropriate  endpoints  to 
address the question that the study is intended to answer. The studies are also typi-
cally  conducted  in  highly  qualified  test  laboratories  under  Good  Laboratory  Prac-
tices, which provides further assurance of the integrity of the study results. 

Other studies, which can also include industry sponsored studies, are often aimed 
at  other  scientific  questions  that  may  or  may  not  be  directly  relevant  to  assessing 
human  health  concerns.  These  studies  may  be  limited  in  scope  and  examine 
endpoints  that  are  difficult  to  interpret  with  respect  to  the  safety  of  the  substance 
being tested. Some studies, although scientifically well conducted, may have limited 
or no relevance for assessing human health concerns. 

For  bisphenol  A,  a  very  wide  diversity  of  studies  have  been  conducted  and  it  is 
a  gross  oversimplification  to  say  that  studies  sponsored  by  the  chemical  industry 
have  opposite  results  to  studies  conducted  by  academic  institutions.  Very  often, 
studies cannot be directly compared because they are so different. 

As  described  in  the  answer  to  the  question  below,  all  relevant  studies  on 
bisphenol A have been systematically assessed in numerous weight of evidence eval-
uations.  When  all  of  the  relevant  data  from  these  many  studies  are  compared,  in 
particular to determine whether the findings are repeatable or corroborated in inde-
pendent  laboratories,  the  most  consistent  result  is  that  no  effects  from  exposure  to 
low doses of bisphenol A are reliably found. This conclusion is true even if the anal-
ysis is limited to non-industry studies. In that regard, studies sponsored by industry 
are  consistent  with  the  broader  database  and  validate  the  overall  conclusion  that 
low  doses  of  bisphenol  A  have  not  been  reliably  shown  to  cause  adverse  health  ef-
fects. 

Question  2.  In  light  of  dozens  of  advanced  studies  over  the  past  several  years,  in 
conjunction  with  the  recent  assessment  from  the  National  Toxicology  Program,  do 
you believe that the Federal Government should control exposure to BPA? 

Answer. Many hundreds of studies on bisphenol A have been conducted in the last 
10  years  and  a  substantial  percentage  of  these  studies  were  aimed  at  addressing 
the  question  whether  bisphenol  A  could  cause  adverse  health  effects  at  very  low 
doses. These studies are not all equivalent and, in general, they vary vastly in size, 
scope,  quality  and  relevance  to  human  health.  The  most  comprehensive  studies 
cover multiple generations of laboratory animals, are large in scale and statistically 
powerful,  include  a  wide  range  of  doses  from  very  low  to  very  high,  and  dose  ani-
mals  by  the  most  relevant  oral  route  of  exposure.  Other  studies  are  small  in  size 
and  scope,  may  be  poorly  conducted  or  reported,  and  dose  animals  by  routes  that 
are of little or no relevance to humans (e.g., subcutaneous injection, direct injection 
into the brain). A further complication is that the results of these many studies are 
not consistent and show conflicting results. 

When  faced  with  a  large  and  diverse  body  of  data,  as  is  the  case  for  bisphenol 
A, scientists systematically evaluate the weight of scientific evidence to draw conclu-
sions  based  on  all  of  the  available  evidence.  In  recent  years,  numerous  weight  of 
evidence  evaluations  of  bisphenol  A  have  been  conducted  by  independent  scientific 
and  government  bodies  worldwide.  These  evaluations  consistently  support  the  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00120 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

117 

clusion  that  bisphenol  A  is  not  a  significant  risk  to  human  health,  in  particular  at 
the very low levels to which people could be exposed through use of consumer prod-
ucts. 

In addition to evaluating each available study on its own merits, a weight of evi-
dence evaluation also assesses whether the findings of studies have been replicated 
or corroborated in independent laboratories, whether they are consistent within and 
across  studies,  and  whether  they  are  coherent  when  considered  together.  Repeat-
ability  is  a  fundamental  principle  of  the  scientific  process;  findings  that  cannot  be 
replicated in robust studies cannot be accepted as valid. 

Specifically  in  regard  to  the  National  Toxicology  Program  assessment,  no  serious 
or high level concerns were identified. Several possible health effects were identified 
as ‘‘some concern,’’ which indicated that only limited and inconclusive evidence was 
available from laboratory animal studies and additional research is needed to deter-
mine whether the limited evidence is of any relevance for human health. 

Based  on  the  many  evaluations  that  support  the  conclusion  that  bisphenol  A  is 
not  a  significant  health  risk,  there  is  no  apparent  need  based  in  science  for  action 
by the Federal Government regarding bisphenol A. 

Question  3.  Can  consumers  trust  products  that  are  currently  labeled  as  ‘‘BPA- 

Answer.  Bisphenol  A  is  primarily  used  to  make  polycarbonate  plastic  and  epoxy 
resins.  Since  neither  of  these  materials  would  exist  without  bisphenol  A,  alter-
natives to bisphenol A effectively means alternatives to these materials. Presumably 
products  labeled  as  ‘‘BPA-free’’  are  made  from  alternative  materials  that  are  not 
made from bisphenol A. 

To our knowledge, there are no alternatives that could easily substitute for all ap-
plications  of  these  materials.  In  each  case,  a  variety  of  factors  must  be  considered 
to  identify  suitable  alternatives  and  the  critical  requirements  for  each  application 
vary considerably. For any alternative, two immediate hurdles are functionality (i.e., 
the  alternative  must  provide  the  function  needed  for  that  application)  and  safety 
(i.e., the alternative must be safe for the application). 

Compared to bisphenol A, no alternative has been so well tested or vetted so thor-
oughly by government agencies. Consequently, it is not likely that scientific data ex-
ists to support a claim that any alternative is safer than bisphenol A. 

Whether  consumers  should  trust  products  labeled  as  ‘‘BPA-free’’  must  consider 
several  factors  including  the  veracity  of  the  claim,  the  performance  of  the  product, 
and the safety of the product. We do not have sufficient information on any of these 
factors to know whether consumers should trust these products. 

free’’? 

Question  4.  Why  are  low-dose  effects  of  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals  like  BPA 

more dangerous than those of other compounds? 

Answer.  The  so-called  ‘‘low-dose  hypothesis’’  asserts  that  very  low  doses  of  endo-
crine-active  substances  may  cause  adverse  health  effects  at  very  low  doses.  In  par-
ticular,  such  low-dose  health  effects  are  postulated  to  occur  with  a  non-monotonic 
dose-response, which means that health effects observed at very low doses would not 
be  observed  at  higher  doses.  This  hypothesis  has  not  been  scientifically  proven  and 
there is at best limited evidence that it could be valid. 

A  fundamental  principle  of  toxicology  is  commonly  expressed  as  ‘‘the  dose  makes 
the poison,’’ which means that health effects observed at a particular dose will uni-
formly  increase  in  intensity  or  severity  as  the  dose  is  increased.  Conversely,  as  the 
dose  is  decreased,  a  dose  causing  no  effect  can  be  found  (a  no-effect  level)  and  any 
lower dose will also cause no effect. This is referred to as a monotonic dose-response 
(sometimes called a linear dose-response). 

Toxicology  studies  are  often  designed  to  identify  a  dose  at  which  no  adverse  ef-
fects.  occur,  which  is  referred  to  as  a  No-Observed-Adverse-Effect-Level  (NOAEL). 
Doses  below  the  NOAEL  may  not  be  tested  since  no  adverse  effects  are  expected. 
If the low-dose hypothesis is valid, health effects below the NOAEL might occur but 
not be found. 

In  response  to  the  low-dose  hypothesis,  there  are  now  a  large  number  of  studies 
on  bisphenol  A  that  examined  low  doses  well  below  the  accepted  NOAEL.  Most  of 
these  studies  did  not  examine  a  sufficient  number  or  range  of  doses  to  determine 
whether any dose-response is monotonic or non-monotonic and are thus not capable 
of validating the low-dose hypothesis. 

It  is  important  to  note  that  the  accepted  NOAEL  for  bisphenol  A  is  based  on  the 
most comprehensive studies, which were conducted over multiple generations of lab-
oratory  animals  and  included  a  wide  range  of  doses  from  very  low  doses  up  to  a 
very  high  dose  above  the  NOAEL  that  induces  toxicity.  These  studies  do  not  vali-
date claims that bisphenol A causes adverse effects at low doses and only monotonic 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00121 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

118 

dose-responses  were  observed.  These  studies  provide  the  most  powerful  evidence 
that the low-dose hypothesis, at least for bisphenol A, is not valid. 

Beyond  bisphenol  A,  the  biological  plausibility  of  the  low-dose  hypothesis  is  not 
supported  by  research  on  other  endocrine-active  substances.  For  example,  two  very 
robust  and  comprehensive  studies  have  recently  been  published  on  estradiol  and 
ethinylestradiol,  the  first  being  the  prototypical  naturally  occurring  estrogen  and 
the second being the estrogenic substance commonly used in birth control pills. Both 
studies  covered  a  wide  dose  range  and  neither  study  found  non-monotonic  dose-re-
sponse  for  any  observed  effect.  In  comparison  to  these  two  substances,  bisphenol  A 
is  a  very  weak  estrogen  that  is  10,000–100,000  times  less  potent.  No  plausible  ex-
planation  has  been  advanced  to  explain  why  bisphenol  A  would  cause  adverse  ef-
fects  at  low  doses  with  non-monotonic  dose-response  while  more  potent  estrogens 
would not do so. 

There  is  at  best  very  limited  evidence  to  support  the  validity  of  the  low-dose  hy-
pothesis and very strong evidence that indicates the hypothesis is not valid. Lacking 
reliable  evidence  and  biological  plausibility,  the  low-dose  hypothesis  is  just  that— 
a hypothesis that has not been proven. 

Question  5.  In  light  of  dozens  of  advanced  studies  over  the  past  several  years,  in 
conjunction  with  the  recent  assessment  from  the  National  Toxicology  Program,  do 
you believe that the Federal Government should control exposure to phthalates? 

Answer. Numerous U.S. Federal agencies charged with reviewing phthalate esters 
have  done  so  thoroughly,  and  after  taking  exposures  into  consideration.  Phthalates 
have  been  assessed  by  the  Consumer  Product  Safety  Commission  (CPSC),  the  Food 
and Drug Administration (FDA), the Centers for Disease Control, the National Toxi-
cology Program (NTP), the Cosmetic Ingredient Review (CIR), the European Union, 
and  Health  Canada,  as  well  as  other  countries.  Most  notably,  the  CPSC  assessed 
the safety of phthalates used in children’s toys, using the primary phthalate (DINP) 
for  that  application  as  the  focal  point  for  review,  and  concluded  that  there  is  ‘‘no 
demonstrated  health  risk’’  to  young  children.  The  CPSC’s  review  included  consider-
ation  of  exposure  data  drawn  from  studies  of  children’s  mouthing  behavior.  The 
FDA  conducted  a  risk  assessment  of  the  main  phthalate  used  in  medical  devices 
(DEHP) and concluded ‘‘the risk of not doing a needed procedure is far greater than 
the risk associated with exposure to DEHP.’’ 

Specifically  in  regard  to  the  National  Toxicology  Program  assessment,  the  NTP 
reviewed  seven  phthalates  and  concluded  there  was  negligible  to  minimal  concern 
for  exposures  to  all  the  phthalate  esters  reviewed,  except  with  respect  to  DEHP  in 
certain situations. In particular, the only serious concern expressed was when used 
in  medical  treatment  for  critically  ill  male  neonates.  FDA  responded  to  the  NTP’s 
review by cautioning that the benefits of medical treatment nevertheless outweighed 
the risks. 

Based  on  the  many  evaluations  that  support  the  continued  safe  use  of  phthalate 
esters,  there  is  no  apparent  need  based  in  science  for  additional  action  by  the  Fed-
eral Government at this time regarding phthalate esters. 

Question  6.  What  has  been  the  experience  of  the  European  Union  in  phasing  out 
phthalates in toys and childcare products? Has this been a significant logistical and 
manufacturing challenge for regulators and industry? 

Answer.  The  European  Chemicals  Bureau,  which  managed  the  risk  assessments 
performed  by  the  EU  member  states,  provided  a  draft  conclusion  of  the  exhaustive 
safety  reviews  of  the  principal  phthalate  (DINP)  used  in  toys.  It  stated  it  was  ‘‘un-
likely to pose a risk’’ even for newborns. Regrettably, despite the vote of confidence 
by  the  Bureau,  the  European  Parliament  had  already  moved  forward  with  banning 
phthalates  from  some  children’s  products.  It  was  a  decision  based  on  politics,  not 
science. Currently an array of other plasticizers are used in Europe. 

Question  7.  Why  are  low-dose  effects  of  endocrine-disrupting  chemicals  like 

phthalates more dangerous than those of other compounds? 

Answer.  Low  dose  effects  have  not  been  claimed  to  be  observed  in  testing  of 

phthalate esters. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00122 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

119 

EA-FREE PLASTICS: THE ONLY ALTERNATIVE FOR SAFE PLASTICS * 

By George D. Bittner, Ph.D., Professor of Neurobiology, The University of Texas at Austin 

and CEO, CertiChem, PlastiPure, Austin, Texas 

Non-Technical Summary 
The Problem 

Almost all plastics sold today release chemicals that have estrogenic activity (EA). 
While  estrogens  (the  female  sex  hormones)  occur  naturally  in  the  body,  many  sci-
entific  studies  have  shown  that  significant  health  problems  can  occur  when  chemi-
cals are ingested that mimic or block the actions of these female sex hormones; the 
fetus,  newborn,  or  young  child  is  especially  vulnerable.  These  health-related  prob-
lems include early puberty in females, reduced sperm counts in males, altered func-
tions of reproductive organs, obesity, altered behaviors, and increased rates of some 
breast, ovarian, testicular, and prostate cancers. 
The Billion Dollar Marketing Band-Aid 

Bisphenol  A  (BPA)  and  phthalates  are  two  of  thousands  of  chemicals  that  have 
EA  that  are  in,  and  released  from,  almost  all  plastics  sold  today.  The  current  com-
mercial approach is to solve this health-related problem by producing BPA-free and/ 
or phthalate-free plastic products. Unfortunately this incremental ‘‘marketing’’ solu-
tion  to  replace  an  individual  chemical  would  not  quickly  (if  ever)  provide  an  EA- 
free health-related solution. Furthermore, chemicals or products substituted for BPA 
or  phthalate-containing  products  often  leach  other  chemicals  having  more  total  EA 
than the EA released by the original products. 
Legislation to Date 

The call to ban BPA and phthalates is growing rapidly. California has passed leg-
islation banning phthalates and legislation to ban BPA is pending; similar bills are 
pending in Connecticut, New York, Pennsylvania, Maryland, Maine and Minnesota. 
The  U.S.  Senate  is  considering  an  amendment  to  the  Consumer  Product  Safety 
Commission Reform Act that would ban phthalates. The European Union and Can-
ada  have  already  passed  this  legislation.  However,  all  current  legislation  attempts 
to  solve  this  EA  problem  by  banning  chemicals  having  EA  one  at  a  time.  This  ap-
proach  is  not  an  appropriate  long-term  solution  because  thousands  of  chemicals 
used in plastics exhibit EA, not just BPA and phthalates. 
The Health-Related Solution 

The  most  appropriate  solution  is  to  legislate  that  all  plastics  be  EA-free,  rather 
than ban specific EA-causing ingredients one at a time. This is not a pie-in-the-sky 
solution, as the technology already exists to produce EA-free plastics that also have 
the  same  advantageous  physical  properties  as  do  almost  all  existing  EA-releasing 
plastics. Some of these advanced-technology plastics are already in the marketplace. 
Legislation to Date 

• NY  HB  11277:  Bill  introduced  to  the  NY  House  of  Representatives  on  May  27, 
2008  that  ‘‘Prohibits  the  manufacture,  distribution  and  sale  of  toys  and  child 
care products containing bisphenol-A’’ 
• Canada  has  announced  plans  to  restrict  the  use  of  BPA,  a  chemical  used  to 
make hardened plastics. The government would prohibit the sale of baby bottles 
made with BPA. (The ban will take effect mid-June.) 
• In  April,  the  U.S.  National  Toxicology  Program,  which  assesses  the  health  ef-
fects  of  chemicals,  also  raised  concerns  about  the  potential  ‘‘neural  and  behav-
ioral’’ effects of BPA on all humans, but especially on fetuses, infants and young 
children.  The  program  also  warned  against  heating  or  microwaving  food  con-
tainers  made  with  BPA,  since  some  studies  suggest  that  BPA  may  break  down 
faster at higher temperatures. 
• There  will  be  a  public  telephone  call-in  line  for  the  June  11–12,  2008  meeting 
of  the  NTP  Board  of  Scientific  Counselors.  The  meeting  will  be  held  at  the 
Radisson  Hotel  Research  Triangle  Park,  150  Park  Drive,  Research  Triangle 
Internet  at  http:// 
Park,  NC  27709  and  videocast 
www.niehs.nih.gov.libproxy.txstate.edu/news/video/live. 
• Senator Charles Schumer of New York and several of his fellow Democrats have 
proposed a ban on BPA in all children’s products, and Representative John Din-
gell  of  Michigan  is  investigating  whether  the  industry-backed  studies  that  are 

through 

the 

* Summary only the entire document is retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00123 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

120 

used as the basis of the FDA’s advice to consumers are really sufficient to war-
rant an all-clear for BPA. 
• As  part  of  his  investigation,  Rep.  John  D.  Dingell  (D–Mich.),  Chairman  of  the 
House  Energy  and  Commerce  Committee,  wants  to  examine  the  role  played  by 
the  Weinberg  Group,  a  Washington  firm  that  employs  scientists,  lawyers  and 
public  relations  specialists  to  defend  products  from  legal  and  regulatory  action. 
The  firm  has  worked  on  Agent  Orange,  tobacco  and  Teflon,  among  other  prod-
ucts linked to health hazards, and Congressional investigators say it was hired 
by Sunoco, a BPA manufacturer. Dingell has asked the Weinberg Group for all 
records  related  to  its  work  in  connection  with  BPA,  including  studies  it  has 
funded  and  payments  made  to  experts.  He  cited  a  letter  written  by  a  company 
vice president in 2003 as Weinberg managed opposition in a long-running regu-
latory  battle  over  a  compound  in  Teflon.  The  letter  said  this  strategy  would  be 
to discourage ‘‘governmental agencies, the plaintiffs’ bar and misguided environ-
mental groups from pursuing this matter any further.’’ 
• Last  year,  NIH  convened  two  panels  to  help  it  analyze  BPA  risks.  One  panel, 
led  by  Fred  vom  Saal,  Ph.D.,  Professor  of  Biology,  University  of  Missouri  (Co-
lumbia), consisted of 38 international experts on BPA who work for universities 
or  governments.  Last  August,  it  found  a  strong  cause  for  health  concerns,  in-
cluding cancer and early puberty. 
• In  July  of  2005,  the  European  Union  banned  six  different  phthalates  from  use 
in toys and childcare items. The EU had already had temporary, renewable re-
strictions of these phthalates in place since 1999. 
• In  October  2007,  California  passed  a  law  that  would  ban  the  sale  or  manufac-
ture of toys containing phthalates, starting in January 2009. 
• Japan, Mexico and Argentina, have also outlawed phthalates. 
• China, which makes 85 percent of the world’s toys, has developed two manufac-
turing  lines,  one  for  the  European  market  and  the  other  like-minded  nations 
that ban phthalates, and another one for the United States and dozens of, most-
ly developing and Third World, countries that don’t restrict them. 

• In early March, Washington State passed a strict ban on phthalates in toys. 
• The other states considering laws to ban phthalates include: 

»Connecticut 
»Hawaii 
»Illinois 
»Maryland 
»Massachusetts 
»New Jersey 
»New York 
»Rhode Island 
»Vermont 
»West Virginia 

• In early March, the Senate passed a bill to reform the Consumer Product Safety 
Commission,  that  includes  a  ban  on  phthalates  in  children’s  toys.  Lawmakers 
are  working  to  reconcile  the  Senate  measure  with  a  slightly  different  version 
approved  by  the  House  of  Representatives,  which  doesn’t  include  the  phthalate 
ban. 

Technical Summary 

Plastics are made by polymerizing a specific monomer in the presence of catalysts 
into a high molecular weight chain known as a polymer. The resulting polymer (usu-
ally in powder form) is mixed with much smaller, very specific, quantities of various 
additives (antioxidants, plasticizers, clarifiers, colorants, etc.) called a plastic formu-
lation  (usually  proprietary)  and  then  heated  to  form  pellets.  Plastic  products  are 
then  made  using  processes 
injection  molding, 
thermoforming,  etc.)  that  subject  these  pellets  with  more  additives  to  various  com-
binations of heat and pressure. 

(blow  molding,  extrusion, 

PlastiPure,  and  its  sister  corporation  CertiChem,  have  extensive  data  showing 
that  almost  all  existing  commercially  available  plastics  release  chemicals  that  ex-
hibit  endocrine  disruptor  (ED)  activity,  especially  estrogenic  activity  (EA)  at  con-
centrations  (micromolar  (∼ppm)  to  nanomolar  (∼ppt)  or  even  picomolar)  that  have 
many adverse biological effects, especially on fetal and newborn mammals, including 
humans.  Endocrine  disrupting  chemicals  (EDCs)  having  EA  can  have  significant 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00124 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

121 

deleterious  effects  at  very  low  (micromolar  to  picomolar)  concentrations,  especially 
on  fetal  or  developing  mammals  (NIEHS,  2006;  EDSTAC,  1998;  NRC,  1999;  NTP, 
2000; Welshons et al., 2003; Kabuto et al., 2004; vom Saal and Hughes, 2005; Swan 
et  al.,  2005;  Rubin  et  al.,  2006;  vom  Saal,  2006).  This  raises  significant  concern  for 
human  exposure  because  some  plastic  products,  including  baby  toys,  leach  EDCs 
having EA at concentrations greater than this nanomolar to picomolar range (Takao 
et al., 1999; Howdeshell et al., 1999; Yang and Bittner, 2007). 

Other than its products, PlastiPure has not yet identified any other commercially 
available plastic product which has been tested to be reliably EA-free [having no de-
tectable  EA  according  to  the  most  sensitive  available  assays].  PlastiPure  has  not 
identified  any  other  firm  that  is  currently  advertising  EA-free  plastics,  although 
there  are  some  firms  which  are  marketing  ‘‘Bisphenol  A-free’’  or  ‘‘phthalate-free’’ 
products  (USA  Today,  2007).  However,  although  they  may  not  contain  BPA  or 
phthalates,  PlastiPure’s  and  CertiChem’s  data  show  that  in  normal  use  these  prod-
ucts  do  release  other  additives  (or  monomers)  that  exhibit  EA.  In  fact,  these  data 
show  that  products  advertised  as  BPA-free  or  phthalate-free  plastics  often  release 
chemicals  that  have  more  total  EA  than  the  total  EA  released  by  products  con-
taining BPA or phthalates. 

PlastiPure  has  developed  an  extensive  line  of  technologically-advanced  formula-
tions  and  procedures  for  making  safer  plastics,  food  additives,  and  other  products 
that  do  not  release  chemicals  having  EA.  PlastiPure’s  unique  formulations  derived 
from  its  intellectual  property,  including  one  patent  already  granted  (U.S.  Patent  # 
6,894,093  B2)  for  some  EA-free  plastic  formulations,  and  two  pending  patents.  One 
of  these  pending  patents  is  very  broad  and  identifies  many  hundreds  of  plastic  for-
mulations  to  make  many  useful  plastic  products  that  in  normal  use  would  not  re-
lease  any  chemicals  having  EA.  This  patent  covers  not  only  almost  all  monomers 
and  all  additives  used  in  plastic  formulations,  but  also  most  chemicals  used  in  the 
manufacturing process to produce plastics that in normal use will not release detect-
able amounts of EA. 

CertiChem  has  spent  over  8  years  and  $5  million  to  develop  the  most  sensitive 
and  accurate  assays  available  today  to  detect  EA.  PlastiPure  has  spent  over  $1.5 
million  in  the  last  8  years  to  develop  plastics  that  do  not  leach  any  of  thousands 
of  chemicals  having  detectable  EA,  as  measured  by  CertiChem’s  most  sensitive  as-
says.  All  PlastiPure  plastics  have  also  been  developed  to  retain  other  useful  prop-
erties  of  other  plastics  that  do  release  chemicals  having  EA:  flexibility,  hardness, 
clarity, heat resistance, cold tolerance, UV tolerance, microwavable, etc. PlastiPure’s 
advanced  technologies  use  patent-protected  state-of-the  art  advances  in  cell/molec-
ular biology, endocrine physiology, polymer chemistry and polymer engineering. 

That  is,  PlastiPure  and  CertiChem  have  used  a  set  of  advanced  technologies  to 
solve a health-related problem found in almost all currently marketed plastic items: 
they  release  one  or  more  chemicals  having  detectable  EA.  Other  firms  have  spent 
many  millions  to  develop  plastics  that  do  not  contain  one  or  two  of  the  thousands 
of chemicals known to have EA. Other firms are now spending many millions to bil-
lions to market those plastics that still release one or more of the thousands of other 
chemicals having EA. In contrast, PlastiPure has used advanced technologies to de-
velop very broad health-related solutions to the problem of plastics releasing chemi-
cals with EA, rather than market-related solutions that develop plastics that do not 
release  specific  chemicals  having  EA,  but  still  release  other  chemicals  having  EA. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  09:30 Dec 13, 2012 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00125 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\77339.TXT JACKIE

